1
A REVELATION OF A PREVIOUS LIFE.
Our birth is but a sleep and a forgetting.
The soul that rises in us, our life's star,
Has had elsewhere it's setting,
And cometh from afar.
Wordsworth
.
The
death of a lady, in a foreign land, leaves me at liberty to
narrate the circumstances which follow.
A few words of previous explanation, however.
I am inclined to believe, from conversations on the subject with
many sensible persons, that there are few men who have not had,
at different intervals in their lives, sudden emotions, currents of
thought, affections of mind and body, which not only were wholly
disconnected with the course of life thus interrupted, but seemed
to belong to a wholly different being.
Perhaps I shall somewhere touch the reader's experience by
describing rather minutely, and in the first person, some
sensations
of this kind not unusual to myself.
Walking in a crowded street, for example, in perfect health,
with every faculty gayly alive, I suddenly lose the sense of
neighborhood
.
I seeI hearbut I feel as if I had become invisible
where I stand, and were, at the same time, present and visible
elsewhere. I know everything that passes around me, but I seem
disconnected and (magnetically speaking) unlinked from the
human beings near. If spoken to at such a moment, I answer
with difficulty. The person who speaks seems addressing me
from a world to which I no longer belong. At the same time, I
have an irresistible inner consciousness of being present in another
scene of every-day lifewhere there are streets, and houses, and
peoplewhere I am looked on without surprise as a familiar
objectwhere I have cares, fears, objects to attaina different
scene altogether, and a different life, from the scene and life of
which I was a moment before conscious. I have a dull ache at
the back of my eyes for the minute or two that this trance lasts,
and then, slowly and reluctantly, my absent soul seems creeping
back, the magnetic links of conscious neighborhood, one by one,
re-attach, and I resume my ordinary life, but with an irrepressible
feeling of sadness.
It is in vain that I try to fix these shadows as they recede. I
have struggled a thousand times, in vain, to particularize and note
down what I saw in the strange city to which I was translated.
The memory glides from my grasp with preternatural evasiveness.
In a book called The Man of Two Lives, similar sensations
to these are made the basis of the story. Indeed, till I saw that
book, the fear of having my sanity suspected sealed my lips on
the subject.
I have still a reserve in my confession. I have been conscious,
since boyhood, of a mental peculiarity which I fear to name while
I doubt that it is possessed by others than myselfwhich I should
not allude to now, but that it forms a strange link of identity
between me and another being to be mentioned in this story.
I may say, also, without attaching any importance to it, except
as it bears upon this same identity, that, of those things which I
have no occasion to be taught, or which I did, as the common
phrase is, by intuition, drawing was the easiest and most
passionately
followed of my boyish pursuits.
With these preliminaries, and probably some similar experience
of his own, the reader may happily form a woof on which to
embroider the following circumstances.
Travelling through Styria, some years since, I chanced to have,
for a fellow-occupant of the coup of a diligence, a very courteous
and well-bred person, a gentleman of Gratz. As we rolled slowly
along, on the banks of the Muer, approaching his native town, he
very kindly invited me to remain with him a day or two, offering
me, as an inducement, a presentation at the
soire
of a certain
lady of consequence, who was to receive, on the night of our
arrival, and at whose house I should see, some fair specimens of
the beauty of Styria.
Accepted.
It was a lovely summer's night, when we strolled through the
principal street toward our gay destination, and, as I drew upon
my friend's arm to stop him while the military band of the fortress
finished a delicious waltz (they were playing in the public square),
he pointed out to me the spacious balconies of the countess's
palace, whither we were going, crowded with the well-dressed
company, listening silently to the same enchanting music. We
entered, and, after an interchange of compliments with the hostess,
I availed myself of my friend's second introduction to take a stand
in one of the balconies, beside the person I was presented to, and
under cover of her favor, to hear out the unfinished music of the
band.
As the evening darkened, the lights gleamed out from the
illuminated rooms more brightly, and most of the guests deserted
the balconies and joined the gayer circles within. The music
ceased at the beat of the drum. My companion in the balcony
was a very quiet young lady, and, like myself, she seemed
subdued
by the sweet harmonies we had listened to, and willing to
remain without the shadow of the curtain. We were not alone
there, however. A tall lady, of very stately presence, and with
the remains of remarkable beauty, stood on the opposite side of
the balcony, and she, too, seemed to shrink from the glare within,
and cling to the dewy darkness of the summer night.
After the cessation of the music, there was no longer an excuse
for intermittent conversation, and, starting a subject which
afforded rather freer scope, I did my best to credit my friend's
flattering introduction. I had discoursed away for half an hour
very unreservedly, before I discovered that, with her hand upon
her side, in an attitude of repressed emotion, the tall lady was
earnestly listening to me. A third person embarrasses even the most
indifferent dialogue. The conversation languished, and my
companion
rose and took my arm for a promenade through the rooms.
Later in the evening, my friend came in search of me to the
supper-room.
Mon ami!
he said, a great honor has fallen out of the
sky for you. I am sent to bring you to the
beau reste
of the
handsomest woman of StyriaMargaret, Baroness R, whose
chateau I pointed out to you in the gold light of yesterday's
sunset
.
She wishes to know you
why
I cannot wholly divinefor
it is the first sign of ordinary feeling that she has given in twenty
years. But she seems agitated, and sits alone in the countess's
boudoir.
Allons-y!
As we made our way through the crowd, he hastily sketched
me an outline of the lady's history: At seventeen, taken from a
convent for a forced marriage with the baron whose name she
bears; at eighteen, a widow, and, for the first time, in lovethe
subject of her passion a young artist of Vienna on his way to
Italy. The artist died at her chateauthey were to have been
marriedshe has ever since worn weeds for him. And the
remainder you must imaginefor here we are!
The baroness leaned with her elbow upon a small table of
ormolu
,
and her position was so taken that I seated myself
necessarily
in a strong light, while her features were in shadow. Still,
the light was sufficient to show me the expression of her
countenance
.
She was a woman apparently about forty-five, of noble
physiognomy, and a peculiar fulness of the eyelidsomething like
to which, I thought I remembered to have seen, in a portrait
of a young girl, many years before. The resemblance troubled
me somewhat.
You will pardon me this freedom, said the baroness with
forced composure, when I tell you thata friendwhom I
have mourned twenty-five yearsseems present to me when you
speak.
I was silent, for I knew not what to say. The baroness shaded
her eyes with her hand, and sat silent for a few moments, gazing
at me.
You are not like him in a single feature, she resumed, yet
the expression of your face, strangely, very strangely, is the same.
He was darkerslighter
Of my age? I inquired, to break my own silence. For
there was something in her voice which gave me the sensation of
a voice heard in a dream.
Oh, God! that voice! that voice! she exclaimed wildly,
burying her face in her hands, and giving way to a passionate
burst of tears.
Rodolph, she resumed, recovering herself with a strong
effort, Rodolph died with the promise on his lips that death
should not divide us. And I have seen him! Not in dreams
not in reverynot at times when my fancy could delude me. I
have seen him suddenly before me in the streetin Vienna
hereat home at noondayfor minutes together, gazing on me.
It is more in latter years that I have been visited by him; and a
hope has latterly sprung into being in my heartI know not
howthat in person, palpable and breathing, I should again hold
converse with himfold him living to my bosom. Pardon me!
You will think me mad!
I might well pardon her; for, as she talked, a vague sense of
familiarity with her voice, a memory, powerful, though indistinct,
of having before dwelt on those majestic features, an impulse of
tearful passionateness to rush to her embrace, well nigh
over-powered
me. She turned to me again.
You are an artist? she said, inquiringly.
No; though intended for one, I believe, by nature.
And you were born in the year .
I was!
With a scream she added the day of my birth, and waiting an
instant for my assent, dropped to the floor, and clung convulsively
and weeping to my knees.
Rodolph! Rodolph! she murmured faintly, as her long
grey tresses fell over her shoulders, and her head dropped
insensible
upon her breast.
Her cry had been heard, and several persons entered the room
I rushed out of doors. I had need to be in darkness and alone.
It was an hour after midnight when I re-entered my hotel. A
chasseur stood sentry at the door of my apartment with a letter
in his hand. He called me by name, gave me his missive, and
disappeared. It was from the baroness, and ran thus:
You did not retire from me to sleep. This letter will find
you waking. And I must write, for my heart and brain are
over-flowing
.
Shall I write to you as a stranger?you whom I have
strained so often to my bosomyou whom I have loved and still
love with the utmost idolatry of mortal passionyou who have
once given me the soul that, like a gem long lost, is found again,
but in a newer casket! Mine stillfor did we not swear to love
for ever!
But I am taking counsel of my own heart only. You may
still be unconvinced. You may think that a few singular
coincidences
have driven me mad. You may think that, though born
in the same hour that my Rodolph died, possessing the same
voice, the same countenance, the same giftsthough by
irresistible
consciousness I
know
you to be
him
my lost lover returned
in another body to lifeyou may still think the evidence
incomplete
you
may, perhaps, even now, be smiling in pity at my
delusion. Indulge me one moment.
The Rodolph Isenberg whom I lost, possessed a faculty of
mind, which, if you are he, answers with the voice of an angel to
my appeal. In that soul resided, and wherever it be, must
now
reside, the singular power
(The reader must be content with my omission of this
fragment
of the letter. It contained a secret never before clothed in
languagea secret that will die with me, unless betrayed by what
indeed it may lead tomadness! As I saw it in writingdefined
accurately and inevitably in the words of anotherI felt as if the
innermost chamber of my soul was suddenly laid open to the
dayI abandoned doubtI answered to the name by which she
called meI believed in the previous existence of which my whole
life, no less than these extraordinary circumstances, had furnished
me with repeated evidence. But, to resume the letter.)
And now that we know each other againnow that I can
call you by name, as in the past, and be sure that your inmost
consciousness must replya new terror seizes me! Your soul
comes back, youthfully and newly clad, while mine, though of
unfading freshness and youthfulness within, shows to your eye
the same outer garment, grown dull with mourning and faded
with the wear of time. Am I grown distasteful? Is it with the
sight only of this new body that you look upon me? Rodolph!
spirit that was my devoted and passionate admirer! soul that
was sworn to me for ever!am Ithe same Margaret, refound
and recognised, grown repulsive? Oh God! What a bitter
answer would this be to my prayers for your return to me!
I will trust in Him whose benign goodness smiles upon
fidelity in love. I will prepare a fitter meeting for two who
parted as lovers. You shall not see me again in the house of a
stranger and in a mourning attire. When this letter is written,
I will depart at once for the scene of our love. I hear my horses
already in the court-yard, and while you read this I am speeding
swiftly home. The bridal dress you were secretly shown, the
day before death came between us, is still freshly kept. The
room where we satthe bowers by the streamsthe walks where
we projected our sweet promise of a futurethey shall all be
made ready. They shall be as they were! And Ioh Rodolph,
1*
I shall be the same! My heart is not grown old, Rodolph!
Believe me, I am unchanged in soul! And I will strive to be
I will strive to lookGod help me to look and beas of yore!
Farewell now! I leave horses and servants to wait on you
till I send to bring you to me. Alas, for any delay! but we will
pass this life and all other time together. We have seen that a
vow of eternal union may be keptthat death can not divide
those who
will
to love for ever! Farewell now!
Margaret.
Circumstances compelled me to read this letter with but one
feelingexquisite pain! Love lasts till death, but it is mortal!
The affections, however intense and faithful (I now know), are
part of the perishable coil, forgotten in the grave. With the
memory of this love of another life, haunting me through my
youth, and keeping its vow of visitation, I had given the whole
heart of my second youth to another. Affianced to her, waited
for by her, bound to her by vows which death had not divided, I
had but one course to pursue. I left Gratz in an hour, never to
return.
A few days since I was walking alone in the crowded
thorough-fare
of the city where I live. Suddenly my sense of presence
there fell off me. I walked on, but my inward sight absorbed all
my consciousness. A room which was familiar to me shut me in,
and a bed hung in mourning became apparent. In another
instant a figure laid out in a winding-sheet, and partially covered
with a velvet pall, grew distinct through the dimness, and in the
low-laid head I recognised, what a presentiment had already
betrayed to me, the features of Margaret, Baroness R. It
will be still months before I can see the announcement of her
death. But she is dead.
THE PHANTOM-HEAD UPON THE TABLE.
CHAPTER I.
SHOWING THE HUMILIATION OF THE BARRIERS OF HIGH-LIFE.
There
is no aristocracy in the time o' night. It was
punctually
ten o'clock, in Berkeley square. It rained on the
nobleman's
roof. It rained on the beggar's head. The lamps, for all
that was visible except themselves, might as well have been half
way to the moon, but even that was not particular to Berkeley
square.
A hack cabriolet groped in from Bruton street.
Shall I ring any bell for you, sir? said the cabman, pulling
aside the wet leather curtain.
No! I'll get out anywhere! Pull up to the side-walk!
But the passenger's mind changed, while paying his shilling.
On second thoughts, my good fellow, you may knock at the
large door on the right.
The driver scrambled up the high steps and gave a single
knocksuch a knock as the drivers of only the poor and
unfashionable
are expected to give, in well-regulated England.
The door was opened only to a crack, and a glittering livery
peered through. But the passenger was close behind, and setting
his foot against the door, he drove back the suspicious menial
and walked in. Three men, powdered and emblazoned in blue
and gold, started to their feet, and came toward the apparent
intruder. He took the wet cap from his head, deliberately flung
his well-worn cloak into the arms of the nearest man, and
beckoning
to another, pointed to his overshoes. With a suppressed
titter, two of the footmen disappeared through a side-door, and
the third, mumbling something about sending up one of the
stable-boys
,
turned to follow them.
The new-comer's hand passed suddenly into the footman's
white cravat, and, by a powerful and sudden throw, the man was
brought to his knee.
Oblige me by unbuckling that shoe! said the stranger, in
a tone of impertubable coolness, setting his foot upon the upright
knee of the astonished menial.
The shoe was taken off, and the other set in its place upon the
plush-covered leg, and unbuckled, as obediently.
Keep them until I call you to put them on again! said the
wearer, taking his gloves from his pockets, as the man arose, and
slowly walking up and down the hall while he drew them
leisurely on.
From the wet and muddy overshoes had been delivered two
slight and well-appointed feet, however, shining in pliable and
unexceptionable jet. With a second look, and the foul-weather
toggery laid aside, the humbled footman saw that he had been in
error, and that, hack-cab and dirty overshoes to the contrary
notwithstanding, the economising guest of my lord! would
appear, on the other side of the drawing-room door, only at home
or velvet of three pilean elegant of undepreciable water!
Shall I announce you, sir? respectfully inquired the
servant.
If Lord Aymar has come up from the dinner tableyes!
If the ladies are aloneno!
Coffee has just gone in to the ladies, sir!
Then I'll find my own way!
Lady Aymar was jamming the projecting diamond of a bracelet
through and through the thick white leaf of an Egyptian kala,
lost apparently in an eclipse of reverypossibly in a swoon of
slumberous digestion. By the drawing-room light, in her
negligent
posture, she looked of a ripeness of beauty not yet sapped by
one autumnal minuteplump, drowsy, and voluptuous. She
looked up as the door opened.
Spiridion!
Sappho!
Don't be silly!how are you, Count Pallardos? And how
like a ghost you come in, unannounced! Suppose I had been
tying my shoe, or anything?
Is your ladyship quite well?
I will take coffee and wake up to tell you! Was I asleep
when you opened the door? They were all so dull at dinner.
Ah me! stupid or agreeable, we grow old all the same! How
am I looking, Spiridion?
Ravishingly! Where is Lady Angelica?
Give me another lump of sugar! La! don't
you
take
coffee?
There are but two cups, and this was meant for a lip of more
celestial earthhas she been gone long?
The door opened, and the rustling dress of Lady Angelica
Aymar made music in the room. Oh, how gloriously beautiful
she was, and how changed was Count Spiridion Pallardos by her
coming in! A minute before, so inconsequent, so careless and
complimentarynow so timid, so deferential, so almost awkward
in every motion!
The name of Greek count has been for a long time, in
Europe, the synonym for adventurera worse pendant to a
man's name, in high life at least, than pirate or robber.
Not that a man is peculiar who is trying to make the most out of
society, and would prefer an heiress to a governess, but that it is
a disgrace to be so labelled! An adventurer is the same as
any other gentleman who is not rich, only without a mask.
Count Pallardos was lately arrived from Constantinople, and
was recognised and received by Lord Aymar as the son of a
reduced Greek noble who had been the dragoman to the English
embassy when his lordship was ambassador to the Porte. With
a promptness a little singular in one whose patronage was so
difficult to secure, Lord Aymar had immediately procured, for the
son of his old dependent, a small employment as translator in the
Foreign Office, and, with its most limited stipend for his means,
the young Count had commenced his experience of English life
His acquaintance with the ladies of Lord Aymar's family was two
stages in advance of this, however. Lady Aymar remembered
him well as the beautiful child of the lovely Countess Pallardos,
the playfellow of her daughter Angelica on the shore of the
Bosphorus
;
and on his first arrival in England, hearing that the
family of his patron was on the coast for sea-bathing, Spiridion
had prepared to report himself first to the female portion of it.
Away from society, in a retired
cottage orne
upon the seashore,
they had received him with no hinderance to their appreciation or
hospitality; and he had thus been subjected, by accident, to a
month's unshared intoxication with the beauty of the Lady
Angelica. The arrival of the young Greek had been made known
to Lord Aymar by his lady's letters, and the situation had been
procured for him; but Pallardos had seen his lordship but once,
and this was his first visit to the town establishment of the
family.
The butler came in with a
petit verre
of Curaoa for Miladi,
and was not surprised, as the footmen would have been, to see
Lady Angelica on her knee, and Count Pallardos imprisoning a
japonica in the
knot a la Grecque
of that head of Heaven's most
heavenly moulding. Brother and sister, Cupid and Psyche,
could not have been grouped with a more playful familiarity.
Spiridion!said Lady AymarI shall call you Spiridion
till the men come uphow are you lodged, my dear! Have you
a bath in your dressing-room?
Pitcher and bowl of the purest crockery, my dear lady!
May I venture to draw this braid a little closer, Angelicato
correct the line of this raven mass on your cheek? It robs us
now of a rose-leaf's breadth at leastflat burglary, my sweet
friend!
But the Lady Angelica sprang to her feet, for a voice was
heard of some one ascending from the dining-room. She flung
herself into a
dormeuse
, Spiridion twirled his two fingers at the
fire, as if bodily warmth was the uppermost necessity of the
moment, and enter Lord Aymar, followed by a great statesman,
a famous poet, one sprig of unsurpassed nobility, and one wealthy
dandy commoner.
Lord Aymar nodded to his
proteg
, but the gentlemen grouped
themselves, for a moment, around a silver easel, upon which
stood a
Correggio
, a late purchase of which his lordship had been
discoursing, and, in that minute or two, the name and quality of
the stranger were communicated to the partyprobably, for they
took their coffee without further consciousness of his presence.
The statesman paired off to a corner with his host to talk
politics, the poet took the punctured flower from the lap of Lady
Aymar, and commenced mending, with patent wax wafers, from
the ormolu desk near by, the holes in the white leaves; and the
two ineffables lingered a moment longer over their Curaoa.
Pallardos drew a chair within conversation-reach of Lady
Angelica, and commenced an unskilful discussion of the opera of
the night before. He felt angry, insulted, unseated from his
self-possession
,
yet he could not have told why. The two young men
lounged leisurely across the room, and the careless Lord
Frederick
drew his chair partly between Pallardos and Lady Angelica,
while Mr. Townley Mynners reclined upon an ottoman behind
her, and brought his lips within whisper-shot of her ear, and,
with ease and unforced nonsense, not audible nor intended to be
audible to the Greek adventurer, they inevitably engrossed
the noble beauty.
The blood of Count Spiridion ran round his heart like a snake
coiled to strike. He turned to a portfolio of drawings for a cover
to self-control and self-communing, for he felt that he had need
of summoning his keenest and coldest judgment, his boldest and
wariest courage of conduct and endurance, to submit to, and
outnerve and overmaster, his humiliating position. He was under
a roof of which he well knew that the pride and joy of it, the fair
Lady Angelica, the daughter of the proud earl, had given him her
heart. He well knew that he had needed reserve and
management
to avoid becoming too much the favorite of the lady mistress
of that mansion; yet, in it, he had been twice insulted grossly,
cuttingly, but in both cases unresentablyonce by unpunishable
menials, of whom he could not even complain without exposing
and degrading himself, and once by the supercilious competitors
for the heart he knew was his ownand, they too, unpunishable!
At this moment, at a sign from Lady Aymar, her lord swung
open the door of a conservatory to give the room air, and the
long mirror, set in the panel, showed to Spiridion his own pale
and lowering features. He thanked Heaven for the chance!
To see himself once more was what he bitterly needed!to see
whether his head had shrunk between his shoulderswhether his
back was crouchedwhether his eyes and lips had lost their
fearlessness
and pride! He had feared sofelt so! He almost
wondered
that he did not look like a dependent and a slave! But oh,
no! The large mirror showed the grouped figures of the
drawing-room
,
his own the noblest among them by nature's undeniable
confession! His clear, statuary outline of featuresthe
finely-cut
arches of his lipsthe bold, calm darkness of his passionate
eyeshis graceful and high-born mien,all apparent enough to
his own eye when seen in the contrast of that mirrored picture
it
was
not
changed!
not
a slave
not
metamorphosed by that
hour's humiliation! He clenched his right hand, once, till the
nails were driven through his glove into the clammy palm, and
then rose with a soft smile on his features, like the remainder of
a look of pleasure.
I have found, said he, in a composed and musical tone,
I have found what we were looking for, Lady Angelica!
He raised the large portfolio from the print-stand, and setting
it open on his knee, directly between Lord Frederick and Lady
Angelica, cut off that nobleman's communication with her
ladyship
very effectually, while he pointed out a view of the Acropolis
at Athens. Her ladyship was still expressing her admiration of
the drawing, when Spiridion turned to the astonished gentleman
at her ear.
Perhaps, sir, said he, in a lady's service, I may venture
to dispossess you of that ottoman! Will you be kind enough to
rise?
With a stare of astonishment, the elegant Mr. Townley
Mynners reluctantly complied; and Spiridion, drawing the
ottoman in front of Lady Angelica, set the broad portfolio upon
it, and seating himself at her feet upon the outer edge,
commenced
a detailed account of the antiquities of the grand capitol.
The lady listened with an amused look of mischief in her eye,
Lord Frederick walked once around her chair, humming an air
very rudely; Mr. Mynners attempted in vain to call Lady
Angelica to look at something wonderful in the conservatory, and
Spiridion's triumph was complete. He laid aside the portfolio
after a moment or two, drew the ottoman back to its advantageous
position, and, self-assured and at his ease, engrossed fully and
agreeably the attention of his heart's mistress.
Half an hour elapsed. Lord Aymar took a kind of dismission
attitude before the fire, and the guests one and all took their
leave. They were all cloaking together in the entry, when his
lordship leaned over the bannister.
Have you your chariot, Lord Frederick? he asked.
Yesit's at the door now!
Lady Aymar suggests that perhaps you'll set down Count
Pallardos on your way!
Whyah, certainly, certainly! replied Lord Frederick,
with some hesitation.
My thanks to Lady Aymar, said Spiridion, very quietly,
but say to her ladyship that I am provided with overshoes and
umbrella! Shall I offer your lordship half of the latter? added
he in another key, leaning with cool mock-earnestness toward
Lord Frederick, who only stared a reply as he passed out to his
chariot.
And marvelling who would undergo such humiliations and such
antagonism as had been his lot that evening, for anything else
than the love of a Lady Angelica, Count Spiridion stepped forth
into the rain to group his way to his obscure lodgings in
Parliament
street.
CHAPTER II.
SHOWING A GENTLEMAN'S NEED OF A HORSE.
It
was the hour when the sun in heaven is supposed to be least
promiscuousthe hour when the five hundred fashionables of
London West-End receive his visit in the open air, to the entire
exclusion (it is presumed) of the remaining population of the
globe. The cabs and jarveys, the vehicles of the despised public,
rolled past the forbidden gate of Hyde park, and the echo
stationed in the arched portal announced the coroneted carriages
as they nicely nibbled the pleased gravel in passing under. A
plebian or two stood outside to get a look at the superior beings
whose daily list of company to dine is the news most carefully
furnished to the instructed public. The birds (having fine
feathers) flew over the iron railing, unchallenged by the
gatekeeper
.
Four o'clock went up to Heaven's gate with the souls
of those who had died since three, and with the hour's report of
the world's sins and good deeds; and, at the same moment, a
chariot rolled into the park, holding between its claret panels the
embellished flesh and blood of Lady Aymar and her incomparable
daughter.
A group of gay men on horseback stood at the bend of
Rotten Row, watching the comers-in; and within the inner
railing of the park, among the promenaders on foot, was
distinguishable
the slight figure of Count Pallardos, pacing to and
fro with step somewhat irregular. As Lady Aymar's chariot
went by, he bowed with a frank and ready smile, but the smile
was quickly banished by a flushed cheek and lowering brow, for
from the group of mounted dandies, dashed out Lord Frederick
Beauchief, upon a horse of unparalleled beauty, and with
a short gallop took and kept his place close at the chariot
window.
Pallardos watched them till the turn of the ring took them
from his sight. The fitness of the groupthe evident
suitableness
of Lord Frederick's position at that chariot window, filled
him with a jealousy he could no longer stifle. The contest was
all unequal, it was too palpable to deny. He, himself, whatever
his person or qualities, was, when on foot, in the place allotted to
him by his fortunesnot only unnoticed by the contagious
admiration
of the crowd, but unable even to obey his mistress, though
beckoned by her smile to follow her! That superb animal, the
very type of pride and beauty, arching his glossy neck and tossing
his spirited head before the eyes of Lady Angelica, was one of
those unanalyzed, undisputed vouchers for the owner's superiority,
which make wealth the devil's giftirresistible but by the
penetrating
and cold judgment of superior beings. How should a
woman, born with the susceptible weaknesses of her sex, most
impressible by that which is most showy and beautifulhow
should she be expected to reason coldly and with philosophic
discrimination on this subject?how separate from Lord
Frederick, the mere man, his subservient accompaniments of
wealth, attendance, homage from others, and infatuated
presumption
in himself? Naywhat presumption in Spiridion Pallardos
(so he felt, with his teeth set together in despair, as he walked
rapidly along)to suppose that he could contend successfully
against this and a thousand such advantages and opportunities,
with only his unpriced, unproved love to offer her with a hand of
poverty! His heart ran drowningly over with the bitterness of
conviction.
After a few steps, Pallardos turned back with an instinctive
though inexplicable desire to hasten the pang of once more
meeting
them as they came round the ring of the park. Coming
toward him, was one of the honorable officials of Downing street,
with whom he had been thrown in contact, a conceited and
well-born
diner-out, mounted on a handsome cob, but with his servant
behind him on a blood-hunter. Mr. Dallinger was walking his
horse slowly along the fence, and, as he came opposite Pallardos,
he drew rein.
Count! said he, in that patronising tone which is tossed
over the head of the patronised like a swan's neck over the worm
about to be gobbled, aaado you know Spanish?
Yes. Why?
AaI've a job for you! You know Moreno, the Spanish
secretarywell, his wifeshe
will
persist in disguising her
billets-doux
in that stilted language, andyou know what I want
suppose you come and breakfast with me to-morrow morning?
Pallardos was mentally crowding his contemptuous refusal into
the smallest phrase that could convey repulse to insolence, when
the high-stepping and foam-spattered forelegs of Lady Aymar's
bays appeared under the drooping branch of the tree beyond him.
The next instant, Lord Frederick's easily-carried head danced
into sighta smile of perfect self-satisfaction on his face, and his
magnificent horse, excited by the constant check, prancing at his
proudest. At the moment they passed, Dallinger's groom,
attempting to restrain the impatience of the spirited hunter he
was upon, drew the curb a little too violently, and the man was
thrown. The sight of the empty saddle sent a thought through
the brain of Pallardos like a shaft.
May I take a little of the nonsense out of that horse for you?
said he quickly, springing over the railing, and seizing the rein,
to which the man still held, while the affrighted horse backed and
reared toward his master.
Aayes, if you like!
Pallardos sprang into the saddle, loosened the rein and leaned
forward, and, with three or four powerful bounds, the horse was
at the other window of the chariot. Away, with the bursted
trammels of heart and brain, went all thoughts of the horse's
owner, and all design, if any had flashed on his mind, of time or
place for restoring him. Bred in a half-civilized country, where
the bold hand was often paramount to law, the Greek had no
habit of mind likely to recognise, in a moment of passion, even
stronger barriers of propriety than he was now violating; and, to
control his countenance and his tongue, and summon his resources
for an apparently careless and smiling contest of attraction with
his untroubled rival, was work enough for the whole mind and
memory, as well as for all the nerve and spirit of the excited
Greek. He laid his hand on the chariot window, and thinking no
more of the horse he was subduing than the air he breathed, broke
up his powerful gallop to a pace that suited him, and played the
lover to the best of his coolness and ability.
We saw you walking just now, and were lamenting that you
were not on horseback, said Lady Aymar, for it is a sweet
evening, and we thought of driving out for a stroll in old Sir
John Chasteney's grounds at Bayswater. Will you come,
Spiridion
?
Tell White to drive there!
Lord Frederick kept his place, and, with its double escort, the
equipage of the Aymars sped on its way to Bayswater. Spiridion
was the handsomer man, and the more graceful rider, and,
without
forcing the difficult part of keeping up a conversation with
those within the chariot, he soon found his uneasiness displaced
by a glow of hope and happiness; for Lady Angelica, leaning far
back in her seat, and completely hidden from Lord Frederick,
kept her eyes watchfully and steadily upon the opposite side, where
rode her less confident lover. The evening was of summer's
softest and richest glory, breezy and fragrant; and as the sun
grew golden, the party alighted at the gates of Chasteney park
in tune for love, it must needs be, if ever conspiring smiles in
nature could compel accord in human affections.
Ah, happy Spiridion Pallardos! The Lady Angelica called
him to disengage her dress from the step of the carriage, and her
arm was in his when he arose, placed there as confidingly as a
bride's, and with a gentle pressure that was half love and half
mischieffor she quite comprehended that Lord Frederick's ride
to Bayswater was
not
for the pleasure of a twilight stroll through
Chasteney park with her mother! That mother, fortunately, was
no
duenna
. She had pretensions of her own to admiration, and
she was only particular as to the quantity. Her daughter's
division
with her of the homage of their male acquaintances, was an
evil she indolently submitted to, but she was pleased in proportion
as it was not obtruded upon her notice. As Pallardos and the
Lady Angelica turned into one of the winding alleys of the
grounds, Lady Aymar bent her large eyes very fixedly upon
another, and where such beautiful eyes went before, her small
feet were very sure to follow. The twilight threw its first blur over
the embowering foliage as the parties lost sight of each other,
and, of the pair who are the hero and heroine of this story, it can
only be disclosed that they found a heaven (embalmed, for their
particular use, in the golden dusk of that evening's twilight), and
returned to the park gate in the latest minute before dark, sworn
lovers, let come what would. But meantime, the happy man's
horse had disappeared, as well he might have been expected to
do, his bridle having been thrown over a bush by the engrossed
Pallardos, when called upon to assist Lady Angelica from her
carriage, and milord's groom and miladi's footman having no
sovereign
reasons for securing him. Lord Frederick laughed till
the Count accepted the offer of Lady Aymar to take him home,
bodkin-wise, between herself and her daughter; and for the
happiness
of being close pressed to the loving side of the Lady
Angelica
for one hour more, Pallardos would willingly have lost a
thousand horseshis own or the Honorable Mr. Dallinger's.
And, by the way, of Mr. Dallinger and his wrath, and his
horseless
groom, Spiridion began now to have a thought or two of an
uncomfortable pertinacity of intrusion.
CHAPTER III.
SHOWING WHAT MAKES A HORSE-STEALER A GENTLEMAN.
It
was the first day of September, and most of the gold threads
were drawn from the tangled and vari-colored woof of London
society. The season was over. Two gentlemen stood in the
window of Crockford's, one a Jew barrister (kersey enough for
more russet company by birth and character, but admitted to the
society of costly stuff for the equivalent he gave as a
purveyor
of scandal), and the other a commoner, whose wealth and
fashion gave him the privilege of out-staying the season in town,
without publishing in the Morning Post a better reason than
inclination for so unnatural a procedure.
Count Spiridion Pallardos was seen to stroll slowly up St.
James' street, on the opposite side.
Look there, Abrams! said Mr. Townley Mynners, there's
the Greek who was taken up at one time by the Aymars. I
thought he was transported.
No! he still goes to the Aymars, though he is `in Coventry'
everywhere else. Dallinger had him arrestedfor horse-stealing,
wasn't it? The officer nabbed him as he was handing Lady
Angelica out of her carriage in Berkeley square. I remember
hearing of it two months ago. What a chop-fallen blackguard it
looks!
Blackguard! Come, come, man!give the devil his due!
deprecated the more liberal commoner; may be it's from not
having seen a gentleman for the last week, but, hang me if I
2
don't think that same horse-stealer turning the corner is as
crack-looking
a man as I ever saw from this window. What's o'clock?
Half-past four, replied the scandal-monger, swallowing, with
a bland smile,
what there was to swallow
in Mynners's two-edged
remark, and turning suddenly on his heel.
Pallardos slowly took his way along Piccadilly, and was
presently
in Berkeley square, at the door of the Aymars. The
porter
admitted him without question, and he mounted, unannounced,
to the drawing-room. The ladies sat by the window, looking out
upon the garden.
Is it you, Spiridion? said Lady Aymar, I had hoped you
would not come to-day!
Oh, mamma! appealed Lady Angelica.
Welcome all other days of the year, my dear. Pallardos
warmly welcome, of coursecontinued Lady Aymar, but
to-day
oh
God! you have no idea what the first of September is
to usto my husband!
Lady Aymar covered her face with her hands, and the tears
streamed through her fingers.
Pardon me, said Pallardos, pardon me, my dear lady, but
I am here by the earl's invitation, to dine at six.
Lady Aymar sprang from her seat in astonishment.
By the earl's invitation, did you say? Angelica, what can
that mean? Was it by note, Count Pallardos?
By note, he replied.
I am amazed! she said, truly amazed! Does he mean to
have a confidant for his family secret? Is his insanity on one
point affecting his reason on all? What shall we do, Angelica?
We may surely confide in Spiridion, whatever the meaning
of it, or the resultgently murmured Lady Angelica.
We maywe may! said Lady Aymar. Prepare him for
it as you will. I pray Heaven to help me through with it this
day without upsetting my own reason. I shall meet you at
dinner
,
Spiridion.
With her hands twisted together in a convulsive knot, Lady
Aymar slowly and musingly passed into the conservatory, on her
way to her own room, leaving to themselves two lovers who had
much to talk of beside dwelling upon a mystery which, even to
Lady Angelica, who knew most of it, was wholly inexplicable.
Yet it was partially explained by the trembling girlexplained
as a case of monomania, and with the brevity of a disagreeable
subject, but listened to by her lover with a different feelinga
conviction as of a verfied dream, and a vague, inexplicable
terror which he could neither reason down nor account for. But
the lovers must be left to themselves, by the reader as well as by
Lady Aymar; and meantime, till the dinner hour, when our
story begins again, we may glance at a note which was received,
and replied to, by Lord Aymar in the library below.
My dear Lord
: In the belief that a frank communication
would be best under the circumstances, I wish to make an inquiry,
prefacing it with the assurance that my only hope of happiness
has been for some time staked upon the successful issue of my
suit for your daughter's hand. It is commonly understood, I
believe, that the bulk of your lordship's fortune is separate from
the entail, and may be disposed of at your pleasure. May I
inquire its amount, or rather, may I ask what fortune goes with
the hand of Lady Angelica. The Beauchief estates are
unfortunately
much embarrassed, and my own debts (I may frankly
confess) are very considerable. You will at once see, my lord,
that, in justice to your daughter, as well as to myself, I could not
do otherwise than make this frank inquiry before pushing my suit
to extremity. Begging your indulgence and an immediate answer,
I remain, my dear lord, yours very faithfully,
Frederick Beauchief
.
The
Earl of Aymar
.
(REPLY.)
Dear Lord Frederick
: I trust you will not accuse me of
a want of candor in declining a direct answer to your question.
Though I freely own to a friendly wish for your success in your
efforts to engage the affections of Lady Angelica, with a view to
marriage, it can only be in the irrevocable process of a marriage
settlement that her situation, as to the probable disposal of my
fortune, can be disclosed. I may admit to you, however, that
upon the events of this day on which you have written, (it so
chances,) may depend the question whether I should encourage
you to pursue further your addresses to Lady Angelica.
Yours very faithfully,
Aymar
.
Lord
Frederick Beauchief
.
It seemed like the first day after a death, in the house of Lord
Aymar. An unaccountable hush prevailed through the servants'
offices; the grey-headed old butler crept noiselessly about, making
his preparations for dinner, and the doors, that were opened and
shut, betrayed the careful touch of apprehension. With
penetrating
and glassy clearness, the kitchen clock, seldom heard
above stairs, resounded through the house, striking six.
In the same neglected attire which she had worn in the
morning
,
Lady Aymar re-entered the drawing-room. The lids were
drawn up around her large eyes with a look of unresisting distress,
and she walked with relaxed steps, and had, altogether, an absent
air and seemed full of dread. The interrupted lovers ceased
talking
as she approached, but she did not remark the silence, and
walked, errandless, from corner to corner.
The butler announced dinner.
May I give your ladyship an arm? asked Pallardos.
Oh God! is it dinner-time already! she exclaimed with a
voice of terror. Williams! is Lord Aymar below?
In the dining-room, miladi.
She took Spiridion's arm, and they descended the stairs. As
they approached the dining-room, her arm trembled so violently
in his that he turned to her with the fear that she was about to
fall. He did not speak. A vague dread, which was more than
he had caught from her looksa something unaccountably heavy
at his own heartmade his voice cling to his throat. He bowed
to Lord Aymar.
His noble host stood leaning upon the mantel-piece, pale, but
seeming less stern and cold than suffering and nerved to bear
pain.
I am glad to see you, my dear count! he said, giving him
his hand with an affectionateness that he had never before
manifested
.
Are you quite well? he added, scrutinizing his
features
closely with the questionfor, like myself, you seem to
have grown pale upon thisSeptember dullness.
I am commonly less well in this month than in any other,
said Pallardos, andnow I think of itI had forgotten that I
arose this morning with a depressior of spirits as singular as it
was unendurable. I forgot it, when I received your lordship's
note, in the happiness the day was to bring me.
The lovers exchanged looks, unremarked, apparently, by either
Lord or Lady Aymar, and the conversation relapsed into the
commonplaces of dinner-table civility. Spiridion observed that
the footmen were excluded, the old butler alone serving them at
table; and that the shutters, of which he got a chance glimpse
between the curtains, were carefully closed. Once or twice
Pallardos
roused himself with the thought that he was ill playing the
part of an agreeable guest, and proposed some question that might
lead to discussion; but the spirits of Lady Angelica seemed
frighted to silence, and Lord and Lady Aymar were wholly
absorbed, or were at least unconscious of their singular
incommunicativeness
.
Dinner dragged on slowlyLady Aymar retarding every
remove with terrified and flurried eagerness. Pallardos remarked
that she did not eat, but she asked to be helped again from every
dish before its removal. Her fork rattled on the plate with the
trembling of her hand, and, once or twice, an outbreak of
hysterical
tears was evidently prevented by a stern word and look from
Lord Aymar.
The butler leaned over to his mistress's ear.
Nonono! Not yetnot yet! she exclaimed, in a
hurried voice, one minute more! But the clock at that
instant struck seven, counted by that table company in breathless
silence. Pallardos felt his heart sink, he knew not why.
Lord Aymar spoke quickly and hoarsely.
Turn the key, Williams.
Lady Aymar screamed and covered her face with her hands.
Remove the cloth! he again ordered precipitately.
The butler's hand trembled. He fumbled with the corner of
the cloth a moment, and seemed to want strength or courage to
fulfil his office. With a sudden effort, Lord Aymar seized and
threw the cloth to the other end of the apartment.
There! cried he, starting to his feet, and pointing to the
bare table, there! there! he repeated, seizing the hand of
Lady Angelica, as she arose terrified upon her feet. See you
nothing? Do you see nothing?
With a look, at her father, of blank inquirya look of pity at
her mother, sunk helpless upon the arm of her chaira look at
Pallardos, who, with open mouth, and eyes starting from their
sockets, stood gazing upon the table, heedless of all presentshe
answeredNothingmy dear father!nothing!
He flung her arm suddenly from his hand.
I knew it, said he, with angry emphasis. Take her,
shameless
woman! Take your child, and begone!
But Pallardos laid his hand upon the earl's arm.
My lord! my lord! he said, in a tone of fearful suppression
of outery, can we not remove this hideous object? How it
glares at you!at
me!
Why does it look at
me!
What is it,
Lord Aymar? What brings that ghastly head
here?
Oh God!
oh God! I have seen it so often!
You?you
have seen it? suddenly asked Lady Aymar, in
a whisper.
Is
there anything to see? Do
you
see the same
dreadful sight, Spiridion? Her voice rose, with the last question,
to a scream.
Pallardos did not answer. He had forgotten the presence of
them all. He struggled a moment, gasping and choking for
self-control
,
and then, with a sudden movement, clutched at the bare
table. His empty hand slowly opened, and his strength sufficed
to pass his finger across the palm. He staggered backward with
an idiotic laugh, and was received in his fall by the trembling
arms of Lady Angelica. A motion from Lord Aymar conveyed
to his faithful servant that the phantom was vanishing! The
door was flung open, and the household summoned.
Count Pallardos has fainted from the heat of the room, said
Lord Aymar Place him upon my bed! AndLady Aymar!
will you step into the libraryI would speak with you a moment!
There was humility and beseechingness in the last few words of
Lord Aymar, which fell strangely on the ear of the affrighted and
guilty woman. Her mind had been too fearfully tasked to
comprehend
the meaning of that changed tone, but, with a vague
feeling
of relief, she staggered through the hall, and the door of the
library closed behind her.
CHAPTER IV.
A letter
from Lord Aymar to Lady Angelica will put the story
forward a little:
My dear Angelica
: I am happy to know that there are
circumstances which will turn aside much of the poignancy of the
communication I am about to make to you. If I am not mistaken,
at least, in believing a mutual attachment to exist between
yourself
and Count Pallardos, you will at once comprehend the ground
of my mental relief, and, perhaps, in a measure, anticipate what
I am about to say.
I have never spoken to you of the fearful inheritance in the
blood of the Aymars. This would appear a singular omission
between two members of one family, but I had strong reasons for
my silence, one of which was your possible sympathy with your
mother's obstinate incredulity.
Now
since yesterday's appalling
proofyou can no longer doubt the
inheritance of the phantom
head
the fearful record of some nameless deed of guilt, which is
doomed to haunt our festal table as often as the murderous day
shall come around to a descendant of our blood. Fortunately
mercifully I shall perhaps saywe are not visited by this dread
avenger till the maturity of manhood gives us the courage to
combat
with its horror. The Septembers, since my twentieth year,
have brought it with fatal certainty to
me
. God alone knows
how long I shall be able to withstand the taint it gives to my
thoughts when waking, and to the dreams upon my haunted
pillow.
You will readily see, in what I have said, another reason for
my silence toward you on this subject. In the strong sympathy
and sensitive imagination of a woman, might easily be bred, by
too vivid picturing, a fancy which would be as palpable almost
as the reality; and I wished you to arrive at woman's years
with a belief that it was but a monomaniac affection of my
own braina disease to pity but not to share! You are now
twenty. The females of my family
have invariably seen the
phantom at seventeen!
Do you anticipate the painful inference
I draw from the fact that this spectre is
invisible to you!
No, Angelica! you are
not my daughter!
The Aymar
blood does not run in your veins, and I know not how much
it will soften the knowledge of your mother's frailty to know,
that you are spared the dread inheritance that would have
been yours with a legitimacy of honor. I had grounds for this
belief at your birth, but I thought it due to the hallowed
character
of woman and wife to summon courage to wait for
confirmation
.
Had I acted out the impulse, then almost
uncontrollable
within me, I should have profited by the lawless land
in which I resided to add more weight to the errand of this
phantom avenger. But time and reason have done their work
upon me. Your mother is safe from open retribution. May
God pardon her!
You will have said, here, that since Count Pallardos has
been revealed by the same pursuing Providence to be
my son
, I
may well refrain from appearing as my wife's accuser. I have no
wish to profit by the difference the world makes between infidelity
in man, and infidelity in woman; nor to look, for an apology,
into the law of nature upon which so general and undisputed a
distinction must needs be founded. I confess the justice of
Heaven's vengeance upon the crimevisited upon me, I fearfully
believe, in the unconscious retaliation which gave you birth.
Yet I can not, for this, treat you as the daughter of my blood.
And this brings me to the object of my letter. With the
care of years, I have separated, from the entail of Aymar, the
bulk of my fortune. God has denied me a legitimate male heir,
and I have long ago determined to leave, to its natural conflict
with circumstances, the character of a child I knew to be mine,
and to adopt its destiny, if it proved worthy, should my fears as
to your own parentage be confirmed by the undeniable testimony
of our spectral curse.
Count Pallardos is that child
. Fate
drew him here, without my interference, as the crisis of your
destiny turned against you. The innocent was not to be
punished
for the guilty, and the inheritance he takes from you goes
back to youwith his love in wedlock! So, at least,
appearances
have led me to believe, and so would seem to be made
apparent
the kind provisions of Heaven against our resentful
injustices
.
I must confess that I shall weep tears of joy if it be so,
for, dear Angelica, you have wound yourself around my heart,
nearer to its core than the coil of this serpent revenge. I shall
find it to be so, I am sadly sure, if I prove incorrect in my
suppositions
as to your attachment.
I have now to submit to you, I trust only as a matter of
form, two offers for your handone from Mr. Townley
Mynners
,
and the other (conditional, however, with your fortune)
from Lord Frederick Beauchief. An annuity of five hundred a
year would be all you would receive for a fortune, and your
choice, of course, is free. As the Countess Pallardos, you would
share a very large fortune (my gifts to
my son
, by a transfer to be
executed this day), and to that destiny, if need be, I tearfully
urge you.
Affectionately yours, my dear Angelica,
Aymar
.
With one more letter, perhaps, the story will be sufficiently
told.
Dear Count
: You will wonder at receiving a friendly note
from me, after my refusal, two months since, to meet you over
`pistols and coffee;' but reparation may not be too late, and this
is to say, that you have your choice between two modes of
settlement
,
viz:to accept for your stable the hunter you
stole from
me
(
vide
police report) and allow me to take a glass of wine with
you at my own table and bury the hatchet,
or
, to shoot at me if
you like, according to your original design. Mynners and
Beauchief
hope you will select the latter, as they owe you a grudge for
the possession of your incomparable bride and her fortune; but I
trust you will prefer the horse, which (if I am rightly informed)
bore you to the declaration of love at Chasteney. Reply to
Crockford's.
Yours ever (if you like),
Pomfret Dallinger
.
Count
Pallardos
.
Is the story told? I think so!
GETTING TO WINDWARD.
CHAPTER I.
London
is an abominable place to dine in. I mean, of course,
unless you are free of a club, invited out, or pay a ridiculous
price for a French dinner. The unknown stranger, adrift on the
streets, with a traveller's notions of the worth of things to eat, is
much worse off, as to his venture for a meal, than he would be in
the worst town of the worst province of Francemuch worse off
than he would be in New York or New Orleans. There is a
Very's, it is true, and there are one or two
restaurants
, so
called, in the Haymarket; but it is true, notwithstanding, that
short of a two-guinca dinner at the Clarendon, or some hotel of
this class, the next best thing is a simple pointed steak, with
potatoes
,
at a chop-house. The admirable club-system (admirable
for club-members) has absorbed all the intermediate degrees of
eating-houses, and the traveller's chance and solitary meal must
be either absurdly expensive, or dismally furnished and attended.
The only real liberty one ever enjoys in a metropolis is the
interval (longer or shorter, as one is more or less a philosopher)
between his arrival and the delivery of his letters of introduction.
While perfectly unknown, dreading no rencontre of acquaintances,
subject to no care of dress, equipage, or demeanor, the stranger
feels, what he never feels afterward, a complete
abandon
to what
immediately surrounds him, a complete willingness to be amused
in any shape which chance pleases to offer, and, his desponding
loneliness serving him like the dark depths of a well, he sees lights
invisible from the higher level of amusement.
Tired of my solitary meals in the parlor of a hotel during my
first week in London, I made the round of such dining-places as I
could inquire out at the West Endof course, from the reserved
habits of the country toward strangers, making no acquaintances,
and scarce once exchanging a glance with the scores who sat at the
tables around me. Observation was my only amusement, and I
felt afterward indebted to those silent studies of character for
more acquaintance with the under-crust of John Bull, than can
be gathered from books or closer intercourse. It is foreign to
my present purpose, however, to tell why his pride should seem
want of curiosity, and why his caution and delicacy should show
like insensibility and coldness. I am straying from my story.
The covered promenade of the Burlington Arcade is, on rainy
days, a great allure for a small chop-house hard by, called The
Blue Posts. This is a snug little tavern, with the rear of its
two stories cut into a single dining-room, where chops, steaks, ale,
and punch, may be had in unusual perfection. It is frequented
ordinarily by a class of men peculiar, I should think, to England
taciturn, methodical in their habits, and highly respectable in
their appearancemen who seem to have no amusements and no
circle of friends, but who come in at six and sit over their punch
and the newspapers till bed-time, without speaking a syllable,
except to the waiter, and apparently turning a cold shoulder of
discouragement to any one in the room who may be disposed to
offer a passing remark. They hang their hats daily on the same
peg, daily sit at the same table (where the chair is turned down
for them by Villiam, the short waiter), daily drink a small pitcher
of punch after their half-pint of sherry, and daily read, from
beginning to end, the Herald, Post, and Times, with the variation
of the Athenum and Spectator, on Saturdays and Sundays. I
at first hazarded various conjectures as to their condition in life.
They were evidently unmarried, and men of easy, though limited
meansmen of no great care, and no high hopes, and in a fixed
station; yet of that degree of intelligence and firm self-respect
which, in other countries (the United States, certainly, at least),
would have made them sought for in some more social and higher
sphere than that with which they seemed content. I afterwards
obtained something of a clue to the mystery of the Blue Posts
society, by discovering two of the most respectable looking of its
customers in the exercise of their daily vocations. One man, of
fine phrenological development, rather bald, and altogether very
intellectual in his
os sublime
, I met at the rooms of a
fashionable
friend, taking his measure for pantaloons. He was the
foreman
of a celebrated Bond-street tailor. The other was the
head-shopman
of a famous haberdasher in Regent street; and either
might have passed for Godwin the novelist, or Babbidge the
calculator
with
those who had seen those great intellects only in
their imaginations. It is only in England, that men who, like
these, have read or educated themselves far above their situations
in life, would quietly submit to the arbitrary disqualifications of
their pursuits, and agree unresistingly to the sentence of exile
from the society suited to their mental grade. But here again I
am getting away from my story.
It was the close of a London rainy day. Weary of pacing my
solitary room, I sallied out as usual, to the Burlington Arcade
(I say
as usual
, for in a metropolis where it rains nine days out of
ten, rainy-weather resorts become habitual.) The little shops on
either side were brightly lit, the rain pattered on the glass roof
overhead, and, to one who had not a single acquaintance in so vast
a city, even the passing of the crowd and the glittering of lights
seemed a kind of society. I began to speculate on the characters
of those who passed and repassed me in the turns of the short
gallery; and the dinner-hours coming round, and the men
gradually thinning off from the crowd, I adjourned to the Blue
Posts with very much the feeling of a reader interrupted in the
progress of a novel. One of the faces that had most interested
me was that of a foreigner, who, with a very dejected air, leaned
on the arm of an older man, and seemed promenading to kill
time, without any hope of killing his
ennui
. On seating myself
at one of the small tables, I was agreeably surprised to find the
two foreigners my close neighbors, and, in the national silence of
the company present, broken only by the clatter of knives and
forks, it was impossible to avoid overhearing every word spoken
by either. After a look at me, as if to satisfy themselves that I,
too, was a John Bull, they went on with their conversation in
French, which, so long as it was confined to topics of drink and
platter, weather and news, I did not care to interrupt. But, with
their progress through a second pint of sherry, personal topics
came up, and as they seemed to be conversing with an impression
that their language was not understood, I felt obliged to remind
them that I was overhearing unwillingly what they probably
meant for a private conversation. With a frankness which I
scarcely expected, they at once requested me to transfer my glass
to their table, and, calling for a pitcher of punch, they extended
their confidence by explaining to me the grounds of the remarks
I had heard, and continuing to converse freely on the subject.
Through this means, and a subsequent most agreeable
acquaintance
,
I possessed myself of the circumstances of the following
story; and having thus shown the reader (rather digressively, I
must own) how I came by it, I proceed in the third person,
trusting that my narration will not now seem like the coinage
of the brain.
The two gentlemen dining at the Blue Posts on the rainy day
just mentioned, were Frenchmen, and political exiles. With the
fortunes of the younger, this story has chiefly to do. He was a
man past the sentimental age, perhaps nearer thirty-seven than
thirty-five, less handsome than distinguished in his appearance,
yet with one of those variable faces which are handsome for single
instants once in a half hour, more or less. His companion called
him Belaccueil.
I could come down to my circumstances, he said to
Monsicur
St. Leger, his friend, if I knew
how
. It is not courage
that is wanting. I would do anything for a livelihood. But
what is the first step? What is the next step from this? This
last dinnerthis last night's lodgingI am at the end of my
means; and unless I accept of charity from you, which I will not,
to-morrow must begin my descent. Where to put my foot?
He stopped and looked down into his glass, with the air of a
man who only expects an answer to refute its reasoning.
My dear Belaccueil, said the other, after a moment's
hesitation
,
you were famous in your better days for almost universal
accomplishment. Mimic, dancer, musician, cookwhat was
there in our merry carnival-time, to which you did not descend
with success for mere amusement? Why not now for that
independence of livelihood to which you adhere so
pertinaciously
?
You will be amused to find, he answered, how well I
have sounded the depths of every one of these resources. The
French theatre of London has refused me point-blank, all
engagement
,
spite of the most humiliating exhibitions of my powers of
mimicry before the stage-manager and a fifth-rate actress. I am
not musician enough for a professor, though very well for an
amateur, and have advertised in vain for employment as a teacher
of music, andwhat was your other vocation!cook! Oh no!
I have just science enough to mend a bad dinner and spoil a good
one, though I declare to you, I would willingly don the white cap
and apron and dive for life to the basement. No, my friend, I
have even offered myself as assistant dancing-master, and failed!
Is not that enough? If it is not, let me tell you that I would
sweep the crossings, if my appearance would not excite curiosity,
or turn dustman, if I were strong enough for the labor. Come
down! Show me how to come down, and see whether I am not
prepared to do it. But you do not know the difficulty of earning
a penny in London. Do you suppose, with all the influence and
accomplishments I possess, I could get the place of this scrubby
waiter who brings us our cigars? No, indeed! His situation is
a perfect castleimpregnable to those below him. There are
hundreds of poor wretches within a mile of us who would think
themselves in Paradise to get his situation. How easy it is for
the rich to say, `go and work!' and how difficult to know how
and where!
Belaccueil looked at his friend as if he felt that he had justified
his own despair, and expected no comfort.
Why not try matrimony? said St. Leger. I can
provide
you the means for a six months' siege, and you have better
qualification for success than nine-tenths of the adventurers who
have succeeded.
WhyI could do even thatfor, with all hope of prosperity,
I have of course given up all idea of a romantic love. But I
could not practise deceit, and, without pretending to some little
fortune of my own, the chances are small. Besides, you
remember
my ill luck at Naples.
Ah, that was a love affair, and you were too honest.
Not for the girl, God bless her! She would have married
me, penniless as I was, but through the interference of that
officious and purse-proud Englishman, her friends put me
hors de
combat
.
What was his name? Was he a relative?
A mere chance acquaintance of their own, but he entered at
once upon the office of family adviser. He was rich, and he had
it in his power to call me an adventurer. I did not discover his
interference till some time after, or he would perhaps have paid
dearly for his nomenclature.
Who did you say it was?
Hitchings! Mr. Plantagenet Hitchings, of Hitchings Park,
Devonshireand the one point, to which I cling, of a gentleman's
privileges, is that of calling him to account, should I ever meet
him.
St. Leger smiled and sat thoughtfully silent for a while.
Belaccueil pulled apart the stems of a bunch of grapes on his
plate, and was silent with a very different expression.
You are willing, said the former, at last, to teach music
and dancing, for a proper compensation?
Parbleu! Yes!
And if you could unite this mode of support with a very
pretty revenge upon Mr. Plantagenet Hitchings (with whom, by
the way, I am very well acquainted), you would not object to the
two-fold thread in your destiny?
They would be threads of gold,
mon ami!
said the surprised
Belaccueil.
St. Leger called for pen, ink, and paper, and wrote a letter at
the Blue Posts, which the reader will follow to its destination, as
the next step in this story.
CHAPTER II.
A green
angel (I mean an angel ignorant of the world) would
probably suppose that the feeding of these animal bodies of ours,
if not done in secret, must at least be the one act of human life
separated entirely from the more heavenly emotions. Yet the
dinner is a meal dear to lovers; and novelists and tale-tellers
choose the moments stolen from fork and plate for the birth and
interchange of the most delicious and tender sentiments of our
existence. Miss Hitchings, while unconsciously shocking
Monsieur
Sansou by tilting her soup-plate for the last spoonful of
vermicelli
,
was controlling the beating of a heart full of feminine and
delicate tenderness; and, as the tutor was careful never to direct
his regards to the other end of the table (for reasons of his own),
Miss Henrietta laid the unction to her soul that such indifference
to the prettiest girl who had ever honored them as a guest,
proved the strength of her own magnet, and put her more at ease
on the subject of Monsieur Sansou's admiration. He, indeed, was
committing the common fault of men whose manners are
naturally
agreeableplaying that passive and grateful game of
courtesy
and attention so easy to the object of regard, and so
delightful
to woman, who is never so blest as in bestowing. Besides, he
had an object in suppressing his voice to the lowest audible pitch,
and the rich and deep tone, sunk only to escape the ear of
another, sounded, to the watchful and desiring sense of her to
whom it was addressed, like the very key-note and harmony of
affection.
At a table so surrounded with secrets, conversation flagged, of
course. Mr. Hitchings thought it very up-hill work to entertain
Miss Hervey, whose heart and senses were completely absorbed
in the riddle of Belaccueil's disguise and presence; Mr. Hervey,
the uncle, found old Mrs. Plantagenet rather absent, for the
smitten dame had eyes for every movement of Monsieur Sansou,
and the tutor himself, with his resentment toward his host, and
his suspicions of the love of his daughter, his reviving passion for
Miss Hervey, and his designs on Mrs. Plantagenet, had enough
to render him as silent as the latter could wish, and as apparently
insensible to the attraction of the fair stranger.
How little we know what is in the bosoms of those around us!
How natural it is, however, to feel and act as if we knewto
account for all that appears on the surface by the limited
acquaintance we have with circumstances and feelingsto
resent an indifference of which we know not the causeto
approve
or condemn, without allowance for chagrin, or despair, or
love, or hope, or distressany of the deep undercurrents for
ever at work in the depths of human bosoms. The young man
at your side at a dinner-party may have a duel on his hands for
the morning, or a disgrace imminent in credit or honor, or a
refused
heart or an accepted one, newly crushed or newly made
happy; or (more common still, and less allowed for) he may
feel the first impression of disease, or the consequences of an
indigestion
;
and for his agreeableness or disagreeableness, you try to
account by something in yourself, some feeling toward yourself
as if you, and you only, could affect his spirits or give a color to
his mood of manners. The old man's thought of death, the
mother's overwhelming interest in her child, the woman's
upspring
of emotion or love, are visitors to the soul that come
unbidden and out of time, and you can neither feast nor mourn,
secure against their interruption. It would explain many a
coldness, could we look into the heart concealed from us. We
should often pity when we hate, love when we think we cannot
even forgive, admire where we curl the lip with scorn and
indignation
.
To judge without reserve of any human action is a
culpable
temerity, of all our sins the most unfeeling and frequent.
I will deal frankly with you, dear reader. I have arrived at a
stage of my story which, of all the stages of story-writing, I detest
the most cordially. Poets have written about the difficulty of
beginning
a story (vide Byron)
ga ne me coule pas;
others of
the
ending
that I do with facility, joy, and rejoicing. But
the
love pathos
of a storythe place where the reader is expected
to sigh, weep, or otherwise express his emotionthat is the point,
I confess, the most difficult to write, and the most unsatisfactory
when written. Pourquoy, Sir Knight? Not because it is
difficult to write love-scenesaccording to the received mode
not that it is difficult to please those (a large majority) who never
truly loved, and whose ideas, therefore, of love and its making,
are transcendentalized out of all truth and naturenot that it
would be more labor to do this than to copy a circular, or write a
love-letter for a modest swain (this last my besetting occupation)
but because, just over the inkstand, there peers a face,
sometimes
of a man of forty, past the nonsense of life, but oftener of
some friend, a woman who has loved, and this last more
particularly
knows
that true love is never readable or sensiblethat if
its language be truly written, it is never in polished phrase or
musical cadencethat it is silly, but for its concealed meaning,
embarrassed and blind, but for the interpreting and wakeful heart
of one listenerthat love, in short, is the god of unintelligibility,
mystery, and adorable nonsense, and, of course, that which I
have written (if readable and sensible) is out of taste and out of
sympathy, and none but fancy-lovers and enamored brains (not
hearts) will approve or believe it.
D'Israeli the younger is one of the few men of genius who,
having seen truth without a veil, dare to reveal the vision; and
he has written Henrietta Templethe silliest yet truest
love-book
of modern time. The critics (not an amative race) have
given him a benefit of the besom of ridicule, but D'Israeli, far
from being the effeminate intellect they would make him, is one
of the most original and intrepid men of genius living, and
whether the theme be wine, woman, or war, he writes with
fearless truth, piquancy, and grace. Books on love, however,
should be read by lovers only, and pity it is that there is not an
ink in chemistry, invisible save to the eye kindled with amatory
fire. But to our muttons.
It was not leap-year, but Monsieur Belaccueil, on the day of
the dinner-party at Hitchings park, was made aware (I will not
say by proposals, for ladies make known their inclinations in ways
much less formidable)he was made aware, I say, that the hearts
of three of the party were within the flight of his arrow.
Probably
his humble situation reversed the usual relative position of
the sexes in the minds of the dame and damselsand certainly
there is no power woman exercises so willingly as a usurpation of
the masculine privilege. I have stated my objection to detail the
dialogue between Miss Hitchings and her tutor at the
dinner-table
.
To be recorded faithfully, the clatter of silver forks on
China, the gurgle of wine, the interruptions of the footmen with
champagne and vegetables, should all be literally interspersed
for, to all the broken sentences, (so pathetic when properly
punctuated
vide
Neal's novels) these were the sequels and the
accompaniments
:
No, thank you! and If you please, and May
I fill your glass?have filled out, to the perfect satisfaction of
the lady, many an unfinished sentence upon which depended the
whole destiny of her affections; and, as I said before, the truth is
not faithfully rendered when these interstices are unsupplied.
It was dark when the ladies left the dinner-table, followed by
Monsieur Sansou, and, at the distance of a few feet from the
windows opening on the lawn, the air was black and impenetrable.
There were no stars visible and no moon, but the clouds which
were gathering after a drought, seemed to hush the air with their
long expected approach, and it was one of those soft, still, yet
murky and fragrant nights, when the earth seems to breathe only
without light, sound, or motion. What lover does not remember
such a night?
Oppressed with the glaring lights and the company of people
she cared nothing about, Miss Hervey stepped out upon the lawn,
and, with her face lifted as if to draw deeper inhalations of the
dew and freshness, she strolled Ieisurely over the smooth carpet
of grass. At a slight turn to avoid a clump of shrubbery, she
encountered Belaccueil, who was apologizing and about to pass
her, when she called him by his name, and passing her arm
through his, led him on to the extremity of the lawn. A wire fence
arrested their progress, and, leaning against it, Miss Hervey
inquired into the cause of the disguise she had penetrated, and
softened and emboldened by the fragrant darkness, said all that a
woman might say of tenderness and encouragement. Belaccueil's
heart beat with pride and gratified
amour propre,
but he
confined
himself to the expression of this feeling, and, living the
subject open, took advantage of Mrs. Plantagenet's call to Miss
Hervey from the window, to leave her and resume his ramble
through the grounds.
The supper tray had been brought in, and the party were just
taking their candles to separate, when the tutor entered at the
glass door and arrested the steps of Mrs. Plantagenet. She set
down her candle and courtesied a good-night to the ladies (Mr.
Hitchings had gone to bed, for wine made him sleepy, and Mr.
Hervey always retired earlywhere he was bored), and, closing
the windows, mixed a glass of negus for Monsieur Sansou; and,
herself pulling a sandwich to pieces, deliberately, and it must be
confessed, somewhat patronisingly, invited the Frenchman to
become her lord. And after a conversation, which (
la verit
avant tout
) turned mainly on will and investments, the widow
dame sailed blissfully to bed, and Belaccueil wrote the following
letter to his friend and adviser:
My dear St. Leger
: Enclosed you have the only surviving
lock of my grizzled wigsign and symbol that my disguises are
over and my object attained. The wig burns at this instant in
the grate,
item
my hand-ruffles,
item
sundry embroidered cravats
3
la veille cour, item
(this last not without some trouble at my
heart) a solitary love-token from Constantia Hervey. One faded
rosegiven me at Pstum, the day before I was driven disgraced
from her presence by the interference of this insolent foolone
faded rose has crisped and faded into smoke with the rest. And
so fled from the world the last hope of a warm and passionate
heart, which never gave up its destiny till nownever felt that
it was made in vain, guarded, refined, cherished in vain, till that
long-loved flower lay in ashes. I am accustomed to strip emotion
of its draperydetermined to feel nothing but what is realyet
this moment, turn it and strip it, and deny its illusions as I will,
is anguish. `Self-inflicted,' you smile and say!
You will marvel what stars will not come into conjunction,
when I tell you that Miss Hervey is at this moment under the
same roof with me and my affianced bride, and you will marvel
what good turn I have done the devil, that he should, in one day,
offer me my enemy's daughter, my enemy's fortune (with the
drawback of an incumbrance), and the woman who I thought had
spurned me. After all, it is a devil's giftfor, in choosing that
to which I am most impelled, I crush hope, and inflict pain, and
darken my own heart for ever. I could not have done this once.
Manhood and poverty have embittered me.
Miss Hitchings has chosen to fall in love with her tutor.
She is seventeen, a sweet blonde, with large, suffused eyes,
tender
,
innocent, and (without talent) singularly earnest and
confiding
.
I could be very happy with such a woman, and it would
have been a very tolerable revenge (failing the other) to have
stolen her from her father. But he would have disinherited and
forgotten us, and I have had enough of poverty, and can not
afford to be forgottenby my enemy.
You never saw Miss Hervey. It is not much to tell you she
is the most beautiful woman I have met. If she were not
beautiful
,
her manners would win all hearts. If her manners were
less fascinating, her singular talents would make her remarkable.
She is not appreciated, because her beauty blinds people to her
talents, and her manners make them forget her beauty. She is
something in the style of the Giorgione we adored at Venicea
transparently dark beauty, with unfathomable eyes and lashes that
sweep her cheek; her person tall and full, and her neck set on
like Zenobia's. Yet she is not a proud womanI think she is
not. She is too natural and true to do anything which looks like
pride, save walk like an empress. She says everything rightly
penetrates instantly to the core of meaningsings, dances, talks,
with the ease, confidence, grace, faultlessness, with which a
swallow
flies. Perfection in all things is her nature. I am jotting
down her qualities now as they are allowed by the world. I will
not write of them like a lover. Oh, my friend, with what
plummet
can you fathom the depth of my resentments, when, for
them, I forego possession of this woman! She offered me, two
hours since, the unqualified control of her destiny! She asked
me, with tremulous voice, to forgive her for the wrong done me
in Italy. She dropped that faultless and superb head on my
bosom, and told me that she loved meand I never answered!
The serpent in my heart tied up my tongue, and, with cold thanks
and fiend-like resistance to the bliss of even once pressing her to
my bosom, I left her. I do not know myself when I remember
that I have done this. I am possesseddriven outby some
hard and bitter spirit who neither acts nor speaks like me. Yet
could I not undo what I have done.
To-morrow morning will disappear Monsieur Sansou from
Hitchings park, and, on the brief condition of a brief ceremony,
the law, the omnipotent law, will deliver into my hands the lands,
tenements, goods, chattels, and liberty of my enemyfor even so
deeply has he sunk into the open pocket of Mrs. Plantagenet!
She holds mortgages on all he has, for money advanced, and all
that is hers will be mine, without reserve. The roof I have been
living in degradation under, will be to-morrow my own. The
man who called me an adventurer, who stood between me and
my love, who thrust me from my heaven without cause or
provocation
the
meddling fool who boasts that he saved a
countrywoman
from a French swindler (he has recurred to it often in my
presence), will be, to-morrow, my dependant, beggar for shelter,
suppliant for his liberty and subsistence! Do you ask if that
out-weighs
the love of the woman I have lost? Alas! yes.
You are older, and have less taste for sentiment even than I.
I will not bore you with my crowd of new feelings in this
situation
.
My future wife is amiable and good. She is also vain,
unattractive, and old. I shall be kind to her, and endeavor that
she shall not be disenchanted, and, if I can make her happy, it
may mollify my penance for the devil with which I am possessed.
Miss Hitchings will lose nothing by having loved me, for she shall
be the heiress of my wealth, and her fatherbut I will not soil
my heart by thinking of an alleviation to his downfall.
Farewell,
mon ami
. Congratulate and pity me.
Adolphe Belaccueil
.
In one of the most fashionable squares of London lives, in the
season, Monsieur Belaccueil, one of the most hospitable
foreigners
in that great metropolis. He is a pensive and rather
melancholy-looking
man by day; but society, which he seems to seek
like an opiate to restless feeling, changes him to a gay man, the
most mirth-loving of Amphytrions. His establishment is presided
over by his wife, who, as his society is mostly French, preserves
a respectable silence, but seems contented with her lot, and proud
of her husband; while in Miss Plantagenet (
ci-devant
Miss
Hitchings) his guests find his table's chief attractionone of the
prettiest heiresses and most loveable girls in London. How
deeply Monsieur Belaccueil still rejoices at his success in getting
to windward, is a matter of problem. Certainly there is one
chariot which passes him in his solitary ride in the park, to which
he bows with a pang of unabating and miserable anguish. And, if
the occupant of that plain chariot share at all in his suffering, she
has not the consolation to which he flies in societyfor a more
secluded and lonely woman lives not in the great solitude of
London
,
than Constantia Hervey.
TWO BUCKETS IN A WELL.
Five
hundred dollars a year! echoed Fanny Bellairs, as
the first silver grey of the twilight spread over her picture.
And my art, modestly added the painter, prying into his
bright copy of the lips pronouncing upon his destiny.
And how much may that be, at the present rate of patronage
one picture a year, painted for love!
Fanny, how can you be so calculating!
By the bumps over my eyebrows, I suppose. Why, my
dear coz, we have another state of existence to look forward to
old man-age and old woman-age! What am I to do with five
hundred dollars a year, when my old frame wants gilding(to
use one of your own similes)I shan't always be pretty Fanny
Bellairs!
But, good Heavens! we shall grow old together! exclaimed
the painter, sitting down at her feet, and what will you care
for other admiration, if your husband see you still beautiful, with
the eyes of memory and habit.
Even if I were sure he would so look upon me! answered
Miss Bellairs, more seriously, I can not but dread an old age
without great means of embellishment. Old people, except in
poetry and in very primitive society, are dishonored by wants
and cares. And, indeed, before we are oldwhen neither young
nor oldwe want horses and ottomans, kalydor and
conservatories
,
books, pictures, and silk curtainsall quite out of the
range of your little allowance, don't you see!
You do not love me, Fanny!
I doand will marry you, Philipas I, long ago, with my
whole heart, promised. But I wish to be happy with youas
happy, quite as happy, as is at all possible, with our best efforts,
and coolest, discreetest management. I laugh the matter over
sometimes, but I may tell you, since you are determined to be in
earnest, that I have treated it, in my solitary thought, as the one
important event of my life(so indeed it is!)and, as such,
worthy of all fore-thought, patience, self-denial, and calculation.
To inevitable ills I can make up my mind like other people. If
your art were your only hope of subsistencewhyI don't
know(should I look well as a page?)I don't know that I
couldn't run your errands and grind your paints in hose and
doublet. But there is another door open for youa
counting-house
door, to be sureleading to opulence and all the appliances
of dignity and happiness, and through this door, my dear Philip,
the art you would live by comes to pay tribute and beg for
patronage. Now, out of your hundred and twenty reasons, give
me the two stoutest and best, why you should refuse your brother's
golden offer of partnershipmy share, in your alternative of
poverty, left for the moment out of the question.
Rather overborne by the confident decision of his beautiful
cousin, and having probably made up his mind that he must
ultimately yield to her, Philip replied in a lower and more
dejected tone:
If you were not to be a sharer in my renown, should I be so
fortunate as to acquire it, I should feel as if it were selfish to
dwell so much on my passion for distinction, and my devotion to
my pencil as the means of winning it. My heart is full of you
but it is full of ambition, too, paradox though it be. I cannot
live ignoble. I should not have felt worthy to press my love upon
youworthy to possess youexcept with the prospect of
celebrity
in my art. You make the world dark to me, Fanny! You
close down the sky, when you shut out this hope! Yet it shall
be so.
Philip paused a moment, and the silence was uninterrupted.
There was another feeling I had, upon which I have not
insisted, he continued. By my brother's project, I am to reside
almost wholly abroad. Even the little stipend I have to offer you
now is absorbed of course by the investment of my property in his
trading capital, and marriage, till I have partly enriched myself,
would be even more hopeless than at present. Say the interval
were five yearsand five years of separation!
With happiness in prospect, it would soon pass, my dear
Philip!
But is there nothing wasted in this time? My life is yours
the gift of love. Are not these coming five years the very
flower of it!a mutual loss, too, for are they not, even more
emphatically, the very flower of yours? Eighteen and
twenty-five
are ages at which to marry, not ages to defer. During this
time the entire flow of my existence is at its crowning fullness
passion, thought, joy, tenderness, susceptibility to beauty and
sweetnessall I have that can be diminished or tarnished, or
made dull by advancing age and contact with the world, is thrown
awayfor its spring and summer. Will the autumn of life repay
us for this? Will iteven if we are rich and blest with health,
and as capable of an unblemished union as now? Think of this
a moment, dear Fanny!
I doit is full of force and meaning, and, could we marry
now, with a tolerable prospect of competency, it would be
irresistible. But poverty in wedlock, Philip
What do you call poverty! If we can suffice for each other,
and have the necessaries of life, we are not poor! My art will
bring us consideration enoughwhich is the main end of wealth,
after alland, of society, speaking for myself only, I want
nothing. Luxuries for yourself, Fannymeans for your dear
comfort and pleasureyou should not want if the world held them,
and surely the unbounded devotion of one man to the support of
the one woman he loves,
ought
to suffice for the task! I am
strongI am capable of laborI have limbs to toil, if my genius
and my present means fail me, and, oh, Heaven! you could not
want!
No, no, no! I thought not of want! murmured Miss
Bellairs, I thought only
But she was not permitted to finish the sentence.
Then my bright picture for the future
may
be realized!
exclaimed
Philip, knitting his hands together in a transport of hope.
I may build up a reputation, with
you
for the constant partner
of its triumphs and excitements! I may go through the world,
and have some care in life besides subsistence, how I shall sleep,
and eat, and accumulate gold; some companion, who, from the
threshold of manhood, shared every thoughtand knew every
feelingsome pure and present angel who walked with me and
purified my motives and ennobled my ambitions, and received
from my lips and eyes, and from the beating of my heart against
3*
her own, all the love I had to give in a lifetime. Tell me,
Fanny! tell me, my sweet cousin! is not this a picture of bliss,
which, combined with success in my noble art, might make a
Paradise on earth for you and me?
The hand of Fanny Bellairs rested on the upturned forehead of
her lover as he sat at her feet in the deepening twilight, and she
answered him with such sweet words as are linked together by
spells known only to womanbut his palette and pencils were,
nevertheless, burned in solemn holocaust that very night, and the
lady carried her point, as ladies must. And, to the importation of
silks from Lyons, was devoted, thenceforth, the genius of a Raphael
perhaps! Who knows?
The reader will naturally have gathered from this dialogue
that Miss Fanny Bellairs had black eyes, and was rather below
the middle stature. She was a belle, and it is only belle-metal of
this particular description which is not fusible by burning
words. She had mind enough to appreciate fully the romance
and enthusiasm of her cousin, Philip Ballister, and knew precisely
the phenomena which a tall
blonde
(this complexion of woman
being soluble in love and tears), would have exhibited under a
similar experiment. While the fire of her love glowed, therefore,
she opposed little resistance, and seemed softened and yielding,
but her purpose remained unaltered, and she rang out no!
the next morning, with a tone as little changed as a convent-bell
from matins to vespers, though it has passed meantime through
the furnace of an Italian noon.
Fanny was not a designing girl, either. She might have found
a wealthier customer for her heart than her cousin Philip. And
she loved this cousin as truly and well as her nature would admit,
or as need be, indeed. But two things had conspired to give her
the unmalleable quality just describeda natural disposition to
confide, first and foremost, on all occasions, in her own sagacity,
and a vivid impression made upon her mind by a childhood of
poverty. At the age of twelve she had been transferred from the
distressed fireside of her mother, Mrs. Bellairs, to the luxurious
roof of her aunt, Mrs. Ballister, and, her mother dying soon after,
the orphan girl was adopted, and treated as a child; but the
memory of the troubled hearth at which she had first learned to
observe and reason, colored all the purposes and affections,
thoughts, impulses, and wishes of the ripening girl, and to think
of happiness in any proximity to privation seemed to her
impossible
,
even though it were in the bosom of love. Seeing no
reason to give her cousin credit for any knowledge of the world
beyond his own experience, she decided to think for him as well
as love him, and, not being so much pressed as the enthusiastic
painter by the
besoin d'aimer et de se faire aimer
, she very
composedly prefixed, to the possession of her hand, the trifling
achievement of getting richquite sure that if he knew as much
as she, he would willingly run that race without the incumbrance
of matrimony.
The death of Mr. Ballister, senior, had left the widow and her
two boys more slenderly provided for than was anticipatedPhil's
portion, after leaving college, producing the moderate income
before mentioned. The elder brother had embarked in his father's
business, and it was thought best on all hands for the younger
Ballister to follow his example. But Philip, whose college leisure
had been devoted to poetry and painting, and whose genius for
the latter, certainly, was very decided, brought down his habits
by a resolute economy to the limits of his income, and took up
the pencil for a profession. With passionate enthusiasm, great
purity of character, distaste for all society not in harmony with
his favorite pursuit, and an industry very much concentrated and
rendered effective by abstemious habits, Philip Ballister was very
likely to develop what genius might lie between his head and
hand, and his progress in the first year had been allowed, by
eminent artists, to give very unusual promise. The Ballisters
were still together, under the maternal roof, and the painter's
studies were the portraits of the family, and Fanny's picture, of
course, much the most difficult to finish. It would be very hard
if a painter's portrait of his liege mistress, the lady of his heart,
were not a good picture, and Fanny Bellairs on canvas was divine
accordingly. If the copy had more softness of expression than
the original (as it was thought to have), it only proves that wise
men have for some time suspected, that love is more dumb than
blind, and the faults of our faultless idols are noted, however
unconsciously. Neither thumb-screws nor hot coalsnothing
probably but repentance after matrimonywould have drawn
from Philip Ballister, in words, the same correction of his
mistress's foible that had oozed out through his treacherous
pencil!
Cupid is often drawn as a stranger pleading to be taken in,
but it is a miracle that he is not invariably drawn as a
portrait-painter
.
A bird tied to the muzzle of a gunan enemy who has
written a bookan Indian prince under the protection of
Giovanni Bulletto (Tuscan for John Bull),is not more close
upon demolition, one would think, than the heart of a lady
delivered over to a painter's eyes, posed, draped and lighted with
the one object of studying her beauty. If there be any
magnetism
in isolated attention, any in steadfast gazing, any in passes
of the hand hither and thitherif there be any magie in
ce doux
demi-jour
so loved in France, in stuff for flattery ready pointed
and feathered, in freedom of admiration, and all in the way of
businessthen is a loveable sitter to a love-like painter in
parlous vicinity (as the new school would phrase it), to
sweetheart-land
!
Pleasure in a vocation has no offset in political
economy as honor has (the more honor the less profit,) or
portrait-painters would be poorer than poets.
And,
malgr
his consciousness of the quality which required
softening in his cousin's beauty, and
malgr
his rare advantages
for obtaining over her a lover's proper ascendency, Mr. Philip
Ballister bowed to the stronger will of Miss Fanny Bellairs, and
sailed for France on his apprenticeship to Mammon.
The reader will please to advance five years. Before
proceeding
thence with our story, however, let us take a Parthian glance
at the overstepped interval.
Philip Ballister had left New York with the triple vow that he
would enslave every faculty of his mind and body to business,
that he would not return till he had made a fortune, and that
such interstices as might occur in the building up of this chateau
for felicity should be filled with sweet reveries about Fanny
Bellairs. The forsworn painter had genius, as we have before
hinted, and genius is (as much as it is any one thing), the power
of concentration. He entered upon his duties accordingly, with a
force, and patience of application, which soon made him master
of what are called business habits, and, once in possession of the
details, his natural cleverness gave him a speedy insight to all the
scope and tacties of his particular field of trade. Under his
guidance, the affairs of the house were soon in a much more
prosperous train, and, after a year's residence at Lyons, Philip
saw his way very clear to manage them with a long arm and take
up his quarters in Paris.
Les fats sont les seuls hommes qui aient soin d'eux nmes
,
says a French novelist, but there is a period, early or late, in the
lives of the cleverest men, when they become suddenly curious as
to their capacity for the graces. Paris, to a stranger who does
not visit in the Faubourg St. Germain, is a republic of personal
exterior, where the degree of privilege depends, with Utopian
impartiality, on the style of the outer man; and Paris, therefore,
if he is not already a Bachelor of Arts (qu?
beau's Arts
),
usually serves the traveller as an Alma Mater of the pomps and
vanities.
Phil. Ballister, up to the time of his matriculation in
Chausse
D'Antin
, was a romantic-looking sloven. From this to a very
dashing coxcomb is but half a step, and, to be rid of the coxcombry
and retain a look of fashion, is still within the easy limits of
imitation
.
Butto obtain superiority of presence, with no apparent
aid from dress and no describable manner, and to display, at the
same time, every natural advantage in effective relief, and, withal,
to adapt this subtle philtre, not only to the approbation of the
critical and censorious, but to the taste of fair women gifted with
judgment as God pleasesthis is a finish not born with any man
(though unsuccessful if it do not seem to be), and never reached
in the apprenticeship of life, and never reached at all by men not
much above their fellows. He who has it, has bought his
doublet
in Italy, his round hose in France, his bonnet in Germany,
and his behavior everywhere, for he must know, as a chart of
quicksands, the pronounced models of other nations; but to be a
picked man of countries, and to
have been
a coxcomb and a
man of fashion, are, as a painter would say, but the setting of the
palette toward the making of the
chef-d'uvre
.
Business prospered, and the facilities of leisure increased, while
Ballister passed through these transitions of taste, and he found
intervals to travel, and time to read, and opportunity to indulge,
as far as he could with the eye only, his passion for knowledge in
the arts. To all that appertained to the refinement of himself,
he applied the fine feelers of a delicate and passionate
construction
,
physical and mental, and, as the reader will already have
included, wasted on culture comparatively unprofitable, faculties
that would have been better employed but for the meddling of
Miss Fanny Bellairs.
Ballister's return from France was heralded by the arrival of
statuary and pictures, books, furniture, and numberless articles of
tasteful and costly luxury. The reception of these by the family
at home threw rather a new light on the probable changes in the
long-absent brother, for, from the signal success of the business
he had managed, they had very naturally supposed that it was
the result only of unremitted and plodding care. Vague rumors
of changes in his personal appearance had reached them, such as
might be expected from conformity to foreign fashions, but those
who had seen Philip Ballister in France, and called subsequently
on the family in New York, were not people qualified to judge of
the man, either from their own powers of observation or from any
confidence he was likely to put forward while in their society.
His letters had been delightful, but they were confined to
third-person
topics, descriptions of things likely to interest them, &c.,
and Fanny had few addressed personally to herself, having thought
it worth while, for the experiment sake, or for some other reason,
to see whether love would subsist without its usual
pabulum
of
tender correspondence, and a
veto
on love-letters having served
her for a parting injunction at Phil's embarkation for Havre.
However varied by their different fancies, the transformation
looked for by the whole family was substantially the samethe
romantic artist sobered down to a practical, plain man of business.
And Fanny herself had an occasional misgiving as to her relish
for his counting-house virtues and manners; though, on the
detection
of the feeling, she immediately closed her eyes upon it, and
drummed up her delinquent constancy for parade and
inspection
.
All bustles are very much alike (we use the word as defined in
Johnson), and the reader will appreciate our delicacy, besides, in
not intruding on the first re-union of relatives and lovers long
separated.
The morning after Philip Ballister's arrival, the family sat long
at breakfast. The mother's gaze fastened untiringly on the
features
of her sonstill her boyprying into them with a vain
effort to reconcile the face of the man with the cherished picture
of the child with sunny locks, and noting little else than the work
of inward change upon the countenance and expression. The
brother, with the predominant feeling of respect for the
intelligence
and industry of one who had made the fortunes of the
house, read only subdued sagacity in the perfect simplicity of his
whole exterior. And FannyFanny was puzzled. The
bourgeoisie
and ledger-bred hardness of manner which she had looked
for were not there, nor any variety of the foreign slip-slop
common to travelled youth, nor any superciliousness, nor (faith!)
any wear and tear of youth and good looksnothing that she
expectednothing! Not even a French guard-chain!
What there
was
in her cousin's manners and exterior,
however
,
was much more difficult to define by Miss Bellairs than what
there
was not
. She began the renewal of their intercourse with
very high spirits, herselfthe simple nature and
unpretendingness
of his address awakening only an unembarrassed pleasure at
seeing him againbut she soon began to suspect there was an
exquisite refinement in this very simplicity, and to wonder at
the trick of it; and, after the first day passed in his society,
her heart beat when he spoke to her, as it did not use to beat
when she was sitting to him for her picture, and listening to his
passionate love-making. And, with all her faculties, she studied
him. What was the charm of his presence? He was himself,
and himself only. He seemed perfect, but he seemed to have
arrived at perfection like a statue, not like a pictureby what
had been taken away, not by what had been laid on. He was as
natural as a bird, and as graceful and unembarrassed. He neither
forced conversation, nor pressed the little attentions of the
drawing-room
,
and his attitudes were full of repose; yet she was
completely
absorbed in what he said, and she had been impressed
imperceptibly with his high-bred politeness, and the singular
elegance of his person. Fanny felt there was a change in her
relative position to her cousin. In what it consisted, or which
had the advantage, she was perplexed to discoverbut she bit
her lips as she caught herself thinking that if she were not engaged
to marry Philip Ballister, she should suspect that she had just
fallen irrecoverably in love with him.
It would have been a novelty in the history of Miss Bellairs
that any event to which she had once consented, should admit of
reconsideration; and the Ballister family, used to her strong will,
were confirmed fatalists as to the coming about of her ends and
aims. Her marriage with Philip, therefore, was discussed,
cur
ouvert
, from his first arrival, and, indeed, in her usual fashion of
saving others the trouble of making up their minds, herself had
named the day. This, it is true, was before his landing, and
was, then, an effort of considerable magnanimity, as the expectant
Penelope was not yet advised of her lover's state of preservation
or damages by cares and keeping. If Philip had not found his
wedding-day fixed on his arrival, however, he probably would
have had a voice in the naming of it, for, with Fanny's new
inspirations
as to his character, there had grown up a new flower in
her garden of beautiestimidity! What bird of the air had sown
the seed in such a soil was a problem to herselfbut true it was!
the confidant belle had grown a blushing trembler! She would
as soon have thought of bespeaking her wings for the sky, as to
have ventured on naming the day in a short week after.
The day
was
named, however, and the preparations went on
nem. con.
the person most interested (after herself) accepting
every congratulation and allusion, touching the event, with the
most impenetrable suavity. The marbles and pictures, upholstery
and services, were delivered over to the order of Miss Bellairs,
and Philip, disposed, apparently, to be very much a recluse in
his rooms, or, at other times, engrossed by troops of welcoming
friends, saw much less of his bride elect than suited her wishes,
and saw her seldom alone. By particular request, also, he took
no part in the 'plenishing and embellishing of the new abodenot
permitted even to inquire where it was situated; and, under this
cover, besides the pleasure of having her own way, Fanny
concealed
a little secret, which, when disclosed, she now felt, would
figure forth to Philip's comprehension, her whole scheme of future
happiness. She had taken the elder brother into her counsels a
fortnight after Philip's return, and, with his aid and consent, had
abandoned the original idea of a house in town, purchased a
beautifully-secluded
estate and
cottage orne
, on the East river, and
transferred thither all the objects of art, furniture, &c One
room only of the maternal mansion was permitted to contribute
its quota to the completion of the bridal dwellingthe wing,
never since inhabited, in which Philip had made his essay as a
painterand, without variation of a cobweb, and, with whimsical
care and effort on the part of Miss Fanny, this apartment was
reproduced at Revedereher own picture on the easel, as it
stood on the night of his abandonment of his art, and palette,
pencils and colors in tempting readiness on the table. Even the
fire-grate of the old studio had been re-set in the new, and the
cottage throughout had been refitted with a view to occupation
in the winter. And to sundry hints on the part of the elder
brother, that some thought should be given to a city residence
for the Christmas holydays at leastFanny replied, through a
blush, that she would never wish to see the townwith Philip at
Revedcre!
Five years had ripened and mellowed the beauty of Fanny
Bellairs, and the same summer-time of youth had turned into
fruit the feeling left by Philip in bud and flower. She was ready
now for love. She had felt the variable temper of society, and
there was a presentiment in the heart, of receding flatteries, and
the winter of life. It was with mournful self-reproach that she
thought of the years wasted in separation, of her own choosing,
from the man she loved; and, with the power to recall time, she
would have thanked God with tears of joy for the privilege of
retracing the chain of life to that link of parting. Not worth a
day of those lost years, she bitterly confessed to herself, was the
wealth they had purchased.
It lacked as little as one week of the happy day, when the
workmen were withdrawn from Revedere, and the preparations
for a family breakfast, to be succeeded by the agreeable surprise
to Philip of informing him he was at home, were finally
completed
.
One or two very intimate friends were added to the
party, and the invitations (from the elder Ballister) proposed
simply a
djeuner sur l'herbe
in the grounds of an unoccupied
villa, the property of an acquaintance.
With the subsiding of the excitement of return, the early
associations
which had temporarily confused and colored the feelings
of Philip Ballister, settled gradually away, leaving uppermost
once more the fastidious refinement of the Parisian. Through
this medium, thin and cold, the bubbles from the breathing of
the heart of youth, rose rarely and reluctantly. The Ballisters
held a good station in society, without caring for much beyond
the easy conveniences of life, and Fanny, though capable of any
degree of elegance, had not seen the expediency of raising the
tone of her manners above that of her immediate friends.
Without
being positively distasteful to Philip, the family circle, Fanny
included, left him much to desire in the way of society, and,
unwilling to abate the warmth of his attentions while with them,
he had latterly pleaded occupation more frequently, and passed his
time in the more congenial company of his library of art. This
was the less noticed that it gave Miss Bellairs the opportunity to
make frequent visits to the workmen at Revedere, and, in the
polished devotion of her betrothed, when with her, Fanny saw
nothing reflected but her own daily increasing tenderness and
admiration.
The morning of the
fte
came in like the air an overturea
harmony of all the instruments of summer. The party were at
the gate of Revedere by ten, and the drive through the avenue to
the lawn drew a burst of delighted admiration from all. The
place was exquisite, and seen in its glory, and Fanny's heart was
brimming with gratified pride and exultation. She assumed at
once the dispensation of the honors, and beautiful she looked with
her snowy dress and raven ringlets flitting across the lawn, and
queening it like Perdita among the flowers. Having narrowly
escaped bursting into tears of joy when Philip pronounced the
place prettier than anything he had seen in his travels, she was,
for the rest of the day, calmly happy; and, with the grateful
shade, the delicious breakfast in the grove, the rambling and
boating on the river, the hours passed off like dreams, and no
one even hinted a regret that the house itself was under lock and
bar. And so the sun set, and the twilight came on, and the
guests were permitted to order round their carriages and depart,
the Ballisters accompanying them to the gate. And, on the
return of the family through the avenue, excuses were made for
idling hither and thither, till lights began to show through the
trees, and, by the time of their arrival at the lawn, the low
windows
of the cottage poured forth streams of light, and the open
doors, and servants busy within, completed a scene more like
magic than reality. Philip was led in by the excited girl who
was the fairy of the spell, and his astonishment at the discovery
of his statuary and pictures, books and furniture, arranged in
complete order within, was fed upon with the passionate delight
of love in authority.
When an hour had been spent in examining and admiring the
different apartments, an inner room was thrown open, in which
supper was prepared, and this fourth act in the day's drama was
lingered over in untiring happiness by the family.
Mrs. Ballister, the mother, rose and retired, and Philip pleaded
indisposition, and begged to be shown to the room allotted to him.
This was ringing-up the curtain for the last act sooner than had
been planned by Fanny, but she announced herself as his
chamberlain
,
and, with her hands affectionately crossed on his arm, led
him to a suite of rooms in a wing still unvisited, and, with a
good-night
kiss, left him at the open door of the revived studio,
furnished
for the night with a bachelor's bed. Turning upon the
threshold, he closed the door with a parting wish of sweet
dreams, and Fanny, after listening a moment with a vain hope of
overhearing some expression of pleasure, and lingering again on
her way back, to be overtaken by her surprised lover, sought her
own bed without rejoining the circle, and passed a sleepless and
happy night of tears and joy.
Breakfast was served the next morning on a terrace
overlooking
the river, and it was voted by acclamation, that Fanny never
before looked so lovely. As none but the family were to be
present
,
she had stolen a march on her marriage wardrobe, and
added
to her demi-toilet a morning cap of exquisite becomingness.
Altogether, she looked deliciously wife-like, and did the honors
of the breakfast-table with a grace and sweetness that warmed
out love and compliments even from the sober soil of household
intimacy. Philip had not yet made his appearance, and they
lingered long at table, till at last a suggestion, that he might be ill,
started Fanny to her feet, and she ran to his door before a servant
could be summoned.
The rooms were open, and the bed had not been occupied.
The candle was burned to the socket, and on the easel, resting
against the picture, was a letter addressedMiss Fanny
Bellairs
.
THE LETTER.
I have followed up to this hour, my fair cousin, in the path
you have marked out for me. It has brought me back, in this
chamber, to the point from which I started under your guidance,
and if it had brought me back unchangedif it restored me my
energy, my hope, and my prospect of fame, I should pray
Heaven
that it would also give me back my love, and be content
more than content, if it gave me back also my poverty. The
sight of my easel, and of the surroundings of my boyish dreams
of glory, have made my heart bitter. They have given form and
voice to a vague unhappiness, which has haunted me through all
these absent yearsyears of degrading pursuits and wasted
powersand it now impels me from you, kind and lovely as you
are, with an aversion I can not control. I cannot forgive you.
You have thwarted my destiny. You have extinguished with
sordid cares a lamp within me, that might, by this time, have
shone through the world. And what am I, since your wishes are
accomplished? Euriched in pocket, and bankrupt in happiness
and self-respect.
With a heart sick, and a brain aching for distinction, I have
come to an unhonored stand-still at thirty! I am a successful
tradesman, and in this character I shall probably die. Could I
begin to be a painter now, say you? Alas! my knowledge of the
art is too great for patience with the slow hand! I could not
draw a line without despair. The pliant fingers and the plastic
mind must keep pace to make progress in art. My taste is fixed,
and my imagination uncreative, because chained down by
certainties
;
and the shortsighted ardor and daring experiment which are
indispensible to sustain and advance the follower in Raphael's
footsteps, are too far behind for my resuming. The tide ebbed
from me at the accursed burning of my pencils by your pitiless
hand, and from that hour I have felt hope receding. Could I be
happy with you, stranded here in ignoble idleness, and owing to
you the loss of my whole venture of opportunity? No, Fanny?
surely no!
I would not be unnecessarily harsh. I am sensible of your
affection and constancy. I have deferred this explanation
unwisely
,
till the time and place make it seem more cruel. You
are at this very moment, I well know, awake in your chamber,
devoting to me the vigils of a heart overflowing with tenderness.
And I wouldif it were possibleif it were not utterly beyond
my powers of self-sacrifice and concealmentI would affect a
devotion I can not feel, and carry out this error through a life of
artifice and monotony. But here again, the work is your own,
and my feelings revert bitterly to your interference. If there
were no other obstacle to my marrying youif you were not
associated repulsively with the dark cloud on my life, you are not
the woman I could now enthrone in my bosom. We have
diverged since the separation which I pleaded against, and which
you commanded. I need for my idolatry, now, a creature to
whom the sordid cares you have sacrificed me to, are utterly
unknowna woman born and educated in circumstances where
want is never feared, and where calculation never enters. I must
lavish my wealth, if I fulfil my desire, on one who accepts it like
the air she breathes, and who knows the value of nothing but
lovea bird with a human soul and form, believing herself free
of all the world is rich in, and careful only for pleasure and the
happiness of those who belong to her. Such women, beautiful
and highly educated, are found only in ranks of society between
which and my own I have been increasing in distancenay,
building an impassible barrier, in obedience to your control.
Where I stop, interdicted by the stain of trade, the successful
artist is free to enter. You have stamped me
plebeian
you
would not share my slow progress toward a higher sphere, and
you have disqualified me for attaining it alone. In your
mercenary
and immovable will, and in that only, lies the secret of our
twofold unhappiness.
I leave you, to return to Europe. My brother and my
friends will tell you I am mad and inexcusable, and look upon
you as a victim. They will say that, to have been a painter, were
nothing to the carcer that I might mark out for my ambition, if
ambition I must have, in polities. Politics in a country where
distinction is a pillory! But I could not live here. It is my
misfortune that my tastes are so modified by that long and
compulsory
exile, that life, here, would be a perpetual penance.
This unmixed air of merchandise suffocates me. Our own home
is tinctured black with it. You yourself, in this rural Paradise
you have conjured up, move in it like a cloud. The
counting-house
rings in your voice, calculation draws together your brows,
you look on everything as a
means
, and know its cost; and the
calm and means-forgetting
fruition
, which forms the charm and
dignity of superior life, is utterly unknown to you. What
would be my happiness with such a wife? What would be yours
with such a husband? Yet I consider the incompatibility
between us as no advantage on my parton the contrary, a
punishment, and of your inflicting. What shall I be, anywhere, but
4
a Tantalusa fastidious
ennuy
, with a thirst for the inaccessible
burning in my bosom continually!
I pray you let us avoid another meeting before my departure.
Though I cannot forgive you as a lover, I can think of you with
pleasure as a cousin, and I give you, as your due, (damages, the
law would phrase it,) the portion of myself which you thought
most important when I offered you my all. You would not take
me without the fortune, but perhaps you will be content with the
fortune without me. I shall immediately take steps to convey to
you this property of Revedere, with an income sufficient to
maintain
it, and I trust soon to hear that you have found a husband
better worthy of you than your cousin
Philip Ballister
.
LIGHT VERVAIN.
And thou light vervam, toothou next come, after
Provoking souls to mirth and easy laughter.
Old Somebody
.
Rome
,
May
30, 1832.
Dined
with F, the artist, at a
trattoria
. F is a man of
genius, very adventurous and imaginative in his art, but never
caring to show the least touch of these qualities in his
conversation
.
His pictures have given him great vogue and consideration
at Rome, so that his daily experience furnishes staple enough for
his evening's chit-chat, and he seems, of course, to be always
talking of himself. He is very generally set down as an egotist.
His impulse to talk, however, springs from no wish for
self-glorification
,
but rather from an indolent aptness to lay hands on
the readiest and most familiar topic, and that is a kind of egotism
to which I have very little objectionparticularly with the mind
fatigued, as it commonly is in Rome, by a long day's study of
works of art.
I had passed the morning at the Barberini palace with a party
of picture-hunters, and I made some remark as to the variety of
impressions made upon the minds of different people by the same
picture.
Apropos
of this remark, F told me a little anecdote,
which I must try to put down by way of a new shoal in the chart
of human nature.
It is very much the same with everything else, said F;
no two people see with the same eyes, physically or morally;
and faith, we might save ourselves a great deal of care and bother
if we did but keep it in mind.
As how? I asked, for I saw that this vague remark was
premonitory of an illustration.
I think I introduced young Skyring to you at a party
somewhere
?
A youth with a gay waistcoat and nothing to say? Yes.
Wellyour observation just now reminded me of the
different
estimate put by that gentleman and myself upon
something
,
and if I could give you any idea of my month's work in his
behalf, you would agree with me that I might have spared myself
some troublekeeping in mind, as I said before, the difference in
optics.
I was copying a bit of foreshortening from a picture in the
Vatican, one day, when this youth passed without observing me.
I did not immediately recollect him. He was dressed like a
figure in a tailor's window, and, with Mrs. Stark in his hand, was
hunting up the pictures marked with four notes of admiration;
and I, with a smile at the waxy dandyism of the man, turned to
my work and forgot him. Presently his face recurred to me, or
rather his sister's face, which some family likeness had insensibly
recalled, and, getting another look, I recognised in him an old,
though not very intimate playmate of my boyish days. It
immediately
occurred to me that I could serve him a very good turn
by giving him the
entre
to society here, and quite as
immediately
,
it occurred to me to doubt whether it were worth my
while.
And what changed your mind, I asked, for of course you
came to the conclusion that it was not?
Oh, for his sake alone I should have left him as he was, a
hermit in his varnished bootsfor he had not an acquaintance in
the citybut Kate Skyring had given me roses when roses were
to me, each a world; and for her sake, though I was a rejected
lover, I thought better of my demurrer. Then I had a little
pique to gratifyfor the Skyrings had rather given me the
de
haut en bas
in declining the honor of my alliance (lucky for me,
since it brought me here and made me what I am), and I was not
indisposed to show that the power to serve, to say the least, was
now on my side.
Two sufficient, as well as dramatic reasons for being civil to a
man.
Only arrived at, however, by a night's deliberation, for it
cost me some trouble of thought and memory to get back into my
chrysalis and imagine myself at all subject to people so much
below my present voguewhatever that is worth! Of course I
don't think of Kate in this comparison, for a woman one has once
loved is below nothing. We'll drink her health, God bless
her!
(A bottle of Lagrima.)
I left my card on Mr. Skyring the next morning, with a note
enclosing three or four invitations which I had been at some
trouble to procure, and a hope from myself of the honor of his
company to a quiet dinner. He took it as a statue would take a
shower-bath, wrote me a note in the third person in reply to mine
in the first, and came in ball-dress and sulphur gloves at
precisely
the canonical fifteen minutes past the hour. Good old
Thorwalsden dined with me, and an English viscount for whom I
was painting a picture, and between my talking Italian to the
venerable sculptor, and Skyring's belording and belordshipping
the good-natured nobleman, the dinner went trippingly offthe
Little Pedlington of our mutual nativity furnishing less than its
share to the conversation.
We drove, all together, to the Palazzo Rossi, for it was the
night of the Marchesa's
soire
. As sponsor, I looked with some
satisfaction at Skyring in the ante-room, his toggery being quite
unexceptionable, and his
maintien
very uppish and assured. I
presented him to our fair hostess, who surveyed him as he
approached
with a satisfactory look of approval, and no one else
chancing to be near, I left him to improve what was rather a rare
opportunitya
tte--tte
with the prettiest woman in Rome.
Five minutes after, I returned to reconnoitre, and there he stood,
stroking down his velvet waistcoat, and looking from the carpet
to the ceiling, while the marchioness was quite red with
embarrassment
and vexation. He had not opened his lips! She had
tried him in French and Italian (the dunce had told me that he
spoke French too), and finally she had ventured upon English,
which she knew very little of, and still he neither spoke nor ran
away!
`Perhaps Monsieur would like to dance,' said the
marchioness
,
gliding away from him with a look of inexpressible relief,
and trusting to me to find him a partner.
I had no difficulty in finding him a partner, for (that far) his
waistcoat `put him on velvet'but I could not trust him alone
again; so, having presented him to a very pretty woman and got
them
vis--vis
in the quadrille, I stood by to supply the
short-comings
.
And little of a sinecure it was! The man had nothing
to say; nor, confound him, had he any embarrassment on the
subject
.
He looked at his varnished pumps, and coaxed his coat to
his waist, and set back his neck like a goose bolting a grasshopper,
and took as much interest in the conversation as a footman behind
your chairdeaf and dumb apparently, but perfectly at his ease.
He evidently had no idea that there was any distinction between
men except in dress, and was persuaded that he was entirely
successful
as far as he had gone: and, as to my efforts in his behalf,
he clearly took them as gratuitous on my partprobably
thinking
,
from the difference in our exteriors, that I had paid myself
in the glory of introducing him.
WellI had begun so liberally that I could scarce refuse to
find my friend another partner, and, after that, another and
anotherI, to avoid the odium of inflicting a bore on my fair
acquaintances, feeling compelled to continue my service as chorus
in the pantomimeand, you will scarce believe me when I tell
you that I submitted to this bore nightly for a month! I could
not get rid of him. He would not be let go. Without offending
him mortally, and so undoing all my sentimental outlay for Kate
Skyring and her short-sighted papa, I had nothing for it but to
go on till he should go offridden to death with him in every
conceivable variety of bore.
And is he gone?
Gone. And now, what thanks do you suppose I got for all
this?
A present of a pencil-case?
No, indeed! but a lesson in human nature that will stick by
me much longer. He called at my studio yesterday morning to
say good-bye. Through all my sense of his boredom and relief at
the prospect of being rid of him, I felt embarrassed when he came
in, thinking how difficult it would be for him to express properly
his sense of the obligation he was under to me. After half an
hour's monologue (by myself) on pictures, &c., he started up
and said he must go. `And by-the-by,' said he, coloring a little,
`there is one thing I want to say to you, Mr. F! Hang it, it
has stuck in my throat ever since I met you! You've been very
polite and I'm obliged to you, of course
but I don't like your
devilish patronizing manner!
Good-bye, Mr. F!
The foregoing is a leaf from a private diary which I kept at
Rome. In making a daily entry of such passing stuff as interests
us, we sometimes, amid much that should be ticketed for oblivion,
record that which has a bearing, important or amusing, on the
future; and a late renewal of my acquaintance with Mr. F,
followed by a knowledge of some fortunate changes in his worldly
condition, has given that interest to this otherwise unimportant
scrap of diary which will be made apparent presently to the
reader. A vague recollection that I had something in an old
book which referred to him, induced me to look it up, and I was
surprised to find that I had noted down, in this trifling aneedote,
what turned out to be the mainspring of his destiny.
F returned to his native country after five years study of
the great masters of Italy. His first pictures painted at Rome
procured for him, as is stated in the diary I have quoted, a high
reputation. He carried with him a style of his own which was
merely stimulated and heightened by his first year's walk through
the galleries of Florence, and the originality and boldness in his
manner of coloring seemed to promise a sustained novelty of the
art. Gradually, however, the awe of the great masters seemed
to overshadow his confidence in himself, and, as he travelled and
deepened his knowledge of painting, he threw aside feature after
feature of his own peculiar style, till at last he fell into the track
of the great army of imitators, who follow the immortals of the
Vatican as doomed ships follow the Flying Dutchman.
Arrived at home, and depending solely on his art for a
subsistence
,
F commenced the profession to which he had served so
long an apprenticeship. But his pictures sadly disappointed his
friends. After the first specimens of his acquired style in the
annual exhibitions, the calls at his rooms became fewer and
farther
between, and his best works were returned from the galleries
unsold. Too proud to humor the popular taste by returning to
what he considered an inferior stage of his art, he stood still with
his reputation ebbing from him, and as his means, of course,
depended on the tide of public favor, he was soon involved in
troubles before which his once-brilliant hopes rapidly faded.
At this juncture he received the following letter:
You will be surprised on glancing at the signature to this
letter. You will be still more surprised when you are reminded
that it is a reply to an unanswered one of your ownwritten
years ago. That letter lies by me, expressed with all the
diffidence
of boyish feeling. And it seems as if its diffidence would
encourage me in what I wish to say. Yet I write far more
tremblingly than you could have done.
Let me try to prepare the way by some explanation of the
past.
You were my first lover. I was not forbidden, at fourteen,
to express the pleasure I felt at your admiration, and you cannot
have forgotten the ardor and simplicity with which I returned it.
4*
I remember giving you roses better than I remember anything so
long ago. Nowwriting to you with the same feeling warm at
my heartit seems to me as if it needed but a rose, could I give
it you in the same garden, to make us lovers again. Yet I know
you must be changed. I scarce know whether I should go on
with this letter.
But I owe you reparation. I owe you an answer to this
which lies before me; and, if I err in answering it as my heart
burns to do, you will at least be made happier by knowing that
when treated with neglect and repulsion, you were still beloved.
I think it was not long before the receipt of this letter that
my father first spoke to me of our attachment. Till then I had
only thought of loving you. That you were graceful and manly,
that your voice was sweet, and that your smile made me happy,
was all I could have told of you without reflection. I had never
reasoned upon your qualities of mind, though I had taken an
unconscious pride in your superiority to your companions, and
least of all had I asked myself whether those abilities for making
your way in the world, which my father denied you, were among
your boyish energies. With a silent conviction that you had no
equal among your companions, in anything, I listened to my
father's disparagement of you, bewildered and overawedthe
very novelty and unexpectedness of the light in which he spoke
of you, sealing my lips completely. Perhaps resistance to his
will would have been of no avail, but, had I been better prepared
to reason upon what he urged, I might have expressed to you
the unwillingness of my acquiescence. I was prevented from
seeing you till your letter came, and then all intercourse with
you was formally forbidden. My father said he would himself
reply to your proposal. But it was addressed to me, and I have
only recovered possession of it by his death.
Though it may seem like reproaching you for yielding me
without an effort, I must say, to complete the history of my own
feelings, that I nursed a vague hope of hearing from you until
your departure for Italy, and that this hope was extinguished not
without bitter tears. The partial resentment that mingled with
this unhappiness aided me doubtless in making up my mind to
forget you, and for a while, for years I may say, I was possessed
by other excitements and feelings. It is strange, however, that,
though scarce remembering you when waking, I still saw you
perpetually in my dreams.
And, so far, this is a cold and easy recital. How shall I
describe to you the next change, the re-awakening of this
smothered
and slumbering affection! How shall I evade your
contempt
when I tell you that it awoke with your renown! But my
first feeling was not one of love. When your name began to come
to us in the letters of travellers and in the rumor of literary
circles, I felt as if something that belonged to me was praised
and honored; a pride, an exulting and gratified pride, that
feeling
seemed to be, as if the heart of my childhood had been
staked on your aspirations, and was borne up with you, a part
and a partaker of your fame. With all my soul I drank in the
news of your successes in the art; I wrote to those who came
home from Italy; I questioned those likely to have heard of you,
as critics and connoisscurs; I devoted all my reading to the
literature
of the arts, and the history of painters, for my life was
poured into yours irresistibly, by a power I could not, and cannot
now control. My own imagination turned painter, indeed, for I
lived on revery, calling up, with endless variations, pictures of
yourself amid the works of your pencil, visited and honored as I
knew you were, yet unchanged in the graceful and boyish beauty
I remembered. I was proud of having loved you, of having been
the object of the earliest and purest preference of a creature of
genius; and through this pride, supplanting and overflowing it,
crept and strengthened a warmer feeling, the love I have the
hardihood to avow. Oh! what will you think of this boldness!
Yet to conceal my love were now a severer task than to wait the
hazard of your contempt.
One explanationa palliative, perhaps you will allow it to
be, if you are generousremains to be given. The immediate
impulse of this letter was information from my brother, long
withheld, of your kindness to him in Rome. From some
perverseness
which I hardly understand, he has never before hinted
in my presence that he had seen you in Italy, and it was only by
needing it as an illustration of some feeling which seemed to have
piqued him, and which he was expressing to a friend, that he
gave the particulars of your month of devotion to him.
Knowing
the difference between your characters, and the entire want of
sympathy between your pursuits and my brother's, to what
motive could I attribute your unusual and self-sacrificing
kindness
?
Did I errwas I presumptuous, in believing that it was
from a forgiving and tender memory of myself?
You are prepared now, if you can be, for what I would say.
We are left alone, my brother and I, orphan heirs to the large
fortune of my father. I have no one to control my wishes, no
one's permission to ask for any disposition of my hand and
fortune
.
Will you have them? In this question is answered the
sweet, and long-treasured, though long neglected letter, lying
beside me.
Katherine Skyring
.
Mrs. F, as will be seen from the style of her letter, is a
woman of decision and cleverness, and of such a helpmeet, in the
way of his profession as well as in the tenderer relations of life,
F was sorely in need. By her common-sense counsels and
persuasion, he has gone back, with his knowledge of the art, to the
first lights of his own powerful genius, and, with means to
command
leisure and experiment, he is, without submitting the
process to the world, perfecting a manner which will more than
redeem his early promise.
As his career, though not very uncommon or dramatic, hinged
for its more fortunate events on an act of high-spirited politeness,
I have thought, that, in this age of departed chivalry, the story
was worth preserving for its lesson.
BROWN'S DAY WITH THE MIMPSON'S.
We
got down from an omnibus in Charing-Cross.
Sovereign or ha'penny? said the cad, rubbing the coin
between
his thumb and finger.
Sovereign of course! said B confidently, pocketing
the change which the man had ready for the emergency in a bit
of brown paper.
It was a muggy, misty, London twilight. I was coming up to
town from Blackheath, and in the crowded vehicle had chanced
to encounter my compatriot B (call it Brown), who had
been lionizing the Thames tunnel. In the course of conversation,
it came out that we were both on the town for our dinner; and, as
we were both guests at the Traveller's Club, we had pulled the
omnibus-string at the nearest point, and, after the brief dialogue
recorded above, strolled together down Pall-Mall.
As we sat waiting for our fish, one of us made a remark as to
the difference of
feel
between gold and copper coin, and Brown,
fishing in his pocket for money to try the experiment, discovered
that the doubt of the cad was well founded, for he had
unconsciously
passed a halfpenny for a sovereign.
People are very apt to take your coin at your own
valuation
!
said Brown, with a smile of some meaning, and when
they are in the dark as to your original coinage (as the English
are with regard to Americans abroad), it as easy to pass for gold
as for copper. Indeed, you may pass for both in a day, as I have
lately had experience. Remind me presently to tell you how.
Here comes the fried sole, and it's troublesome talking when
there are bones to fight shy ofthe `
flow of sole
' to the contrary
notwithstanding.
I will take advantage of the
hiatus
to give the reader a slight
idea of my friend, as a preparation for his story.
Brown was the mirror of courtesy. He was also the mirror
of vulgarity. And he was the
mirror
of everything else. He
had that facility of adaptation to the society he was in, which
made him seem born for that society, and that only; and,
without
calculation or forethoughtby an unconscious instinct,
indeed
he
cleverly reflected the man and manners before him.
The result was a popularity of a most varied quality. Brown
was a man of moderate fortune and no profession. He had
travelled for some years on the continent, and had encountered
all classes of Englishmen, from peers to green-grocers; and, as he
had a visit to England in prospect, he seldom parted from the
most chance acquaintance without a volunteer of letters of
introduction
,
exchange of addresses, and similar tokens of having
pricked through his castle wall. When he did arrive in
London
,
at last, it was with a budget like the postman's on
Valentine's
day, and he had only to deliver one letter in a score to be
put on velvet in any street or square within the bills of mortality.
Sagacious enough to know that the gradations of English society
have the facility of a cat's back (smooth enough from the head
downward), he began with a most noble duke, and at the date of
his introduction to the reader, was on the dinner-list of most of
the patricians of May Fair.
Presuming that you see your man, dear reader, let us come at
once to the removal of the cloth.
As I was calling myself to account, the other day, over my
breakfast, said Brown, filling his glass and pushing the bottle,
it occurred to me that my round of engagements required some
little variation. There's a `
toujours perdrix
,' even among lords
and ladies, particularly when you belong as much to their sphere,
and are as likely to become a part of it, as the fly revolving in
aristocratic dust on the wheel of my lord's carriage. I thought,
perhaps, I had better see some other sort of people.
I had, under a
presse-papier
on the table, about a hundred
letters of introductionthe condemned remainder, after the
selection, by advice, of four or five only. I determined to cut
this heap like a pack of cards, and follow up the trump.
`
John Mimpson, Esq., House of Mimpson and Phipps,
Mark's Lane, London
.'
The gods had devoted me to the acquaintance of Mr. (and
probably Mrs.) John Mimpson. After turning over a deal of
rubbish in my mind, I remembered that the letter had been given
me five years before by an American merchantprobably the
correspondent of the firm in Mark's Lane. It was a sealed
letter
,
and said in brackets on the back, `
Introducing Mr. Brown
.'
I had a mind to give it up and cut again, for I could not guess on
what footing I was introduced, nor did I know what had become
of the writernor had I a very clear idea how long a letter of
recommendation will hold its virtue. It struck me again that
these difficulties rather gave it a zest, and I would abide by the
oracle. I dressed, and, as the day was fine, started to stroll
leisurely through the Strand and Fleet street, and look into the
shop-windows on my wayassuring myself, at least, thus much
of diversion in my adventure.
Somewhere about two o'clock, I left daylight behind, and
plunged into Mark's Lane. Up one side and down the other
Mimpson and Co.' at last, on a small brass plate, set in a green
baize door. With my unbuttoned coat nearly wiped off my
shoulder by the strength of the pulley, I shoved through, and
emerged in a large room, with twenty or thirty clerks perched on
high stools, like monkeys in a menagerie.
`First door right!' said the nearest man, without raising his
eyes from the desk, in reply to my inquiry for Mr. Mimpson.
I entered a closet, lighted by a slanting skylight, in which
sat my man.
`Mr. John Mimpson?'
`Mr. John Mimpson!'
After this brief dialogue of accost, I produced my letter, and
had a second's leisure to examine my new friend while he ran his
eye over the contents. He was a rosy, well-conditioned, tight.
skinned little man, with black hair, and looked like a pear on a
chair. (Hang the bothering rhymes!) His legs were completely
hid under the desk, so that the ascending eye began with his
equatory line, and whether he had no shoulders or no neck, I could
not well decidebut it was a tolerably smooth plane from his
seat to the top curl of his sinciput. He was scrupulously well
dressed, and had that highly washed look which marks the city
man in Londonbent on not betraying his `diggins' by his
complexion
.
I answered Mr. Mimpson's inquiries about our mutual friend
with rather a hazardous particularity, and assured him he was
quite well (I have since discovered that he has been dead three
years), and conversation warmed between us for ten minutes, till
we were ready to part sworn friends. I rose to go, and the
merchant seemed very much perplexed.
`To-morrow,' said he, rubbing the two great business bumps
over his eyebrows`noyesthat is to say, Mrs. Mimpson
well, it
shall
be to-morrow! Can you come out to Rose Lodge,
and spend the day to-morrow?'
`With great pleasure,' said I, for I was determined to follow
my trump letter to extremities.
`Mrs. Mimpson,' he next went on to say, as he wrote down
the geography of Rose Lodge`Mrs. Mimpson expects some
friends to-morrowindeed, some of her very choice friends. If
you come early, you will see more of her than if you just save your
dinner. Bring your carpet-bag, of course, and stay over night.
Lunch at twodine at seven. I can't be there to receive you
myself, but I will prepare Mrs. Mimpson to save you all trouble
of introduction. Hampstead road. Good morning, my dear
sir.'
So, I am in for a suburban bucolie, thought I, as I regained
daylight in the neighborhood of the Mansion House.
It turned out a beautiful day, sunny and warm; and had I
been sure of my navigation, and sure of my disposition to stay all
night, I should have gone out by the Hampstead coach, and made
the best of my way, carpet-bag in hand. I went into Newman's
for a postchaise, however, and, on showing him the written address,
was agreeably surprised to find he knew Rose Lodge. His boys
had all been there.
Away I went through the Regent's park, behind the
blood-posters
,
blue jacket and white hat, and, somewhere about one
o'clock, mounted Hampsted Hill, and in ten minutes thence was
at my destination. The postboy was about driving in at the open
gate, but I dismounted and sent him back to the inn to leave his
horses, and then, depositing my bag at the porter's lodge, walked
up the avenue. It was a much finer place, altogether, than I
expected to see.
Mrs. Mimpson was in the garden. The dashing footman
who gave me the information led me through a superb
drawing-room
,
and out at a glass door upon the lawn, and left me to make
my own way to the lady's presence.
It was a delicious spot, and I should have been very glad to
ramble about by myself till dinner, but, at a turn in the
grand-walk
,
I came suddenly upon two ladies.
I made my bow, and begged leave to introduce myself as
Mr. Brown.'
With a very slight inclination of the head, and no smile
whatever, one of the ladies asked me if I had walked from town,
and begged her companion (without introducing me to her) to
show me in to lunch. The spokester was a stout and tall woman,
who had rather an aristocratic nose, and was not handsome, but,
to give her her due, she had made a narrow escape of it. She
was dressed very showily, and evidently had great pretensions;
but, that she was not at all glad to see Mr. Brown, was as
apparent
as was at all necessary. As the other, and younger lady,
who was to accompany me, however, was very pretty, though
dressed very plainly, and had, withal, a look in her eye which
assured me she was amused with my unwelcome apparition, I
determined, as I should not otherwise have done, to stay it out,
and accepted her convoy with submissive civilityvery much
inclined, however, to be impudent to somebody, somehow.
The lunch was on a tray in a side-room, and I rang the bell
and ordered a bottle of champagne. The servant looked
surprised
,
but brought it, and meantime I was getting through the
weather and the other commonplaces, and the lady, saying little,
was watching me very calmly. I liked her looks, however, and
was sure she was not a Mimpson.
`Hand this to Miss Armstrong!' said I to the footman,
pouring out a glass of champagne.
`Miss Bellamy, you mean, sir.'
I rose and bowed, and, with as grave a courtesy as I could
command, expressed my pleasure at my first introduction to Miss
Bellamythrough Thomas, the footman! Miss Bellamy burst
into a laugh, and was pleased to compliment my American
manners
,
and in ten minutes we were a very merry pair of friends,
and she accepted my arm for a stroll through the grounds,
carefully
avoiding the frigid neighborhood of Mrs. Mimpson.
Of course I set about picking Miss Bellamy's brains for what
information I wanted. She turned out quite the nicest creature
I had seen in Englandfresh, joyous, natural, and clever; and, as
I was delivered over to her bodily, by her keeper and feeder, she
made no scruple of promenading me through the grounds till the
dressing bellfour of the most agreeable hours I have to record
in my travels.
By Miss Bellamy's account, my advent that day was looked
upon by Mrs. Mimpson as an enraging calamity. Mrs. Mimpson
was, herself, fourth cousin to a Scotch lord, and the plague of her
life was the drawback to the gentility of her parties in Mimpson's
mercantile acquaintance. She had married the little man for his
money, and had thought, by living out of town, to choose her
own society, with her husband for her only incumbrance; but
Mimpson vowed that he should be ruined in Mark's Lane, if he
did not house and dine his mercantile fraternity and their envoys
at Rose Lodge, and they had at last compromised the matter.
No Yankee clerk, or German agent, or person of any description,
defiled by trade, was to be invited to the Lodge without a three
days' premonition to Mrs. Mimpson, and no additions were to be
made, whatever, by Mr. M., to
Mrs.
M's dinners, soires,
matines, archery parties, suppers, djeuners, tableaux, or private
theatricals. This holy treaty, Mrs. Mimpson presumed, was
written `with a gad of steel on a leaf of brass'inviolable as her
cousin's coat-of-arms.
But there was still `Ossa on Pelion.' The dinner of that
day had a diplomatic aim. Miss Mimpson (whom I had not yet
seen) was ready to `come out,' and her mother had embarked
her whole soul in the enterprise of bringing about that
dbut
at
Almack's. Her best card was a certain Lady S, who
chanced to be passing a few days in the neighborhood, and this
dinner was in
her
honorthe company chosen to impress
her
with the exclusiveness of the Mimpsons, and the prayer for her
ladyship's influence (to procure vouchers from one of the
patronesses
)
was to be made, when she was `dieted to their request.'
And all had hitherto worked to a charm. Lady S had
accepted
Ude
had sent his best cook from Crockford'sthe
Belgian
charg
and a Swedish
attach
were comingthe day was
beautiful, and the Lodge was sitting for its picture; and, on the
very morning, when every chair at the table was ticketed and
devoted, what should Mr. Mimpson do, but send back a special
messenger from the city, to say that he had forgotten to mention
to Mrs. M. at breakfast, that he had invited Mr. Brown! Of
course he had
forgotten
it, though it would have been as much
as his eyes were worth to mention it in person to Mrs.
Mimpson
.
To this information, which I give you in a lump, but which
came to light in the course of rather a desultory conversation,
Miss Bellamy thought I had some title, from the rudeness of my
reception. It was given in the shape of a very clever banter, it
is true, but she was evidently interested to set me right with
regard to Mr. Mimpson's good intentions in my behalf, and, as
far as that and her own civilities would do it, to apologise for the
inhospitality of Rose Lodge. Very kind of the girlfor I was
passing, recollect, at a most ha'penny valuation.
I had made some casual remark touching the absurdity of
Almack's aspirations in general, and Mrs. Mimpson's in
particular
,
and my fair friend, who of course fancied an Almack's ticket
as much out of Mr. Brown's reach as the horn of the new moon,
took up the defence of Mrs. Mimpson on that point, and
undertook
to dazzle my untutored imagination by a picture of this
seventh heavenas she had heard it describedfor, to herself,
she freely confessed, it was not even within the limits of
dream-land
.
I knew this was true of herself, and thousands of
highly-educated
and charming girls in England; but still, looking at
her while she spoke, and seeing what an ornament she would be
to any ballroom in the world, I realized, with more repugnance
than I had ever felt before, the arbitrary barriers of fashion and
aristocracy. As accident had placed me in a position to `look on
the reverse of the shield,' I determined, if possible, to let Miss
Bellamy judge of its color with the same advantage. It is not
often that a plebeian like myself has the authority to
`Bid the pebbles on the hungry beach
Fillip the stars.'
We were near the open window of the library, and I stepped
in and wrote a note to Lady  (one of the lady patronesses,
and the kindest friend I have in England), asking for three
vouchers for the next ball. I had had occasion once or twice
before to apply for similar favors, for countrywomen of my
own, passing through London on their travels, and I knew that
her ladyship thought no more of granting them than of returning
bows in Hyde Park. I did not name the ladies for whom the
three tickets were intended, wishing to reserve the privilege of
handing one to Miss Mimpson, should she turn out civil and
presentable
.
The third, of course, was to Miss Bellamy's chaperon,
whoever that might be, and the party
might
be extended to a
quartette by the `Monsieur De Trop' of the hour
cela selon
.
Quite a dramatic plotwasn't it?
I knew that Lady  was not very well, and would be
found at home by the messenger (my post-boy), and there was
time enough between soup and coffee to go to London and back,
even without the spur in his pocket.
The bell rang, and Miss Bellamy took herself off to dress.
I went to my carpet bag in the bachelor quarters of the house,
and through a discrect
entretien
with the maid who brought me
hot water, became somewhat informed as to my fair friend's
position
in the family. She was the daughter of a gentleman who
had seen better days. They lived in a retired cottage in the
neighborhood; and, as Miss Bellamy and a younger sister were
both very highly accomplished, they were usually asked to the
Lodge, whenever there was company to be entertained with their
music.
I was early in the drawing-room, and found there Mrs.
Mimpson and a tall dragoon of a young lady I presumed to be her
daughter. She did not introduce me. I had hardly achieved
my salutary
salaam
when Miss Bellamy came in opportunely,
and took me off their hands, and, as they addressed no
conversation
to us, we turned over music, and chatted in the corner while
the people came in. It was twilight in the reception-room, and
I hoped, by getting on the same side of the table with Lady
S (whom I had the honor of knowing), to escape
recognizance
till we joined the ladies in the drawing-room after dinner.
As the guests arrived, they were formally introduced to Miss
Mimpson by the mother, and everybody but myself was formally
presented to Lady S, the exception not noticeable, of course,
among thirty people. Mr. Mimpson came late from the city,
possibly anxious to avoid a skirmish on the subject of his friend
Brown, and he entered the room barely in time to hand Lady
S in to dinner.
My tactics were ably seconded by my unconscious ally. I
placed myself in such a position at table, that, by a little
management
,
I kept Miss Bellamy's head between me and Lady
S, and my name was not so remarkable as to draw attention
to me when called on to take wine with the peccant spouse of the
Scotch lord's cousin. Meantime I was very charmingly
entertained
Miss
Bellamy not having, at all, the fear of Mrs.
Mimpson
before her eyes, and apparently finding the Yankee supercargo,
or cotton clerk, or whatever he might be, quite worth trying her
hand upon. The provender was good, and the wine was enough
to verify the apocryphaat least for the night`a man
remembering
neither sorrow nor debt' with such glorious claret.
As I was
vis-a-vis
to Miss Mimpson, and only two plates
removed from her mother, I was within reach of some syllable or
some civility, and one would have thought that good breeding
might exact some slight notice for the devil himself, under one's
own roof by invitation; but the large eyes of Miss Aurelia and
her mamma passed over me as if I had on the invisible ring of
Gyges. I wonder, by-the-way, whether the ambitious youths
who go to London and Paris with samples, and come back and
sport `the complete varnish of a man' acquired in foreign society
I wonder whether they take these rubs to be part of their
polishing!
The ladies rose and left us, and as I had no more occasion
to dodge heads, or trouble myself with humility, I took Lady
S's place at old Mimpson's right hand, and was immediately
recognized with great
empressement
by the Belgian
charg
, who
had met me `very often, in very agreeable society.' Mimpson
stared, and evidently took it for a bit of flummery or a mistake;
but he presently stared again, for the butler came in with a
coronetted
note on his silver tray, and the seal side up, and
presented
it to me with a most deferential bend of his white coat.
I felt the vouchers within, and pocketed it without opening, and
we soon after rose and went to the drawing-room for our coffee.
Lady S sat with her back to the door, beseiged by Mrs.
Mimpson; and, at the piano, beside Miss Bellamy, who was
preparing
to play, stood one of the loveliest young creatures possible
to fancy. A pale and high-bred looking lady in widow's weeds
sat near them, and I had no difficulty in making out who were
the after-dinner additions to the party. I joined them, and was
immediately introduced by Miss Bellamy to her mother and
sister, with whom (after a brilliant duet by the sisters) I strolled
out upon the lawn for an hourfor it was a clear night, and the
moon and soft air almost took me back to Italy. And (perhaps
5
by a hint from Miss Bellamy) I was allowed to get on very
expeditiously
in my acquaintance with her mother and sister.
My new friends returned to the drawing-room, and, as the
adjoining library was lighted, I went in and filled up the blank
vouchers with the names of Mrs. Bellamy and her daughters. I
listened a moment to the conversation in the next room. The
subject was Almack's, and was discussed with great animation.
Lady S, who seemed to me trying to escape the trap they
had baited for her, was quietly setting forth the difficulties of
procuring vouchers, and recommending to Mrs. Mimpson not to
subject herself to the mortification of a refusal. Old Mimpson
backed up this advice with a stout approval, and this brought
Mrs. Mimpson out `horse and foot,' and she declared that she
would submit to anything, do anything, give anything, rather
than fail in this darling object of her ambition. She would feel
under eternal inexpressible obligations to any friend who would
procure, for herself and daughter, admission for but one night to
Almack's.
And then came in the sweet voice of Miss Bellamy, who
`knew it was both wrong and silly, but she would give ten years
of her life to go to one of Almack's balls, and, in a long
conversation
she had had with Mr. Brown on the subject that
morning
'
`Ah!' interrupted Lady S, `if it had been
the
Mr.
Brown, you would have had very little trouble about it.'
`And who is
the
Mr. Brown?' asked Mrs. Mimpson.
`The pet and
proteg
of the only lady patroness I do not
visit,' said Lady S, and unluckily, too, the only one who
thinks the vouchers great rubbish, and gives them away without
thought or scruple.'
At that moment I entered the room.
`Good heavens!' screamed Lady S, `is that his
ghost? Why, Mr. Brown!' she gasped, giving me her hand
very cautiously, `do you appear when you are talked of, like
likelike'
`Like the devil? No! But I am here in the body, and
very much at your ladyship's service,' said I, `for of course you
are going to the Duke's to-night, and so am I. Will you take me
with you, or shall my
po-sha
follow where I belongin your
train?
`I'll take you, of course,' said her ladyship, rising, `but first
about these vouchers. You have just come, and didn't hear our
discussion. Mrs. Mimpson is extremely anxious that her
daughter should come out at Almack's, and, as I happened to
say, the moment before you entered, you are the very person
to procure the tickets from Lady. How
very
odd that
you should come in just then! But tell uscan you?'
A dead silence followed the question. Mrs. Mimpson sat
with her eyes on the floor, the picture of dismay and mortification.
Miss Mimpson blushed and twisted her handkerchief, and Miss
Bellamy looked at her hostess, half amused and half distressed.
I handed the three vouchers to Miss Bellamy, and begged
her acceptance of them, and then, turning to Lady S,
without waiting for a reply, regretted that, not having had the
pleasure of being presented to Miss Mimpson, I had not felt
authorised to include her in my effort to oblige Miss Bellamy.
And, what with old Mimpson's astonishment, and Lady
S's immediate tact in covering, by the bustle of departure,
what she did not quite understand, though she knew it was some
awkward
contre-temps
or other, I found time to receive Miss
Bellamy's thanks, and get permission from the mother to call and
arrange this unexpected party, and, in ten minutes, I was on my
way to London with Lady S, amusing her almost into fits
with my explanations of the Mimpson mystery.
Lady S was to be still at Hampstead for a few days,
and, at my request, she called with me on the Bellamys, and
invited the girls up to town. Rose Bellamy, the younger, is at
this moment one of the new stars of the season accordingly, and
Miss Bellamy and I carry on the war, weekly, at Almack's, and
nightly at some wax-light paradise or other, and Lady S
has fallen in love with them both, and treats them like daughters.
So you see, though I passed for a ha'penny with the
Mimpson's
,
I turned out a sovereign to the Bellamys.
Pass the bottle!
MR. AND MRS. FOLLETT;
OR, THE DANGERS OF MEDDLING WITH MARRIED PEOPLE.
There
are two commodities, much used by gentlemen, neither
of which will bear tinkering or tampering withmatrimony and
patent leather. Their necessities are fair weather and untroubled
wear and tear. Ponder on the following melancholy example!
My friend Follett married a lady, contrary to my advice. I
gave the advice contrary to my wont and against my will. He
would have it. The lady was a tolerably pretty woman, on
whose original destiny it was never written that she should be a
belle. How she became one is not much matter; but nature
being thoroughly taken by surprise with her success, had
neglected
to provide the counterpoise. I say it is no great matter
how she became a bellenor is itfor, if such things were to be
accounted for to the satisfaction of the sex, the world have little
time for other speculations; but I will devote a single paragraph
to the elucidation of this one of many mysteries, for a reason
I have.
Fnam habet in cornu
.
Poets are the least fastidious, and the least discriminating of
men, in their admiration of women (
vide Byron
), partly because
their imagination, like sunshine, glorifies all that turns to it,
without
which they were not poets, is both indolent and imperial,
from both causes waiting always
to be sought
. In some circles,
bards are rather comets than stars, and the one whose orbit for a
few days intersected that of Miss Adele Burham, was the
exclusive
marvel of the hour. Like other poets, the one of which I
speak was concentrative in his attentions, and he chose (
why
, the
gods knew better than the belles of the season) to have neither
eyes nor ears, flowers, flatteries, nor verses, for any other than
Miss Burnham. He went on his way, but the incense, in which
he had enveloped the blest Adele, lingered like a magic
atmosphere
about her, and Tom Follett and all his tribe breathed it in
blind adoration. I trust the fair reader has here nodded her
head, in evidence that this history of the belleship of Miss
Burnham is no less brief than natural and satisfactory.
When Follett came to me with the astounding information that
he intended to propose to Miss Burnham (he had already
proposed
and been accepted, the traitor!) my fancy at once took
the prophetic stride so natural on the first breaking of such news,
and, in the five minutes which I took for reflection, I had travelled
far into that land of few delusionsholy matrimony. Before me,
in all the changeful variety of a magic mirror, came and went
the many phases of which that multiform creature, woman, is
susceptible. I saw her in diamonds and satin, and in
kitchen-apron
and curl-papers; in delight, and in the dumps; in
supplication
,
and in resistance; shod like a fairy in French shoes, and
slip-shod (as perhaps fairies are, too, in their bed-rooms and
dairies). I saw her approaching the climacteric of age, and
receding from ita mother, a nurse, an invalidmum over her
breakfast, chatty over her teadoing the honors at Tom's table,
and mending, with sober diligence, Tom's straps and suspenders.
The kaleidoscope of fancy exhausted its combinations.
Tom! said I (looking up affectionately, for he was one of
my weaknesses, was Tom, and I indulged myself in loving him
without a reason), Miss Burnham is in the best light where she
is. If she cease to be a belle, as of course she will, should she
marry
Of course! interrupted Tom, very gravely.
Well, in that case, she lays off the goddess, trust me! You
will like her to dress plainly
Quite plain!
And, stripped of her plumage, your bird of Paradise would be
nothing but a very indifferent henwith the disadvantage of
remembering that she had been a bird of Paradise.
But it was not her dress that attracted the brilliant author
of
Possibly not. But, as the false gods of mythology are only
known by their insignia, Jupiter by his thunderbolt, and Mercury
by his talaria and caduceus, so a woman, worshipped by accident,
will find a change of exterior nothing less than a laying aside of
her divinity. That's didactic sentence, but you will know what
I mean, when I tell you that I, myself, cannot see a pair of coral
ear-rings without a sickness of the heart, though the woman who
once wore them, and who slighted me twenty years ago, sits before
me in church, without diverting a thought from the sermon.
Don't marry her, Tom!
Six weeks after this conversation, I was at the wedding, and
the reader will please pass to the rear the six succeeding months
short time as it seemsto record a change in the bland sky of
matrimony. It was an ellipse in our friendship as well; for advice
(contrary to our wishes and intentions) is apt to be resented, and
I fancied, from the northerly bows I received from Mrs. Follett,
that my friend had made a merit to her of having married
contrary
to my counsel. At the end of this period Tom called
on me.
Follett, I should have said, was a man of that undecided
exterior
which is perfectly at the mercy of a cravat or waistcoat.
He looked snob or nob, according to the care with which
he had made his toilet. While a bachelor, of course, he could
never afford, in public, a negligence or a mistake, and was
invariably
an elegant man, harmonious and pin-point from straps
to whiskers. But alas! the security of wedded life! When
Tom entered my room, I perused him as a walking homily. His
coat, still made on the old measure, was buttoned only at the top,
the waist being rather snug, and his waistcoat pockets loaded with
the copper which in his gayer days he always left on the counter.
His satin cravat was frayed and brownish, with the tie slipped
almost under his ear. The heel of his right boot (he trod
straight on the other foot) almost looked him in the face. His
pantaloons (the one article of dress in which there are no
gradations
nothing,
if not perfect) were bulged and strained. He
wore a frightfully new hat, no gloves, and carried a baggy brown
umbrella, which was, in itself, a most expressive portrait of
gone to seed. Tom entered with his usual uppish carriage,
and, through the how-d'ye-dos, and the getting into his chair,
carried off the old manner to a charm. In talking of the weather,
a moment after, his eye fell on his stumpy umbrella, which, with
an unconscious memory of an old affectation with his cane, he was
balancing on the toe of his boot, and the married look slid over
him like a mist. Down went his head between his shoulders,
and down went the corners of his mouthdown the inflation of
his chest like a collapsed balloon; and down, in its youth and
expression, it seemed to me, every muscle of his face. He had
assumed in a minute the style and countenance of a man ten
years older.
I smiled. How could I but smile!
Then you have heard of it! exclaimed Tom, suddenly
starting to his feet, and flushing purple to the roots of his hair.
Heard of what?
My look of surprise evidently took him aback; and, seating
himself again with confused apologies, Tom proceeded to make
a clean breast, on a subject which I had not anticipated.
It seemed that, far from moulting her feathers after marriage,
according to my prediction, Mrs. Follett clearly thought that she
had not yet strutted her hour, and, though everything Tom
could wish, behind the curtain, in society she had flaunted and
flirted, not merely with no diminution of zest from the
wedding-day
,
but, her husband was of opinion, with a ratio alarmingly
increasing. Her present alliance was with a certain Count
Hautenbas, the lion of the moment, and though doubtless one in
which vanity alone was active, Tom's sense of connubial
propriety
was at its last gasp. He could stand it no longer. He
wished my advice in the choice between two courses. Should he
call out the Frenchman, or should he take advantage of the law's
construction of moral insanity, and shut her up in a
mad-house
.
My advice had been of so little avail in the first instance, that
I shrank from troubling Tom with any more of it, and certainly
should have evaded it altogether, but for an experiment I wished
to make, as much for my own satisfaction as for the benefit of
that large class, the unhappy married.
Your wife is out every night, I suppose, Tom?
Every night when she has no party at home.
Do you go with her always?
I go
for
her usuallybut the truth is, that, since I married,
parties bore me, and after seeing my wife off, I commonly smoke
and snooze, or read, or run into Bob Thomas's and `talk horse,'
till I have just time to be in at the death.
And when you get there, you don't dance?
Not I, faith! I haven't danced since I was married!
But you used to be the best waltzer of the day.
Well, the music sometimes gets into my heels now, but,
when I remember I am married, the fit cools off. The deuce
take it! a married man shouldn't be seen whirling round the room
with a girl in his arms!
I presume that, were you still single, you would fancy your
chance to be as good for ladies' favors as any French count's
that ever came over?
Ehem! whyyes!
Tom pulled up his collar.
And if you had access to her society all day and all night,
and the Frenchman only an hour or two in the evening, any
given lady being the object, you would bet freely on your own
head?
I see your drift, said Tom, with a melancholy smile, but
it won't do!
No, indeedit is what
would
have done. You had at the
start a much better chance with your wife than Count Hautenbas;
but husbands and lovers are the `hare and the tortoise' of the
fable. We must resort now to other means. Will you
follow
my
advice, as well as
take
it, should I be willing again to burn my
fingers in your affairs?
The eagerness of Tom's protestations quite made the
amende
to
my mortified self-complacency, and I entered zealously into my
little plot for his happiness. At this moment I heartily wish I
had sent him and his affairs to the devil, and (lest I should forget
it at the close of this tale) I here caution all men, single and
double, against meddling or making, marring or mending, in
matrimonial matters. The alliteration may, perhaps, impress
this salutary counsel on the mind of the reader.
I passed the remainder of the day in repairing the damage of
Tom's person. I had his whiskers curled and trimmed even, (his
left whisker was an inch nearer his nose than the right), and his
teeth looked to by the dentist. I stood by, to be sure that there
was no carelessness in his selection of patent leathers, and, on his
assuring me that he was otherwise well provided, I suffered him to
go home to dress, engaging him to dine with me at seven.
He was punctual to the hour. By Jove I could scarce believe
it was the same man. The consciousness of being well dressed
seemed to have brightened his eyes and lips, as it certainly
changed altogether his address and movements. He had a narrow
escape of being handsome. After all, it is only a man of mark,
or an Apollo, who can well afford to neglect the outer man; and
a judicious negligence, or a judicious plainness, is probably worth
the attention of both the man of mark and the Apollo. Tom was
quite another order of creaturea butterfly that was just now a
wormand would have been treated with more consideration in
consequence, even by those least tolerant of the pomps and
vanities. We dined temperately, and I superseded the bottle by
a cup of strong green tea, at an early moment after the removal
of the cloth, determined to have Tom's wits in as full dress as his
person. Without being at all a brilliant man, he wasthe next
best thinga steady absorbent; and as most women are more
fond of giving than receiving in all things, but particularly in
conversation
,
I was not uneasy as to his power of making himself
agreeable. Nor was
he
, faith!
The ball of the night was at the house of an old friend of my
own, and Mr. and Mrs. Follett were but newly introduced to the
circle. I had the company very clearly in my eye, therefore,
while casting about for
dramatis person
, and fixing upon Mrs.
Beverly Fairlie, for the prominent character, I assured success,
though being very much in love with that coquettish widow
myself, I had occasion for some self-denial in the matter. Of
Mrs. Fairlie's weak points (on which it seemed necessary that I
should enlighten Tom), I had information not to be acquired short
of summering and wintering her, and, with my eye solely directed
to its effect upon Mrs. Follett, I put the clues into my friend's
hands in a long after-dinner conversation. As he seemed
impatient
to open the campaign, after getting these definite and
valuable instructions, I augured well for his success, and we
entered the ball-room in high spirits.
It was quite enough to say to the mischievous widow that
another woman was to be piqued by any attentions she might
choose to pay Mr. Follett. Having said thus much, and
presented
Tom, I sought out Mrs. Follett myself, with the double
purpose of breaking up the monopoly of Mons. Hautenbas, and of
directing her attention, should it be necessary, to the suavities
between Tom and the widow.
It was a superb ball, and the music, as Tom said, went to the
heels. The thing he did well was waltzing, and, after taking a
turn or two with Mrs. Fairlie, the
ruse
dame ran up to Mrs.
Follett with the most innocent air imaginable, and begged the
loan of her husband for the rest of the evening! I did not half
like the look of earnest with which she entered into the affair,
indeed, and there was little need of my taking much trouble to
enlighten Mrs. Follett; for a woman so surprised with a six
months' husband I never saw. They were so capitally matched,
Tom and the widow, in size, motion, style of waltzing, and all,
that not we only, but the whole party, were occupied with
observing
and admiring them. Mrs. Follett and I (for a secret
sympathy, somehow, drew us together, as the thing went on)
kept up a broken conversation, in which the Count was even less
interested than we; and after a few ineffectual attempts to draw
her into the tea-room, the Frenchman left us in pique, and we
gave ourselves up to the observation of the couple who (we
presumed) severally belonged to us. They carried on the war
famously, to be sure! Mrs. Fairlie was a woman who could do
as she liked, because she
would;
and she cared not a straw for
the very
prononc
demonstration of engrossing one man for all
the quadrilles, waltzes, and gallopades, beside going with him to
supper. Once or twice I tried to find an excuse for leaving Mrs.
Follett, to put in an oar for myself; but the little woman clung
to me as if she had not the courage to undertake another person's
amusement, and, new and sudden as the feeling must have been,
she was pale and wretched, with a jealousy more bitter, probably,
than mine. Tom never gave me a look after the first waltz; and
as to the widow, she played her part with rather more zeal than
we set down for her. I passed altogether an uncomfortable
night, for a gay one, and it was a great relief to me when Mrs.
Follett asked me to send Tom for the carriage.
Be so kind as to send a servant for it, said Follett, very
coolly, and say to Mrs. Follett, that I will join her at home.
I am going to sup, or rather breakfast, with Mrs. Beverly
Fairlie!
Here was a mess!
Shall I send the Count for your shawl? I asked, after giving
this message, and wishing to know whether she was this side of
pride in her unhappiness.
The little woman burst into tears.
I will sit in the cloak-room till my husband is ready, she
said; go to him, if you please, and implore him to come and
speak to me.
As I said before, I wished the whole plot to the devil. We
had achieved our object, it is trueand so did the man who
knocked the breath out of his friend's body, in killing a fly on his
back. Tom is now (this was years ago) a married flirt of some
celebrity, for, after coming out of the widow's hands with a three
months' education, he had quite forgot to be troubled about Mrs.
Follett; and, instead of neglecting his dress, which was his only
sin when I took him in hand, he now neglects his wife, who sees
him, as women are apt to see their husbands, through other
women's eyes. I presume they are doomed to quite as much
unhappiness as would have fallen to their lot, had I left them
alonehad Mrs. Follett ran away with the Frenchman, and had
Tom died a divorced sloven. But when I think that, beside
achieving little for them, I was the direct means of spoiling Mrs.
Beverly Fairlie for myself, I think I may write myself down as a
warning to
meddlers in matrimony
.
LADY RAVELGOLD.
CHAPTER I.
What would it pleasure me to have my throat cut
With diamonds? or to be smothered quick
With cassia, or be shot to death with pearls?
Duchess of Malfy
.
I've been i' the Indies twice, and seen strange things
But two honest women!
One
I read of once!
Rule a Wife
.
It
was what is called by people on the continent a London
day. A thin, grey mist drizzled down through the smoke which
darkened the long cavern of Fleet street; the sidewalks were
slippery and clammy; the drays slid from side to side on the
greasy pavement, creating a perpetual clamor among the lighter
carriages with which they came in contact; the porters wondered
that gemmen would carry their umbrellas up when there was
no rain, and the gentlemen wondered that porters should be
permitted
on the sidewalks; there were passengers in box-coats,
though it was the first of May, and beggars with bare breasts,
though it was chilly as November; the boys were looking
wistfully
into the hosier's windows who were generally at the
pastry-cook's
;
and there were persons who wished to know the time,
trying in vain to see the dial of St. Paul's through the gamboge
atmosphere.
It was twelve o'clock, and a plain chariot, with a simple crest
on the panels, slowly picked its way through the choked and
disputed
thoroughfare east of Temple Bar. The smart glazed hat
of the coachman, the well-fitted drab greatcoat and gaiters of the
footman, and the sort of half-submissive, half-contemptuous look
on both their faces (implying that they were bound to drive to the
devil if it were miladi's orders, but that the rabble of Fleet
street was a
leetle
too vulgar for their contact), expressed very
plainly that the lady within was a denizen of a more privileged
quarter, but had chosen a rainy day for some compulsory visit to
the city.
At the rate of perhaps a mile an hour, the well-groomed
night-horses
(a pair of smart, hardy, twelve-mile cabs, all bottom, but
little style, kept for night-work and forced journeys) had threaded
the tortuous entrails of London, and had arrived at the arch of a
dark court in Throgmorton street. The coachman put his
wheels snug against the edge of the sidewalk, to avoid being
crushed by the passing drays, and settled his many-caped
benjamin
about him; while the footman spread his umbrella, and
making a balustrade of his arm for his mistress's assistance, a
closely-veiled lady descended, and disappeared up the wet and
ill-paved
avenue.
The green-baize door of Firkins and Co. opened on its silent
hinges and admitted the mysterious visiter, who, inquiring of the
nearest clerk if the junior partner were in, was shown to a small
inner room containing a desk, two chairs, a coal fire, and a young
gentleman. The last article of furniture rose on the lady's
entrance, and, as she threw off her veil, he made a low bow, with
the air of a gentleman who is neither surprised nor embarrassed,
and, pushing aside the door-check, they were left alone.
There was that forced complaisance in the lady's manner, on
her first entrance, which produced the slightest possible elevation
of a very scornful lip owned by the junior partner; but the lady was
only forty-five, highborn, and very handsome, and, as she looked
at the fine specimen of nature's nobility, who met her with a look
as proud and yet as gentle as her own, the smoke of Fleet street
passed away from her memory, and she became natural and even
gracious. The effect upon the junior partner was simply that of
removing from his breast the shade of her first impression.
I have brought you, said his visiter, drawing a card from
her reticule, an invitatlon to the Duchess of Hautaigle's ball.
She sent me half a dozen to fill up for what she calls `
ornamentals'
and
I am sure I shall scarce find another who comes so
decidedly under her Grace's category.
The fair speaker had delivered this pretty speech in the
sweetest and best-bred tone of St. James's, looking the while at
the toe of the small
brodequin
which she held up to the fire
perhaps
thinking only of drying it. As she concluded her
sentence
,
she turned to her companion for an answer, and was
surprised
at the impassive politeness of his bow of acknowledgment.
I regret that I shall not be able to avail myself of your
ladyship's
kindness, said the junior partner, in the same
well-enunciated
tone of courtesy.
Then, replied the lady with a smile, Lord Augustus
Fitz-Moi, who looks at himself all dinner-time in a spoon, will be
the Apollo of the hour. What a pity such a handsome creature
should be so vain!By-the-way, Mr. Firkins, you live without
a looking-glass, I see.
Your ladyship reminds me that this is merely a place of
business. May I ask at once what errand has procured me the
honor of a visit on so unpleasant a day?
A slight flush brightened the cheek and forehead of the
beautiful
woman, as she compressed her lips, and forced herself to say
with affected ease, The want of five hundred pounds.
The junior partner paused an instant, while the lady tapped
with her boot upon the fender in ill-dissembled anxiety, and then,
turning to his desk, he filled up the check without remark,
presented
it, and took his hat to wait on her to the carriage. A
gleam of relief and pleasure shot over her countenance as she
closed her small jewelled hand over it, followed immediately by a
look of embarrassed inquiry into the face of the unquestioning
banker.
I am in your debt already.
Thirty thousand pounds, madam!
And for this you think the securities on the estate of
Rockland
Are worth nothing, madam! But it rains. I regret that
your ladyship's carriage cannot come to the door. In the
old-fashioned
days of sedan-chairs, now, the dark courts of Lothbury
must have been more attractive. By-the-way, talking of
Lothbury
,
there is Lady Roseberry's
fte champtre
next week. If
you should chance to have a spare card
Twenty, if you likeI am too happyreally, Mr.
Firkins
It's on the fifteenth; I shall have the honor of seeing your
ladyship there! Good-morning! Home, coachman!
Does this man love me? was Lady Ravelgold's first thought,
as she sank back in her returning chariot. Yet no! he was
even rude in his haste to be rid of me. And I would willingly
have stayed too, for there is something about him of a mark that
I like. Ay, and he must have seen ita lighter encouragement
has been interpreted more readily. Five hundred pounds!
really five hundred pounds! And thirty thousand at the back of
it! What does he mean? Heavens! if he should be deeper
than I thought! If he should wish to involve me first!
And spite of the horror with which the thought was met in the
mind of Lady Ravelgold, the blush over her forehead died away
into a half smile and a brighter tint in her lips; and, as the
carriage
wound slowly on through the confused press of Fleet street
and the Strand, the image of the handsome and haughty young
banker shut her eyes from all sounds without, and she was at her
own door in Grosvenor square before she had changed position,
or wandered half a moment from the subject of those busy
dreams.
CHAPTER II.
The
morning of the fifteenth of May seemed to have been
appointed
by all the flowers as a jubilee of perfume and bloom.
The birds had been invited, and sang in the summer with a
welcome
as full-throated as a prima donna singing down the tenor in
a duet; the most laggard buds turned out their hearts to the
sunshine
,
and promised leaves on the morrow; and that portion of
London that had been invited to Lady Roseberry's fte, thought
it a very fine day! That portion which was not, wondered how
people would go sweltering about in such a glare for a cold
dinner!
At about half past two, a very elegant dark-green cab without
a crest, and with a servant in whose slight figure and plain blue
livery there was not a fault, whirled out at the gate of the
Regent's Park, and took its way up the well-watered road leading
to Hampstead. The gentlemen whom it passed or met turned to
admire the performance of the dark-grey horse, and the ladies
looked after the cab as if they could see the handsome occupant
once more through its leather back. Whether by conspiracy
among the coach-makers, or by an aristocracy of taste, the
degree of elegance, in a turn-out attained by the cab just
described
,
is usually confined to the acquaintances of Lady ;
that list being understood to enumerate all the nice young
men of the West End, beside the guardsmen. (The
ton
of the
latter, in all matters that affect the style of the regiment, is
looked after by the club and the colonel.) The junior Firkins
seemed an exception to this exclusive rule. No nice man
could come from Lothbury, and he did not visit Lady ; but
his horse was faultless, and when he turned into the gate of
Rose-Eden
,
the policeman at the porter's lodge, though he did not
know him, thought it unnecessary to ask for his name. Away he
spattered up the hilly avenue, and, giving the reins to his groom
at the end of a green arbor leading to the reception-lawn, he
walked in and made his bow to Lady Roseberry, who remarked,
How very handsome! Who can he be?and the junior
partner walked on and disappeared down an avenue of
laburnums
.
Ah! but Rose-Eden looked a Paradise that day! Hundreds
had passed across the close-shaven lawn, with a bow to the
lady-mistress
of this fair abode. Yet the grounds were still private
enough for Milton's pair, so lost were they in the green labyrinths
of hill and dale. Some had descended through heavily-shaded
paths to a fancy-dairy, built over a fountain in the bottom of a
cool dell; and here, amid her milk-pans of old and costly china,
the prettiest maid in the country round pattered about upon a
floor of Dutch tiles, and served her visitors with creams and ices
already, as it were, adapted to fashionable comprehension.
Some had strayed to the ornamental cottages in the skirts of the
flower-gardenpoetical abodes, built from a picturesque drawing,
with imitation roughness; thatch, lattice-window, and low paling,
all complete, and inhabited by superannuated dependents of Lord
Roseberry, whose only duties were to look like patriarchs, and
give tea and new cream-cheese to visitors on fte-days. Some
had gone to see the silver and gold pheasants in their
wire-houses
,
stately aristocrats of the game tribe, who carry their
finely-pencilled feathers like Marmalet Madarus, strutting in
hoop and farthingale. Some had gone to the kennels, to see
setters and pointers, hounds and terriers, lodged like gentlemen,
each breed in its own apartmentthe puppies, as elsewhere,
treated with most attention. Some were in the flower-garden,
some in the green-houses, some in the graperies, aviaries, and
grottoes; and, at the side of a bright sparkling fountain, in the
recesses of a fir-grove, with her foot upon its marble lip, and one
hand on the shoulder of a small Cupid who archly made a
drinking-cup of his wing, and caught the bright water as it fell,
stood Lady Imogen Ravelgold, the loveliest girl of nineteen that
prayed night and morning within the parish of May Fair,
listening
to very passionate language from the young banker of
Lothbury.
A bugle on the lawn rang a recall. From every alley, and by
every path, poured in the gay multitude, and the smooth sward
looked like a plateau of animated flowers, waked by magic from a
broidery on green velvet. Ah! the beautiful
demi-toilettes!
so
difficult to attain, yet, when attained, the dress most modest,
most captivating, most worthy the divine grace of woman. Those
airy hats, sheltering from the sun, yet not enviously concealing a
feature or a ringlet that a painter would draw for his
exhibition-picture
!
Those summery and shapeless robes, covering the
person more to show its outline better, and provoke more the
worship, which, like all worship, is made more adoring by
mystery
!
Those complexions which but betray their transparency
in the sun; lips in which the blood is translucent when between
you and the light; cheeks finer-grained than alabaster, yet as cool
in their virgin purity as a tint in the dark corner of a Ruysdel:
the human race was at less perfection in Athens in the days of
Laisin Egypt in the days of Cleopatrathan that day on the
lawn of Rose-Eden.
Cart-loads of ribands, of every gay color, had been laced
through the trees in all directions; and amid every variety of
foliage, and every shade of green, the tulip-tints shone vivid and
brilliant, like an American forest after the first frost. From the
left edge of the lawn, the ground suddenly sunk into a dell, shaped
like an amphitheatre, with a level platform at its bottom, and all
around, above and below, thickened a shady wood. The music of
a delicious band stole up from the recesses of a grove, draped in
an orchestra and green-room on the lower side, and, while the
audience disposed themselves in the shade of the upper grove, a
company of players and dancing-girls commenced their theatricals.
Imogen Ravelgold, who was separated, by a pine tree only,
from the junior partner, could scarce tell you, when it was
finished, what was the plot of the play.
The recall-bugle sounded again, and the band wound away
from the lawn, playing a gay march. Followed Lady Roseberry
and her suite of gentlemen, followed dames and their daughters,
followed all who wished to see the flight of my lord's falcons. By
a narrow path and a wicket-gate, the long music-guided train
stole out upon an open hill-side, looking down on a verdant and
spreading meadow. The band played at a short distance behind
the gay groups of spectators, and it was a pretty picture to look
down upon the splendidly-dressed falconer and his men, holding
their fierce birds upon their wrists, in their hoods and jesses, a
foreground of old chivalry and romance; while far beyond
extended
,
like a sea over the horizon, the smoke-clad pinnacles of
busy and every-day London. There are such contrasts for the
rich!
The scarlet hood was taken from the trustiest falcon, and a dove,
confined, at first, with a string, was thrown up and brought back to
excite his attention. As he fixed his eyes upon him, the frightened
victim was let loose, and the falcon flung off; away skimmed the
dove in a low flight over the meadow, and up to the very zenith
in circles of amazing swiftness and power, sped the exulting falcon,
apparently forgetful of his prey, and bound for the eye of the sun
with his strong wings and his liberty. The falconer's whistle
and cry were heard; the dove circled round the edge of the
meadow
in his wavy flight; and down, with the speed of lightning,
shot the falcon, striking his prey dead to the earth before the
eye could settle on his form. As the proud bird stood upon
his victim, looking around with a lifted crest and fierce eye, Lady
Imogen Ravelgold heard, in a voice of which her heart knew
the music, They who soar highest strike surest; the dove lies
in the falcon's bosom.
CHAPTER III.
The
afternoon had, meantime, been wearing on, and at six the
breakfast was announced. The tents beneath which the
tables were spread were in different parts of the grounds, and the
guests had made up their own parties. Each sped to his
rendezvous
,
and, as the last loiterers disappeared from the lawn, a
gentleman
in a claret coat, and a brown study, found himself stopping
to let a lady pass who was obeying the summons as tardily as
himself. In a white chip hat, Hairbault's last, a few lilies of the
valley laid among the raven curls beneath, a simple white robe,
the
chef-d'uvre
of Victorine in style and
tournure
, Lady
Ravelgold
would have been the belle of the fte, but for her daughter.
Well emerged from Lothbury! she said, courtseying, with
a slight flush over her features, but immediately taking his arm;
I have lost my party, and meeting you is opportune. Where
shall we breakfast?
There was a small tent standing invitingly open, on the
opposide
of the lawn, and, by the fainter rattle of soup-spoons from
that quarter, it promised to be less crowded than the others. The
junior partner would willingly have declined the proffered honor,
but he saw at glance that there was no escape, and submitted
with a grace.
You know very few people here, said his fair creditor,
taking the bread from her napkin.
Your ladyship and one other.
Ah, we shall have dancing by-and-by, and I must introduce
you to my daughter. By the way, have you no name from your
mother's side? `Firkins' sounds so very odd. Give me some
prettier word to drink in this champagne.
What do you think of Tremlet?
Too effeminate for your severe style of beautybut it will
do. Mr. Tremlet, your health! Will you give me a little of the
pat
before you? Pray, if it is not indiscreet, how comes that
classic profile, and, more surprising still, that distinguished look
of yours, to have found no gayer destiny than the signing of
`Firkins and Co.' to notes of hand? Though I thought you
became your den in Lothbury, upon my honor you look more at
home here.
And Lady Ravelgold fixed her superb eyes upon the beautiful
features of her companion, wondering partly why he did not
speak, and partly why she had not observed before that he was
incomparibly the handsomest creature she had ever seen.
I can regret no vocation, he answered after a moment,
which procures me an acquaintance with your ladyship's
family.
There is an
arrire pense
in that formal speech, Mr.
Tremlet
.
You are insincere. I am the only one in my family whom
you know, and what pleasure have you taken in my
acquaintance
/
And, now I think of it, there is a mystery about you,
which, but for the noble truth written so legibly on your features,
I should be afraid to fathom. Why have you suffered me to
over-draw my credit so enormously, and without a shadow of a
protest?
When Lady Ravelgold had disburdened her heart of this direct
6
question, she turned half round and looked her companion in the
face, with an intense interest which produced amid her own
features
an expression of earnestness very uncommon upon their pale
and impassive lines. She was one of those persons of little
thought, who care nothing for causes or consequences, so that the
present difficulty is removed, or the present hour provided with
its wings; but the repeated relief she had received from the
young banker, when total ruin would have been the consequence
of his refusal, and his marked coldness in his manner to her, had
stimulated the utmost curiosity of which she was capable. Her
vanity, founded upon her high rank and great renown as a beauty,
would have agreed that he might be willing to get her into his
power at that price, had he been less agreeable in his own person,
or more eager in his manner. But she had wanted money
sufficiently
to know, that thirty thousand pounds are not a bagatelle,
and her brain was busy till she discovered the equivalent he
sought for it. Meantime her fear that he would turn out to be a
lover, grew rapidly into a fear that he would not.
Lady Ravelgold had been the wife of a dissolute Earl, who had
died, leaving his estate inextricably involved. With no male
heir to the title or property, and no very near relation, the
beautiful
widow shut her eyes to the difficulties by which she was
surrounded, and, at the first decent moment after the death of her
lord, she had re-entered the gay society of which she had been the
bright and particular star, and never dreamed either of diminishing
her establishment, or calculating her possible income. The first
heavy draft she had made upon the house of Firkins and Co., her
husband's bankers, had been returned with a statement of the
Ravelgold debt and credit on their books, by which it appeared
that Lord Ravelgold had overdrawn four or five thousand pounds
before his death, and that, from some legal difficulties, nothing
could be realized from the securities given on his estates. This
bad news arrived on the morning of a fte to be given by the
Russian ambassador, at which her only child, Lady Imogen, was
to make her
dbut
in society. With the facility of disposition
which was peculiar to her, Lady Ravelgold thrust the papers into
her drawer, and, determining to visit her banker on the following
morning, threw the matter entirely from her mind and made
preparations
for the ball. With the Russian government the house
of Firkins and Co. had long carried on very extensive fiscal
transactions
,
and, in obedience to instructions from the Emperor, regular
invitations for the embassy ftes were sent to the bankers,
accepted
occasionally by the junior partner only, who was generally
supposed to be a natural son of old Firkins. Out of the
banking-house
he was known as Mr. Tremlet, and it was by this name,
which was presumed to be his mother's, that he was casually
introduced to Lady Imogen on the night of the fte, while she
was separated from her mother in the dancing-room. The
consequence
was a sudden, deep, ineffaceable passion in the bosom of
the young banker, checked and silenced, but never lessened or
chilled by the recollection of the obstacle of his birth. The
impression
of his subdued manner, his worshipping, yet most
respectful
tones, and the bright soul that breathed through his handsome
features with his unusual excitement, was, to say the least,
favorable
upon Lady Imogen, and they parted on the night of the fte,
mutually aware of each other's preference.
On the following morning Lady Ravelgold made her promised
visit to the city, and, inquiring for Mr. Firkins, was shown in as
usual to the junior partner, to whom the colloquial business of the
concern had long been intrusted. To her surprise she found no
difficulty in obtaining the sum of money which had been refused
her on the preceding daya result which she attributed to her
powers of persuasion, or to some new turn in the affairs of the
estate; and for two years these visits had been repeated, at
intervals
of three or four months, with the same success, though not
with the same delusion as to the cause. She had discovered that
the estate was worse than nothing, and the junior partner cared
little to prolong his
tte--ttes
with her, and, up to the visit with
which this tale opened, she had looked to every succeeding one
with increased fear and doubt.
During these two years, Tremlet had seen Lady Imogen
occasionally
at balls and public places, and every look they exchanged
wove more strongly between them the subtle threads of love.
Once or twice she had endeavored to interest her mother in
conversation
on the subject, with the intention of making a confidence
of her feelings; but Lady Ravelgold, when not anxious, was
giddy with her own success, and the unfamiliar name never rested
a moment on her ear. With this explanation to render the tale
intelligible, let us, as the French say, return to our
muttons.
Of the conversation between Tremlet and her mother, Lady
Imogen was an unobserved and astonished witness. The tent
which they had entered was large, with a
buffet
in the centre, and
a circular table waited on by servants within the ring; and, just
concealed by the drapery around the pole, sat Lady Imogen with
a party of her friends, discussing very seriously the threatened
fashion of tight sleeves. She had half risen, when her mother
entered, to offer her a seat by her side, but the sight of Tremlet,
who immediately followed, had checked the words upon her lip,
and, to her surprise, they seated themselves on the side that was
wholly unoccupied, and conversed in a tone inaudible to all but
themselves. Not aware that her lover knew Lady Ravelgold, she
supposed that they might have been casually introduced, till the
earnestness of her mother's manner, and a certain ease between
them in the little courtesies of the table, assured her that this
could not be their first interview. Tremlet's face was turned
from her, and she could not judge whether he was equally
interested; but she had been so accustomed to consider her
mother as irresistible when she chose to please, that she supposed
it, of course; and very soon the heightened color of Lady
Ravelgold
,
and the unwavering look of mingled admiration and
curiosity which she bent upon the handsome face of her
companion
,
left no doubt in her mind that her reserved and exclusive
lover was in the dangerous toils of a rival whose power she knew.
From the mortal pangs of a first jealousy, Heaven send thee
deliverance, fair Lady Imogen!
We shall find our account in the advances on your ladyship's
credit; said Tremlet, in reply to the direct question that was put
to him. Meantime permit me to admire the courage with
which you look so disagreeable a subject in the face.
For `disagreeable subject,' read `Mr. Tremlet.' I show my
temerity more in that.
Apropos
of faces, yours would become
the new fashion of cravat. The men at Crockford's slip the ends
through a ring of their lady-love's, if they chance to have one
thus! and untying the loose knot of his black satin cravat, Lady
Ravelgold slipped over the ends a diamond of small value,
conspicuously
set in pearls.
The men at Crockford's, said Tremlet, hesitating to
commit
the rudeness of removing the ring, are not of my school of
manners. If I had been so fortunate as to inspire a lady with a
preference for me, I should not advertise it on my cravat.
But suppose the lady were proud of her preference, as
dames were of the devotion of their knights in the days of
chivalrywould you not wear her favor as conspicuously as
they?
A flush of mingled embarrassment and surprise shot over the
forehead of Tremlet, and he was turning the ring with his fingers,
when Lady Imogen, attempting to pass out of the tent, was
stopped by her mother.
Imogen, my daughter! this is Mr. Tremlet. Lady Imogen
Ravelgold, Mr. Tremlet!
The cold and scarce perceptible bow which the wounded girl
gave to her lover betrayed no previous acquaintance to the
careless Lady Ravelgold. Without giving a second thought to
her daughter, she held her glass for some champagne to a passing
servant, and, as Lady Imogen and her friends crossed the lawn to
the dancing-tent, she resumed the conversation which they had
interrupted; while Tremlet, with his heart brooding on the
altered look he had received, listened and replied almost
unconsciously
;
yet, from this very circumstance, in a manner which was
interpreted by his companion as the embarrassment of a timid
and long-repressed passion for herself.
While Lady Ravelgold and the junior partner were thus
playing
at cross purposes over their champagne and
bons-bons
, Grisi
and Lablache were singing a duet from
I Puritani
, to a full
audience in the saloon; the drinking young men sat over their
wine at the nearly-deserted tables; Lady Imogen and her friends
waltzed to Collinet's band, and the artizans were busy below the
lawn, erecting the machinery for the fireworks. Meantime every
alley and avenue, grot and labyrinth, had been dimly illuminated
with colored lamps, showing like vari-colored glow-worms amid
the foliage and shells; and, if the bright scenery of Rose-Eden
had been lovely by day, it was fay-land and witchery by night.
Fatal impulse of our nature, that these approaches to Paradise in
the daylight of the eye, stir only in our bosoms the passions
upon which law and holy writ have put ban and bridle!
Shall we stroll down this alley of crimson lamps? said Lady
Ravegold, crossing the lawn from the tent where their coffee had
been brought to them, and putting her slender arm far into that
of her now pale and silent companion.
A lady in a white dress stood at the entrance of that crimson
avenue, as Tremlet and his passionate admirer disappeared
beneath the closing lines of the long perspective, and, remaining
a moment gazing through the unbroken twinkle of the confusing
lamps, she pressed her hand hard upon her forehead, drew up her
form as if struggling with some irrepressible feeling, and in
another moment was whirling in the waltz with Lord Ernest
Fitzantelope, whose mother wrote a complimentary paragraph
about their performance for the next Saturday's Court Journal.
The bugle sounded, and the band played a march upon the
lawn. From the breakfast tents, from the coffee-rooms, from the
dance, from the card-tables, poured all who wished to witness the
marvels that disagreeable in saltpetre. Gentlemen who stood in a tender
attitude in the darkness, held themselves ready to lean the other
way when the rockets blazed up, and mammas who were
encouraging
flirtations with eligibles, whispered a caution on the same
subject to their less experienced daughters.
Up sped the missiles, round spun the wheels, fair burned the
pagodas, swift flew the fire-doves off and back again on their
wires, and softly floated down through the dewy atmosphere of
that May night the lambent and many-colored stars, flung burning
from the exploded rockets. Device followed device, and Lady
Imogen almost forgot, in her child's delight at the spectacle, that
she had taken into her bosom a green serpent, whose folds were
closing like suffocation about her heart.
The
finale
was to consist of a new light, invented by the
pyro-technist
,
promised to Lady Roseberry to be several degrees
brighter than the suncomparatively with the quantity of
matter
.
Before this last flourish came a pause; and, while all the
world were murmuring love and applause around her, Lady
Imogen
,
with her eyes fixed on an indefinite point in the darkness,
took advantage of the cessation of light to feed her serpent with
thoughts of passionate and uncontrollable pain. A French
attach
,
Phillipiste to the very tips of his mustache, addressed to her
ear, meantime, the compliments he had found most effective in
the
Chausse d' Antin
.
The light burst suddenly from a hundred blazing points, clear,
dazzling, intenseilluminating, as by the instantaneous burst of
day, the farthest corner of Rose-Eden. And Monsieur
Mangepoire
,
with a French contempt for English fireworks, took
advantage
of the first ray to look into Lady Imogen's eyes.
Mais Miladi!
was his immediate exclamation, after
following
their direction with a glance,
ce n'est qu'un tableau
vivant, cela!
Help, gentlemen!
Elle s'vanuit
. Some salts!
Misericorde! Mon Dieu! Mon Dieu!
And Lady Imogen
Ravelgold was carried fainting to Lady Roseberry's chamber.
In a small opening at the end of a long avenue of lilacs,
extended
from the lawn in the direction of Lady Imogen's fixed and
unconscious gaze, was presented, by the unexpected illumination,
the
tableau vivant
, seen by her ladyship and Monsieur
Mangepoire
at the same instanta gentleman drawn up to his fullest
height, with his arms folded, and a lady kneeling on the ground
at his feet with her arms stretched up to his bosom.
CHAPTER IV.
A little
after two o'clock on the following Wednesday,
Tremlet's cabriolet stopped near the
perron
of Willis's rooms in
King street, and while he sent up his card to the lady patronesses
for his ticket to that night's Almack's, he busied himself in
looking
into the crowd of carriages about him, and reading on the
faces of their fair occupants the hope and anxiety to which they
were a prey till John the footman brought them tickets or despair.
Drawn up on the opposite side of the street, stood a family-carriage
of the old style, covered with half the arms of the herald's office,
and containing a fat dowager and three very over-dressed
daughters
.
Watching them, to see the effect of their application, stood
upon the sidewalk three or four young men from the neighboring
club-house, and at the moment Tremlet was observing these
circumstances
,
a foreign britska, containing a beautiful woman, of a
reputation better understood than expressed in the conclave above
stairs, flew round the corner of St. James's street, and very nearly
drove into the open mouth of the junior partner's cabriolet.
I will bet you a Ukraine colt against this fine bay of yours,
said the Russian secretary of legation, advancing from the group
of dandies to Tremlet, that miladi, yonder, with all the best
blood of England in her own and her daughters' red faces, gets
no tickets this morning.
6*
I'll take a bet upon the lady who has nearly extinguished
me, if you like, answered Tremlet, gazing with admiration at
the calm, delicate, child-like looking creature, who sat before him
in the britska.
No! said the secretary, for Almack's is a republic of
beauty, and she'll be voted in without either blood or virtue.
Par exmple
, Lady Ravelgold's voucher is good here, though she
does study
tableaux
in Lothburyeh, Tremlet?
Totally unaware of the unlucky discovery by the fireworks at
Lady Roseberry's fte, Tremlet colored and was inclined to take
the insinuation as an affront; but a laugh from the dandies drew
off his companion's attention, and he observed the dowager's
footman
standing at her coach window with his empty hands held up
in most expressive negation, while the three young ladies within
sat aghast, in all the agonies of disappointed hopes. The
lumbering
carriage got into motionits ineffective blazonry paled by
the mortified blush of its occupantsand, as the junior partner
drove away, philosophizing on the arbitrary opinions and
unprovoked
insults of polite society, the britska shot by, showing him,
as he leaned forward, a lovely woman who bent on him the most
dangerous eyes in London, and an Almack's ticket lying on the
unoccupied cushion beside her.
The white
relievo
upon the pale blue wall of Almack's showed
every crack in its stucco flowers, and the faded chaperons who
had defects of a similar description to conceal, took warning of the
walls, and retreated to the friendlier dimness of the tea-room.
Collinet was beginning the second set of quadrilles, and among
the fairest of the surpassingly beautiful women who were moving
to his heavenly music, was Lady Imogen Ravelgold, the lovelier
to-night for the first heavy sadness that had ever dimmed the
roses in her cheek. Her lady-mother divided her thoughts
between
what this could mean, and whether Mr. Tremlet would
come to the ball; and when, presently after, in the
dos-a-dos
,
she forgot to look at her daughter, on seeing that gentleman enter,
she lost a very good opportunity for a guess at the cause of Lady
Imogen's paleness.
To the pure and true eye that appreciates the divinity of the
form after which woman is made, it would have been a glorious
feast to have seen the perfection of shape, color, motion, and
countenance, shown that night on the bright floor of Almack's.
For the young and beautiful girls whose envied destiny is to
commence
their woman's history in this exclusive hall, there exists aids
to beauty known to no other class or nation. Perpetual vigilance
over every limb from the cradle up; physical education of a
perfection
,
discipline, and judgment, pursued only at great expense
and under great responsibility; moral education of the highest
kind, habitual consciousness of rank, exclusive contact with
elegance
and luxury, and a freedom of intellectual culture which
breathes a soul through the face before passion has touched it with
a line or a shadethese are some of the circumstances which make
Almack's the eynosure of the world for adorable and radiant
beauty.
There were three ladies who had come to Almack's with a
definite object that night, each of whom was destined to be
surprised
and foiled: Lady Ravelgold, who feared that she had been
abrupt with the inexperienced banker, but trusted to find him
softened by a day or two's reflection; Mrs. St. Leger, the lady of
the britska, who had ordered supper for two on her arrival at
home from her morning's drive, and intended to have the
company
of the handsome creature she had nearly run over in King
street; and Lady Imogen Ravelgold, as will appear in the
sequel.
Tremlet stood in the entrance from the tea-room, a moment,
gathering courage to walk alone into such a dazzling scene, and
then, having caught a glimpse of the glossy lines of Lady Imogen's
head at the farthest end of the room, he was advancing toward
her, when he was addressed by a lady who leaned against one of
the slender columns of the orchestra. After a sweetly-phrased
apology for having nearly knocked out his brains that morning
with her horses' fore feet, Mrs. St. Leger took his arm, and
walking deliberately two or three times up and down the room,
took possession, at last, of a
banquette
on the highest range, so far
from any other person, that it would have been a marked
rudeness
to have left her alone. Tremlet took his seat by her with
this instinctive feeling, trusting that some of her acquaintances
would soon approach, and give him a fair excuse to leave her;
but he soon became amused with her piquant style of
conversation
,
and, not aware of being observed, fell into the attitude of
a pleased and earnest listener.
Lady Ravelgold's feelings during this
petit entretien
, were of a
very positive description. She had an instinctive knowledge, and
consequently a jealous dislike of Mrs. St. Leger's character;
and, still under the delusion that the young banker's liberality
was prompted by a secret passion for herself, she saw her credit
in the city and her hold upon the affections of Tremlet, (for whom
she had really conceived a violent affection,) melting away in
every smile of the dangerous woman who engrossed him. As she
looked around for a friend, to whose ear she might communicate
some of the suffocating poison in her own heart, Lady Imogen
returned to her from a gallopade; and, like a second dagger into
the heart of the pure-minded girl, went this second proof of her
lover's corrupt principle and conduct. Unwilling to believe even
her own eyes, on the night of Lady Roseberry's fte, she had
summoned
resolution on the road home to ask an explanation of her
mother. Embarrassed by the abrupt question, Lady Ravelgold
felt obliged to make a partial confidence of the state of her
pecuniary
affairs; and, to clear herself, she represented Tremlet as
having taken advantage of her obligations to him, to push a
dishonorable
suit. The scene disclosed by the sudden blaze of the
fireworks being thus simply explained, Lady Imogen determined
at once to give up Tremlet's acquaintance altogether; a
resolution
which his open flirtation with a woman of Mrs. St. Leger's
character served to confirm. She had, however, one errand with
him, prompted by her filial feelings, and favored by an accidental
circumstance which will appear.
Do you believe in animal magnetism? asked Mrs. St.
Leger, for by the fixedness of Lady Ravelgold's eyes in this
quarter, something is going to happen to one of us.
The next moment the Russian secretary approached and took
his seat by Mrs. St. Leger, and with diplomatic address contrived
to convey to Tremlet's ear that Lady Ravelgold wished to speak
with him. The banker rose, but the quick wit of his
companion
comprehended the manuvre.
Ah! I see how it is, she said, but stayyou'll sup with
me to-night. Promise me
parole d'honneur!
Parole!
answered Tremlet, making his way out between
the seats, half pleased and half embarrassed.
As for you,
Monsieur le Secretaire
,' said Mrs. St. Leger,
you have forfeited my favor, and may sup elsewere. How dare
you conspire against me?
While the Russian was making his peace, Tremlet crossed over
to Lady Ravelgold; but, astonished at the change in Lady
Imogen, he soon broke in abruptly upon her mother's
conversation
,
to ask her to dance. She accepted his hand for a
quadrille
;
but as they walked down the room in search of a
vis--vis
,
she complained of heat, and asked timidly if he would take her to
the tea-room.
Mr. Tremlet, she said, fixing her eyes upon the cup of tea
which he had given her, and which she found some difficulty in
holding, I have come here to-night to communicate to you
some important information, to ask a favor, and to break off an
acquaintance which has lasted too long.
Lady Imogen stopped, for the blood had fled from her lips, and
she was compelled to ask his arm for a support. She drew
herself
up to her fullest height the next moment, looked at Tremlet,
who stood in speechless astonishment, and with a strong effort,
commenced again in a low, firm tone
I have been acquainted with you some time, sir, and have
never inquired, nor knew more than your name, up to this day.
I suffered myself to be pleased too blindly
Dear Lady Imogen!
Stay a moment, sir! I will proceed directly to my business.
I received this morning a letter from the senior partner of a
mercantile
house in the city, with which you are connected. It is
written on the supposition that I have some interest in you, and
informs me that you are not, as you yourself suppose, the son of
the gentleman who writes the letter.
Madam!
That gentleman, sir, as you know, never was married. He
informs me, that, in the course of many financial visits to St.
Petersburgh, he formed a friendship with Count Manteuffel, then
minister of finance to the emperor, whose tragical end, in
consequence
of his extensive defalcations, is well known. In brief, sir,
you were his child, and were taken by this English banker, and
carefully educated as his own, in happy ignorance, as he imagined,
of your father's misfortunes and mournful death.
Tremlet leaned against the wall, unable to reply to this
astounding intelligence, and Lady Imogen went on.
Your title and estates have been restored to you at the
request of your kind benefactor, and you are now the heir to a
princely fortune, and a count of the Russian empire. Here is
the letter, sir, which is of no value to me now. Mr. Tremlet!
one word more, sir.
Lady Imogen gasped for breath.
In return, sir, for much interest given you heretoforein
return, sir, for this information
Speak, dear Lady Imogen!
Spare my mother!
Mrs. St. Leger's carriage stops the way! shouted a servant
at that moment, at the top of the stairs; and, as if there were a
spell in the sound to nerve her resolution anew, Lady Imogen
Ravelgold shook the tears from her eyes, bowed coldly to Tremlet,
and passed out into the dressing-room.
If you please, sir, said a servant, approaching the amazed
banker, Mrs. St. Leger waits for you in her carriage.
Will you come home and sup with us? said Lady
Ravelgold
at the same instant, joining him in the tea-room.
I shall be only too happy, Lady Ravelgold.
The bold coachman of Mrs. St. Leger continued to stop the
way, spite of policemen and infuriated footmen, for some fifteen
minutes. At the end of that time Mr. Tremlet appeared,
handing down Lady Ravelgold and her daughter, who walked to
their chariot, which was a few steps behind; and very much to
Mrs. St. Leger's astonishment, the handsome banker sprang past
her horses' heads a minute after, jumped into his cabriolet, which
stood on the opposite side of the street, and drove after the
vanishing chariot as if his life depended on overtaking it. Still
Mrs. St. Leger's carriage stopped the way. But, in a few
minutes after, the same footman who had summoned Tremlet in
vain, returned with the Russian secretary, doomed in blessed
unconsciousness
to play the
pis aller
at her
tte--tte
supper in
Spring Gardens.
CHAPTER V.
If
Lady Ravelgold showed beautiful by the uncompromising
light and in the ornamental hall of Almack's, she was radiant as
she came through the mirror door of her own love-contrived and
beauty-breathing boudoir. Tremlet had been shown into this
recess
of luxury and elegance on his arrival, and Lady Ravelgold
and her daughter, who preceded her by a minute or two, had
gone to their chambers, the first to make some slight changes in
her toilet, and the latter (entirely ignorant of her lover's presence
in the house), to be alone with a heart never before in such painful
need of self-abandonment and solitude.
Tremlet looked about him in the enchanted room in which he
found himself alone, and, spite of the prepossessed agitation of his
feelings, the voluptuous beauty of every object had the effect to
divert and tranquillize him. The light was profuse, but it came
softened through the thinnest alabaster; and, while every object
in the room was distinctly and minutely visible, the effect of
moonlight was not more soft and dreamy. The general form of
the boudoir was an oval, but, within the pilasters of folded silk
with their cornices of gold, lay crypts containing copies,
exquisitely
done in marble, of the most graceful statues of antiquity,
one of which scemed, by the curtain drawn quite aside and a
small antique lamp burning near it, to be the divinity of the
placethe Greek Antinous, with his drooped head and full,
smooth limbs, the most passionate and life-like representation of
voluptuous beauty that intoxicates the slumberous air of Italy.
Opposite this, another niche contained a few books, whose
retreating
shelves swung on a secret door, and, as it stood half open, the
nodding head of a snowy magnolia leaned through, as if pouring
from the lips of its broad chalice the mingled odors of the unseen
conservatory it betrayed. The first sketch in crayons of a
portrait
of Lady Ravelgold by young Lawrence, stood against the
wall, with the frame half buried in a satin ottoman; and, as
Tremlet stood before it, admiring the clear, classic outline of the
head and bust, and wondering in what chamber of his brain the
gifted artist had found the beautiful drapery in which he had
drawn her, the dim light glanced faintly on the left, and the
broad mirror by which he had entered swung again on its silver
hinges, and admitted the very presentment of what he gazed on.
Lady Ravelgold had removed the jewels from her hair, and the
robe of wrought lace, which she had worn that night over a
boddice
of white satin laced loosely below the bosom. In the place
of this she had thrown upon her shoulders a flowing wrapper of
purple velvet, made open after the Persian fashion, with a short
and large sleeve, and embroidered richly with gold upon the
skirts. Her admirable figure, gracefully defined by the satin
petticoat and boddice, showed against the gorgeous purple as it
flowed back in her advancing motion, with a relief which would
have waked the very soul of Titian; her complexion was dazzling
and faultless in the flattering light of her own rooms; and there
are those who will read this who know how the circumstances
which surround a womanluxury, elegance, taste, or the
opposite
of theseenhance or dim, beyond help or calculation, even
the highest order of woman's beauty.
Lady Ravelgold held a bracelet in her hand as she came in.
In my own house, she said, holding the glittering jewel to
Tremlet, I have a fancy for the style antique. Tasseline, my
maid, has gone to bed, and you must do the devoirs of a knight,
or an abigail, and loop up this Tyrian sleeve. Stayfirst look
at the modelthat small statue of Cytheris, yonder! Not the
shoulderfor you are to swear mine is prettierbut the clasp.
Fasten it like that. So! Now take me for a Grecian nymph
the rest of the evening.
Lady Ravelgold!
Hermione or Agle, if you please! But let us ring for
supper!
As the bell sounded, a superb South American trulian darted in
from the conservatory, and, spreading his gorgeous black and gold
wings a moment over the alabaster shoulder of Lady Ravelgold, as
if he took a pleasure in prolonging the first touch as he alighted,
turned his large liquid eye fiercely on Tremlet.
Thus it is, said Lady Ravelgold, we forget our old
favorites in our new. See how jealous he is!
Supper is served, miladi! said a servant entering.
A hand to each, then, for the present, she said, putting one
into Tremlet's, and holding up the trulian with the other. He
who behaves best shall drink first with me.
I beg your ladyship's pardon, said Tremlet, drawing back,
and looking at the servant, who immediately left the room. Let
us understand each other! Does Lady Imogen sup with us
to-night
?
Lady Imogen has retired, said her mother in some surprise.
Then, madam, will you be seated one moment and listen to
me?
Lady Ravelgold sat down on the nearest ottoman, with the air
of a person too high bred to be taken by surprise, but the color
deepened to crimson in the centre of her cheek, and the bird on
her hand betrayed by one of his gurgling notes that he was held
more tightly than pleased him. With a calm and decisive tone,
Tremlet went through the explanation given in the previous parts
of this narration. He declared his love for Lady Imogen, his
hopes (while he had doubts of his birth) that Lady Ravelgold's
increasing obligations and embarrassments and his own wealth
might weigh against his disadvantages; and now, his honorable
descent being established, and his rank entitling him to propose
for her hand, he called upon Lady Ravelgold to redeem her
obligations
to him by an immediate explanation to her daughter of
his conduct toward herself, and by lending her whole influence to
the success of his suit.
Five minutes are brief time to change a lover into a
son-in-law
;
and Lady Ravegold, as we have seen in the course of this
story, was no philosopher. She buried her face in her hands,
and sat silent, for a while, after Tremlet had concluded: but the
case was a very clear one. Ruin and mortification were in one
scale, mortification and prosperity in the other. She rose, pale
but decided, and requesting Monsieur le Comte Manteuffel to
await her a few minutes, ascended to her daughter's chamber.
If you please, sir, said a servant, entering in about half an
hour, miladi and Lady Imogen beg that you will join them in
the supper-room.
CHAPTER VI.
The
spirit of beauty, if it haunt in such artificial atmospheres
as Belgrave square, might have been pleased to sit invisibly on
the vacant side of Lady Ravelgold's table. Tremlet had been
shown in by the servant to a small apartment, built like a
belvidere
over the garden, half boudoir in its character, yet intended
as a supper-room, and, at the long window (opening forth upon
descending terraces laden with flowers, and just now flooded with
the light of a glorious moon) stood Lady Imogen, with her glossy
head laid against the casement, and the palm of her left hand
pressed close upon her heart. If those two lightsthe moon
faintly shed off from the divine curve of her temple, and the
stained rose-lamp pouring its mellow tint full on the heavenly
shape and whiteness of her shoulder and neckif those two
lights, I say, could have been skilfully managed, Mr. Lawrence!
what a picture you might have made of Lady Imogen Ravelgold!
Imogen, my daughter! Mr. Tremlet! said her mother as
he entered.
Without changing her position, she gave him the hand she had
been pressing on her heart.
Mr. Tremlet! said Lady Ravelgold, evidently entering into
her daughter's embarrassment, trouble yourself to come to the
table and give me a bit of this pheasant. Imogen, George waits
to give you some champagne.
Can you forgive me? said the beautiful girl, before turning
to betray her blushing cheek and suffused eyes to her mother.
Tremlet stopped as if to pluck a leaf from the verbena at her
feet, and passed his lips over the slight fingers he held.
Pretty trulian! murmured Lady Ravelgold to her bird, as
he stood on the edge of her champagne-glass, and curving his
superb neck nearly double, contrived to drink from the sparkling
brimpretty trulian! you will be merry after this! What
ancient Sybarite, think you, Mr. Tremlet, inhabits the body of
this bright bird? Look up,
mignon
, and tell us if you were
Hylas or Alcibiades! Is the pheasant good, Mr. Tremlet?
Too good to come from Hades, miladi. Is it true that you
have your table supplied from Crockford's?
Tout bonnement!
I make it a principle to avoid all great
anxieties, and I can trust nobody but Ude. He sends my
dinners
quite hot, and, if there is a particular dish of game, he drives
round at the hour and gives it the last turn in my own kitchen.
I should die to be responsible for my dinners. I don't know how
people get on that have no
grand artiste
. Pray, Mr. Tremlet
(I beg pardonMonsieur le Comte, perhaps I should say?)
No, no, I implore you! `Tremlet' has been spoken too
musically to be so soon forgotten. Tremlet or Charles, which
you will!
Lady Ravelgold put her hand in his, and looked from his face
to her daughter's with a smile, which assured him that she had
obtained a victory over herself. Shrinking immediately,
however
,
from anything like sentiment (with the nervous dread of
pathos so peculiar to the English), she threw off her trulian, that
made a circle and alighted on the emerald bracelet of Lady
Imogen
,
and rang the bell for coffce.
I flatter myself, Mr. Tremlet, she said, that I have made
a new application of the homopathic philosophy. Hahnemann,
they say, cures fevers by aggravating the disease; and when I
cannot sleep, I drink coffee.
J'en suis passablement fiere!
You
did not know I was a philosopher?
No, indeed!
Well, take some of this spiced mocha. I got it of the
Turkish ambassador, to whom I made
beaux yeux
on purpose.
Stop! you shall have it in the little tinsel cups he sent me.
George, bring those filagree things! Now, Mr. Tremlet, imagine
yourself in the
serail du Bosphore
Imogen and I two lovely
Circassians
,
par example!
Is it not delicious? Talking of
Bosphorus
,
nobody was classical enough to understand the device in my
coiffure
to-night.
What was it? asked Tremlet, absently, gazing while he
spoke, with eyes of envy at the trulian, who was whetting his bill,
backward and forward, on the clear bright lips of Lady Imogen.
Do you think my profile Grecian? asked Lady Ravelgold.
Perfectly!
And my hair is coiffed
la Gree?
Most becomingly.
But still you won't see my golden grasshopper! Do you
happen to know, sir, that, to wear the golden grasshopper, was the
birthright of an Athenian? I saw it in a book. Well! I had to
explain it to everybody. By-the-way, what did that gambler,
George Heriot, mean, by telling me that its legs should be black?
`All
Greeks
have black legs,' said he, yawning in his stupid
way. What did he mean, Mr. Tremlet?
`Greeks' and blacklegs are convertible terms. He thought
you were more
au fait
of the slang dictionary. Will you permit
me to coax my beautiful rival from your hand, Lady Imogen?
She smiled, and put forward her wrist, with a bend of its
slender
and alabaster lines which would have drawn a sigh from
Praxiteles. The trulian glanced his fiery eyes from his
mistress's
face to Tremlet's, and, as the strange hand was put out to
take him from his emerald perch, he flew with the quickness of
lightning into the face of her lover, and buried the sharp beak in
his lip. The blood followed copiously, and Lady Imogen,
startled
from her timidity, sprang from her chair and pressed her
hands one after the other upon the wound, in passionate and
girlish
abandonment. Lady Ravelgold hurried to her
dressing-room
for something to staunch the wound, and, left alone with
the divine creature who hung over him, Tremlet drew her to
his bosom and pressed his cheek long and closely to hers, while to
his lips, as if to keep in life, clung her own crimsoned and
trembling
fingers.
Imogen! said Lady Ravelgold, entering, take him to the
fountain in the garden and wash the wound; then put on this
bit of gold-beater's skin. I will come to you when I have locked
up the trulian. Is it painful, Mr. Tremlet?
Tremlet could not trust his voice to answer, but, with his arm
still around Lady Imogen, he descended by the terrace of flowers
to the fountain.
They sat upon the edge of the marble basin, and the moonlight
striking through the jet of the fountain, descended upon them like
a rain of silver. Lady Imogen had recovered from her fright,
and buried her face in her hands, remembering into what her
feelings had betrayed her; and Tremlet, sometimes listening to
the clear bell-like music of the descending water, sometimes
uttering the broken sentences which are most eloquent in love, sat
out the hours till the stars began to pale, undisturbed by Lady
Ravelgold, who, on the upper stair of the terrace, read by a small
lamp, which, in the calm of that heavenly summer night, burned
unflickeringly in the open air.
It was broad daylight when Tremlet, on foot, sauntered slowly
past Hyde park corner on his way to the Albany. The lamps
were still struggling with the brightening approach to sunrise, the
cabmen and their horses slept on the stand by the Green Park,
and, with cheerful faces, the laborers went to their work, and with
haggard faces the night-birds of dissipation crept wearily home.
The well-ground dust lay in confused heel-marks on the sidewalk,
a little dampened by the night-dew; the atmosphere in the street
was clear, as it never is after the stir of day commences; a
dandy, stealing out from Crockford's, crossed Piccadilly, lifting
up his head to draw in long breaths of the cool air, after the
closeness
of over-lighted rooms and excitement; and Tremlet,
marking
none of these things, was making his way through a line of
carriages slowly drawing up to take off their wearied masters
from a prolonged fte at Devonshire house, when a rude hand
clapped him on the shoulder.
Monsieur Tremlet!
Ah, Baron! bien bon jour!
Bien rencontr, Monsieur!
You have insulted a lady
tonight
,
who has confided her cause to my hands. Madam St.
Leger, sir, is without a natural protector, and you have taken
advantage of her position to insult hergrossly, Mr. Tremlet,
grossly!
Tremlet looked at the Russian during this extraordinary
address
,
and saw that he was evidently excited with wine. He
drew him aside into Berkeley street, and in the calmest manner
attempted to explain what was not very clear to himself. He
had totally forgotten Mrs. St. Leger. The diplomat, though
quite beyond himself with his excitement, had sufficient
perception
left to see the weak point of his statement; and, infuriated
with the placid manner in which he attempted to excuse himself,
suddenly struck his glove into his face, and turned upon his heel.
They had been observed by a policeman, and, at the moment that
Tremlet, recovering from his astonishment, sprang forward to
resent the blow, the grey-coated guardian of the place laid his
hand upon his collar and detained him till the baron had
disappeared
.
More than once, on his way to the Albany, Tremlet surprised
himself forgetting both the baron and the insult, and feeding his
heart in delicious abandonment with the dreams of his new
happiness
.
He reached his rooms and threw himself on the bed,
forcing from his mind, with a strong effort, the presence of Lady
Imogen, and trying to look calmly on the unpleasant circumstance
before him. A quarrel, which, the day before, he would have
looked upon merely as an inconvenience, or which, under the
insult
of a blow, he would have eagerly sought, became now an
almost insupportable evil. When he reflected on the subject
of the disputea contention about a woman of doubtful
reputation
taking place in the same hour with a first avowal from the
7
delicate and pure Lady Imogenwhen he remembered the change
in his fortunes, which he had as yet scarcely found time to realize
on the consequences to her who was so newly dear to him, and
on all he might lose, now that life had become invaluablehis
thoughts were almost too painful to bear. How seldom do men
play with an equal stake in the game of taking life, and how
strange it is that equality of weapons is the only comparison made
necessary by the laws of honor!
Tremlet was not long the man to be undecided. He rose,
after an hour's reflection, and wrote as follows:
Baron
: Before taking the usual notice of the occurrence of
this morning, I wish to rectify one or two points in which our
position is false. I find myself, since last night, the accepted
lover of Lady Imogen Ravelgold, and the master of estates and
title as a Count of the Russian empire. Under the
etourdissement
of such sudden changes in feelings and fortune, perhaps my
forgetfulness
of the lady, in whose cause you are so interested,
admits
of indulgence. At any rate, I am so newly in love with
life, that I am willing to suppose, for an hour, that had you known
these circumstances, you would have taken a different view of the
offence in question. I shall remain at home till two, and it is in
your power till then to make me the reparation necessary to
my honor. Yours, etc.,
Tremlet
.
There was a bridal on the following Monday at St. George's
church, and the Russian secretary stood behind the bridegroom.
Lady Ravelgold had never been seen so pale, but her face was
clear of all painful feeling; and it was observed by one who knew
her well, that her beauty had acquired, during the brief
engagement
of her daughter, a singular and undefinable elevation. As
the carriages with their white favors turned into Bond street, on
their way back to Belgrave square, the cortge was checked by
the press of vehicles, and the Russian, who accompanied Lady
Ravelgold in her chariot, found himself opposite the open
britska
of a lady who fixed her glass full upon him without recognising a
feature of his face.
I am afraid you have affronted Mrs. St. Leger, Baron! said
Lady Ravelgold.
Or I should not have been here! said the Russian; and, as
they drove up Piccadilly, he had just time, between Bond street
and Milton Crescent, to tell her ladyship the foregone chapter of
this story.
The trulian, on that day, was fed with wedding-cake, and the
wound on Mr. Tremlet's lip was not cured by letting alone.
KATE CREDIFORD.
I found
myself looking with some interest at the back of a
lady's head. The theatre was crowded, and I had come in late,
and the object of my curiosity, whoever she might be, was
listening
very attentively to the play. She did not move. I had time
to build a life-time romance about her before I had seen a feature
of her face. But her ears were small and of an exquisite oval,
and she had that rarest beauty of womanthe hair arched and
joined to the white neck with the same finish as on the temples.
Nature often slights this part of her masterpiece.
The curtain dropped, and I stretched eagerly forward to catch
a glimpse of her profile. But no! she sat next one of the
slender
pilasters, and, with her head leaned against it, remained
immovable
.
I left the box, and with some difficulty made my way into the
crowded pit. Elbowing, apologizing, persevering, I at last
gained a point where I knew I could see my incognita at the
most advantage. I turnedpshaw!how was it possible I had
not recognized her?
Kate Crediford!
There was no getting out again, for a while at least, without
giving offence to the crowd I had jostled so unceremoniously. I
sat downvexedand commenced a desperate study of the
figure of Shakspeare on the drop-curtain.
Of course I had been a lover of Miss Crediford's, or I could
not have turned with indifference from the handsomest woman in
the theatre. She was very beautifulthere was no disputing.
But we love women a little for what we
do
know of them, and a
great deal more for what we
do not
. I had love-read Kate
Crediford
to the last leaf. We parted as easily as a reader and a
book. Flirtation is a circulating library, in which we seldom ask
twice for the same volume, and I gave up Kate to the next
reader, feeling no property even in the marks I had made in her
perusal. A little quarrel sufficed as an excuse for the closing of
the book, and both of us studiously avoided a reconciliation.
As I sat in the pit, I remembered suddenly a mole on her left
cheek, and I turned toward her with the simple curiosity to know
whether it was visible at that distance. Kate looked sad. She
still leaned immovable against the slight column, and her dark
eyes, it struck me, were moist. Her mouth, with this peculiar
expression upon her countenance, was certainly inexpressibly
sweetthe turned-down corners ending in dimples, which in that
particular place, I have always observed, are like wells of
unfathomable
melancholy. Poor Kate! what was the matter with
her?
As I turned back to my dull study of the curtain, a little
pettish
with myself for the interest with which I had looked at an
old flame, I detected half a sigh under my white waistcoat; but,
instantly persuading myself that it was a disposition to cough
coughedand began to hum
suoni la tromba
. The curtain
rose and the play went on.
It was odd that I never had seen Kate in that humor before.
I did not think she could be sad. Kate Crediford sad! Why,
she was the most volatile, light-hearted, care-for-nothing coquette
that ever held up her fingers to be kissed. I wonder, has any
one really annoyed you, my poor Kate! thought I. Could I, by
chance, be of any service to youfor, after all, I owe you
something
!
I looked at her again.
Strange that I had ever looked at that face without emotion!
The vigils of an ever-wakeful, ever-passionate, yet ever-tearful
and melancholy spirit, seemed set, and kept under those heavy
and motionless eyelids. And she, as I saw her now, was the very
model and semblance of the character that I had all my life been
vainly seeking! This was the creature I had sighed for, when
turning away from the too mirthful tenderness of Kate Crediford!
There was something new, or something for the moment
mis-written
,
in that familiar countenance.
I made my way out of the pit with some difficulty, and returned
to sit near her. After a few minutes, a gentleman in the next
box rose, and left the seat vacant on the other side of the pilaster
against which she leaned. I went around while the orchestra
were playing a loud march, and, without being observed by the
thoughtful beauty, seated myself in the vacant place.
Why did my eyes flush and moisten, as I looked upon the small
white hand lying on the cushioned barrier between us! I
knew every vein of it, like the strings of my own heart. I had
held it spread out in my own, and followed its delicate blue
traceries
with a rose-stem, for hours and hours, while imploring, and
reproaching, and reasoning over love's lights and shadows. I
knew the feel of every one of those exquisite fingersthose
rolled up rose-leaves, with nails like pieces cut from the lip of a
shell! Oh, the promises I had kissed into oaths on that little
chef-d'uvre
of nature's tinted alabaster! the psalms and
sermons
I had sat out, holding it, in her father's pew! the many a
moon I had tired out of the sky, making of it a bridge for our
hearts passing backward and forward! And how could that little
wretch of a hand, that knew me better than its own other hand
(for we had been more together), lie there, so unconscious of my
presence? How could sheKate Credifordsit next to me as
she was doing, with only a stuffed partition between us, and her
head leaning on one side of a pilaster, and mine on the other,
and never start, nor recognize, nor be at all aware of my
neighborhood
?
She was not playing a part, it was easy to see. Oh,
I knew those little relaxed fingers too well! Sadness, indolent
and luxurious sadness, was expressed in her countenance, and her
abstraction was unfeigned and contemplative. Could she have
so utterly forgotten memagnetically that is to say?Could the
atmosphere about her, that would once have trembled
betrayingly
at my approach, like the fanning of an angel's invisible
wing, have lost the sense of my presence
I tried to magnetize her hand. I fixed my eyes on that little
open palm, and with all the intensity I could summon, kissed it
mentally in its rosy centre. I reproached the ungrateful little
thing for its dulness and forgetfulness, and brought to bear upon
it a focus of old memories of pressures and caresses, to which a
stone would scarce have the heart to be insensible
But I belie myself in writing this with a smile. I watched those
unmoving fingers with a heart-ache. I could not see the face,
nor read the thought, of the woman who had once loved me, and
who sat near me, now, so unconsciouslybut, if a memory had
stirred, if a pulse had quickened its beat, those finely-strung
fingers, I well knew, would have trembled responsively. Had she
forgotten me altogether? Is that possible?
Can
a woman close
the leaves of her heart over a once-loved and deeply-written
name, like the waves over a vessel's tracklike the air over the
division of a bird's flight?
I had intended to speak presently to Miss Crediford, but every
moment the restraint became greater. I felt no more privileged
to speak to her than the stranger who had left the seat I
occupied
.
I drew back, for fear of encroaching on her room, or
disturbing
the folds of her shawl. I dared not speak to her. And,
while I was arguing the matter to myself, the party who were
with her, apparently tired of the play, arose and left the theatre,
Kate following last, but unspoken to, and unconscious altogether
of having been near any one whom she knew.
I went home and wrote to her all night, for there was no
sleeping
till I had given vent to this new fever at my heart. And, in
the morning I took the leading thoughts from my heap of
incoherent
scribblings, and embodied them more coolly in a letter:
You will think, when you look at the signature, that this is
to be the old story. And you will be as much mistaken as you
are in believing that I was ever your lover, till a few hours ago.
I have declared love to you, it is true. I have been happy with
you, and wretched without you; I have thought of you, dreamed
of you, haunted you, sworn to you, and devoted to you all and
more than you exacted, of time and outward service and
adoration
;
but I love you now for the first time in my life. Shall I
be so happy as to make you comprehend this startling
contradiction
?
There are many chambers in the heart, Kate; and the spirits
of some of us dwell, most fondly and secretly, in the chamber of
tearsavowedly, however, in the outer and ever-open chamber
of mirth. Over the sacred threshold, guarded by sadness, much
that we select and smile upon, and follow with adulation in the
common walks of life, never passes. We admire the gay. They
make our melancholy sweeter by contrast, when we retire within
ourselves. We pursue them. We take them to our heartsto
the outer vestibules of our heartsand, if they are gay only, they
are content with the unconsecrated tribute which we pay them
there. But the chamber within is, meantime, lonely. It aches
with its desolation. The echo of the mirthful admiration, without,
jars upon its mournful silence. It longs for love, but love toned
with its own sadnesslove that can penetrate deeper than smiles
ever camelove that, having once entered, can be locked in with
its key of melancholy, and brooded over with the long dream of a
life-time. But that deep-hidden and unseen chamber of the
heart may be long untenanted. And, meantime, the spirit
becomes
weary of mirth, and impatiently quenches the fire even
upon its outer altar, and, in the complete loneliness of a heart
that has no inmate or idol, gay or tearful, lives mechanically on.
Do you guess at my meaning, Kate?Do you remember the
merriment of our first meeting? Do you remember in what a frolie
of thoughtlessness you first permitted me to raise to my lips those
restless fingers? Do you remember the mock condescension, the
merry haughtiness, the rallying and feigned incredulity, with
which you first received my successive steps of vowing and
love-making
the
arch look when it was begun, the laugh when it was
7*
over, the untiring follies we kept up, after vows plighted, and the
future planned and sworn to? That you were in earnest, as
much as you were capable of being, I fully believe. You would
not else have been so prodigal of the sweet bestowings of a
maiden's tenderness. But how often have I left you, with the
feeling, that, in the hours I had passed with you, my spirit had
been alone! How often have I wondered if there were depths in
my heart, which love can never reach!how often mourned that,
in the procession of love, there was no place allotted for its
sweetest and dearest followerstears and silence! Oh, Kate!
sweet as was that sun-gleam of early passion, I did not love you!
I tired of your smiles, waiting in vain for your sadness. I left
you, and thought of you no more?
And now(and you will be surprised to know that I have
been so near to you unperceived)I have drank an intoxication
from one glance into your eyes, which throws open to you every
door of my heart, subdues to your control every nerve and
feeling
of my existence. Last night, I sat an hour, tracing again the
transparent and well-remembered veins upon your hand, and oh!
how the language written in those branching and mystic lines had
changed in meaning and power.You were sad. I saw you from
a distance, and, with amazement at an expression upon your face
which I had never before seen. I came and sat near you. It
was the look I had longed for when I knew you, and when tired of
your mirth. It was the look I had searched the world for,
combined
with such beauty as yours. It was a look of tender and
passionate melancholy, which revealed to me an unsuspected
chamber in your hearta chamber of tears. Ah, why were you
never sad before? Why have we lostwhy have I lost the
eternity's worth of sweet hours, when you loved me with that
concealed
treasure in your bosom?Alas! that angels must walk the
world, unrecognised, till too late! Alas, that I have held in my
arms, and pressed to my lips, and loosed again with trifling and
weariness, the creature whom it was my life's errand, the
thirst and passionate longing of my nature, to find and worship!
Oh, Heaven! with what new value do I now number over
your adorable graces of person! How spiritualized is every
familiar feature, once so deplorably misappreciated!How
compulsive
of respectful adoration is that flexible waist, that step of
aerial lightness, that swan-like motion, which I once dared to
praise, triflingly and half-mockingly, like the tints of a flower or
the chance beauty of a bird! And those bright lips! How did
I ever look on them, and
not know
, that, within their rosy portal,
slept, voiceless for a while, the controlling spell of my destiny
the tearful spirit followed and called in my dreams, with perpetual
longing? Strange value given to features and outward
loveliness
by qualities within? Strange witchery of sadness in a
woman! Oh, there is, in mirth and folly, dear Kate, no air for
love's breathingstill less of food for constancy, or of holiness to
consecrate and heighten beauty of person.
What can I say else, except implore to be permitted to
approach
youto offer my life to youto begin, thus late, after
being known so long, the worship which till death is your due?
Pardon me if I have written abruptly and wildly. I shall await
your answer in an agony of expectation. I do not willingly
breathe till I see youtill I weep at your feet over my blindness
and forgetfulness. Adieu! but let it not be for long, I pray
you!
I despatched this letter, and it would be difficult to embody in
language the agony I suffered in waiting for a reply. I walked
my room, that endless morning, with a death-pang in every step
so fearful was Iso prophetically fearfulthat I had forfeited for
ever the heart I had once flung from me.
It was noon when a letter arrived. It was in a hand-writing
new to me. But it was on the subject which possessed my
existence
,
and it was of final import. It follows:
Dear Sir
: My wife wishes me to write to you, and inform
you of her marriage, which took place a week or two since, and of
which she presumes you are not aware. She remarked to me,
that you thought her looking unhappy last evening, when you
chanced to see her at the play. As she seemed to regret not
being able to answer your note herself, I may perhaps convey the
proper apology by taking upon myself to mention to you, that, in
consequence of eating an imprudent quantity of unripe fruit, she
felt ill before going to the theatre, and was obliged to leave early.
To day she seems seriously indisposed. I trust she will be well
enough to see you in a day or twoand remain,
Yours, truly,
Samuel Smithers
.
But I never called on Mrs. Samuel Smithers
FLIRTATION AND FOX-CHASING.
The only heart that I have known of late, has been an easy, exciteable sort of
gentleman, quickly roused and quickly calmedsensitive enough to confer a great
deal of pleasure, and not sensitive enough to give a moment's pain. The heart of
other days was a very different person indeed.
Bulwer
.
I was
moping one day in solitary confinement in quarantine at
Malta, when, in a turn between my stone window and the back
wall, I saw the yards of a vessel suddenly cross the light, and
heard the next moment the rattle of a chain let go, and all the
bustle of a merchantman coming to anchor. I had the privilege
of promenading between two ring-bolts on the wharf below the
lazaretto, and, with the attraction of a new-comer to the sleepy
company of vessels under the yellow flag, I lost no time in
descending the stone stairs, and was immediately joined by my
vigilant sentinel, the
guardiano
, whose business it was to prevent
my contact with the other visitors to the wharf. The
tricolor
flew at the peak of the stranger, and we easily made out that she
was a merchantman from Marseilles, subject therefore to a week's
quarantine on account of the cholera. I had myself come from a
plague port, Smyrna, and was subjected to twenty days'
quarantine
,
six of which had passed; so that the Frenchman, though but
beginning his imprisonment, was in a position comparatively
enviable.
I had watched for an hour the getting of the vessel into
mooring
trim, and was beginning to conclude that she had come
without passengers, when a gentleman made his appearance on
deek, and the jolly-boat was immediately lowered and manned.
A traveller's baggage was handed over the side, the gentleman
took leave of the captain, and, in obedience to directions from the
quarantine officer on the quarterdeck, the boat was pulled directly
to the wharf on which I stood. The
guardiano
gave me a
a caution to retire a little, as the stranger was coming to take
possession of the next apartment to my own, and must land at
the stairs near by; but, before I had taken two steps backward, I
began to recognise features familiar to me, and, with a turn of the
head as he sprang on the wharf, the identity was established
completely
.
Tom Berryman, by all that was wonderful! I had not
seen him since we were suspended from college together, ten years
before. Forgetting
lazaretto
and
guardiano
, and all the salt
water between New Haven and Malta, I rushed up to Tom with
the cordiality of other days, (a little sharpened by abstinence from
society,) and we still had hold of hands with a firm grip, when
the quarantine master gravely accosted us, and informed my
friend that he had incurred an additional week by touching me
in short, that he must partake of the remainder of my
quarantine
.
Aghast and chap-fallen as Berryman was, at the consequences
of our rencontre, (for he had fully calculated on getting into Malta
in time for the carnival,) he was somewhat reconciled to his lot
by being permitted to share my room and table instead of living
his week in solitude; and, by enriching our supplies a little from
town, sleeping much, and chatting through the day in the rich
sunshine of that climate of Paradise, we contrived to shove off
the fortnight without any very intolerable tedium.
My friend and I had begun our travels differentlyhe taking
England first, which I proposed visiting last. It is of course the
bonne bouche
of travel to everybody, and I was very curious to
know Tom's experiences; and, as I was soon bound thitherward,
anxious to pick out of his descriptions some chart of the rocks
and shoals in the British channel of society.
I should say, before quoting my friend, that he was a
Kentuckian
,
with the manner (to ladies) of mingled devotion and
nonchalance so popular with the sex, and a chivalric quality of
man altogether. His father's political influence had obtained for
him personal letters of introduction from the President, and, with
this advantage, and his natural air of fashion, he had found no
obstacle to choosing his society in England; choosing the first, of
course, like a true republican!
We were sitting on the water-steps with our feet immersed up
to the ankles, (in January too,) and in reply to some question of
mine as to the approachability of noble ladies by such plebeian
lovers as himself, Tom told me the story which follows. I take
the names at random, of course, but in all else, I shall try to
tell the tale as 'twas told to me.
Why, circumstances, as you know, sometimes put people in the
attitude of lovers, whether they will or no; and it is but civil in
such a case, to do what fate expects of you. I knew too much of
the difference between crockery and porcelain to enter English
society with the remotest idea of making love within the red book
of the peerage, and though I've a story to tell, I swear I never
put a foot forward till I thought it was knightly devoir; inevitable,
though ever so ridiculous. Still, I must say, with a beautiful
and unreserved woman beside one, very much like other
beautiful
and unreserved woman, a republican might be pardoned for
forgetting the invisible wall.
Right
Honorable loveliness has
as much attraction about it, let me tell you, and is quite as
difficult
to resist, as loveliness that is honored, right or wrong; and a
man must be brought up to it, as Englishmen are, to see the
heraldric dragons and griffins in the air when a charming girl is
talking to him.
Why should a man whose blood is warm within,
Sit like (
her
) grandsire cut in alabaster?
Eh? But to begin with the
Tityre tu patul
.
I had been passing a fortnight at the hunting lodge of that wild
devil, Lord , in the Scotch Highlands, and, what with being
freely wet outside every day, and freely wet inside every night, I
had given my principle of life rather a disgust to its lodgings, and
there were some symptoms of preparation for leave-taking.
Unwilling
to be ill in a bachelor's den, with no solace tenderer than
a dandy lord's tiger, I made a twilight flit to the nearest
post-town
,
and, tightening my life-screws a little with the aid of the
village apothecary, started southward the next morning with four
posters.
I expected to be obliged to pull up at Edinboro', but the
doctor's opiates, and abstinence and quiet, did more for me than
I had hoped, and I went on very comfortably to Carlisle. I
arrived at this place after nightfall, and found the taverns
overflowing
with the crowds of a Fair, and no bed to be had unless I
could make one in a quartette of snoring graziers. At the same
time there was a great political meeting at Edinboro', and every
leg of a poster had gone norththose I had brought with me
having been trans-hitched to a return chaise, and gone off while I
was looking for accommodations.
Regularly stranded, I sat down by the tap-room fire, and was
mourning my disaster, when the horn of the night-coach reached
my ear, and, in the minute of its rattling up to the door, I hastily
resolved that it was the least of two evils, and booked myself
accordingly
.
There was but one vacant place, an outsider! With
hardly time enough to resolve, and none to repent, I was
presently
rolling over the dark road, chilled to the bone in the first
five minutes, and wet through with a Scotch mist in the next
half hour. Somewhere about daybreak we rolled into the little
town of , five miles from the seat of the Earl of Tresethen,
to whose hospitalities I stood invited, and I went to bed in a most
comfortable inn and slept till noon.
Before going to bed I had written a note to be despatched to
Tresethen castle, and the Earl's carriage was waiting for me
when I awoke. I found myself better than I had expected, and
dressing at once for dinner, managed to reach the castle just in
time to hand in Lady Tresethen. Of that dinner I but remember
that I was the only guest, and that the Earl regretted his
daughter's absence from table, Lady Caroline having been
thrown that morning from her horse. I fainted somewhere about
the second remove, and recovered my wits some days after, on
the safe side of the crisis of a fever.
I shall never forget that first half hour of conscious curiosity.
An exquisite sense of bodily repose, mingled with a vague notion
of recent relief from pain, made me afraid to speak lest I should
awake from a dream, yet, if not a dream, what a delicious
reality! A lady of most noble presence, in a half-mourning dress,
sat by the side of a cheerful fire, turning her large dark eyes on
me, in the pauses of a conversation with a grey-headed servant.
My bed was of the most sumptuous luxury; the chamber was
hung with pictures and draped with spotless white; the table
covered with the costliest elegancies of the toilet; and, in the
gentle and deferential manner of the old liveried menial, and the
subdued tones of inquiry by the lady, there was a refinement and
tenderness which, with the keen susceptibility of my senses, lapt
me in Elysium. I was long in remembering where I was. The
lady glided from the room, the old servant resumed his seat by
my bedside, other servants in the same livery came softly in
on errands of service, and, at the striking of the half hour by a
clock on the mantlepiece, the lady returned, and I was raised to
receive something from her hand. As she came nearer, I
remembered
the Countess Tresethen.
Three days after this I was permitted to take the air of a
conservatory
which opened from the Countess's boudoir. My old
attendant assisted me to dress, and, with another servant, took
me down in a
fautcuil
. I was in slippers and robe-de-chambre,
and presumed that I should see no one except the kind and noble
Lady Tresethen, but I had scarce taken one turn up the long
alley of flowering plants, when the Coutness came toward me from
the glass door beyond, and on her arm a girl leaned for support,
whose beauty
(Here Tem dabbled his feet for some minutes in the water in
silence.)
God bless me! I can never give you an idea of it! It was a
new revelation of woman to me; the opening of an eighth seal.
In the minute occupied by her approach, my imagination
(accelerated, as that faculty always is, by the clairvoyance of
sickness), had gone through a whole drama of lovefear,
adoration
,
desperation, and rejectionand, so complete was it, that in
after moments, when these phases of passion came round in the
proper lapse of days and weeks, it seemed to me that I had been
through with them before; that it was all familiar; that I had
met and loved, in some other world, this same glorious creature,
with the same looks, words, and heart-ache; in the same
conservatory
of bright flowers, and, faith! myself in the same pattern
of a brocade dressing-gown!
Heavens! what a beautiful girl was that Lady Caroline! Her
eyes were of a light grey, the rim of the lids perfectly inky with
the darkness of the long sweeping lashes, and in her brown hair
there was a gold lustre that seemed somehow to illuminate the
curves of her small head like a halo. Her mouth had too much
character for a perfectly agreeable first impression. It was
nobility
and sweetness educated over native high spirit and
scornfulness
the
nature shining through the transparent blood, like a flaw
through enamel. She would have been, in other circumstances,
a maid of Saragossa or a Gertrude Von Wart; a heroine;
perhaps
a devil. But her fascination was resistless!
My daughter, said Lady Tresethen (and in that beginning
was all the introduction she thought necessary), is, like yourself,
an invalid just escaped from the doctor; you must congratulate
each other. Are you strong enough to lend her an arm, Mr.
Berryman?
The Countess left us, and, with the composure of a sister who
had seen me every day of my life, Lady Caroline took my arm
and strolled slowly to and fro, questioning me of my shooting at
the lodge, and talking to me of her late accident, her eyes
sometimes
fixed upon her little embroidered slippers, as they peeped
from her snowy morning dress, and sometimes indolently raised
and brought to bear on my flushed cheek and trembling lips; her
singular serenity operating upon me as anything but a sedative!
I was taken up stairs again, after an hour's conversation, in a fair
way for a relapse, and the doctor put me under embargo again for
another week, which, spite of all the renewed care and
tenderness
of Lady Tresethen, seemed to me an eternity! I'll not
bother you with what I felt and thought all that time!
It was a brilliant autumnal day when I got leave to make my
second exodus, and with the doctor's permission I prepared for a
short walk in the park. I declined the convoy of the old servant,
for I had heard Lady Caroline's horse gallop away down the
avenue, and I wished to watch her return unobserved. I had just
lost sight of the castle in the first bend of the path, when I saw
her quietly walking her horse under the trees at a short distance,
and, the moment after, she observed and came toward me at an
easy canter. I had schooled myself to a little more
self-possession
,
but I was not prepared for such an apparition of splendid
beauty as that woman on horseback. She rode an Arabian bay
of the finest blood; a lofty, fiery, matchless creature, with an
expression
of eye and nostril which I could not but think a proper
pendant
to her own, limbed as I had seldom seen a horse, and his
arched neck, and forehead, altogether, proud as a steed for
Lucifer. She sat on him as if it were a throne she was born to,
and the flow of her riding-dress seemed as much a part of him as
his mane. He appeared ready to bound into the air, like Pegasus,
but one hand calmly stroked his mane, and her face was as
tranquil
as marble.
Well met! she said; I was just wishing for a cavalier.
What sort of a horse would you like, Mr. Berryman? Ellis!
(speaking to her groom), is old Curtal taken up from grass?
Yes, miladi!
Curtal is our invalid horse, and, as you are not very strong,
perhaps his easy pace will be best for you. Bring him out
directly, Ellis. We'll just walk along the road a little way; for
I must show you my Arabian; and we'll not go back to ask
mamma's permission, for we shouldn't get it! You won't mind
riding a little way, will you?
Of course I would have bestrided a hippogriff at her bidding,
and when the groom came out, leading a thorough-bred hunter,
with apparently a very elastic and gentle action, I forgot the
doctor and mounted with great alacrity. We walked our horses
slowly down the avenue and out at the castle gate, followed by
the groom, and, after trying a little quicker pace on the public
road, I pronounced old Curtal worthy of her ladyship's eulogium,
and her own Saladin worthy, if horse could be worthy, of his
burthen.
We had ridden perhaps a mile, and Lady Caroline was giving
me a slight history of the wonderful feats of the old veteran under
me, when the sound of a horn made both horses prick up their
ears, and, on rising a little acclivity, we caught sight of a pack of
hounds coming across the fields directly towards us, followed by
some twenty red-coated horsemen. Old Curtal trembled and
showed a disposition to fret, and I observed that Lady Caroline
dexterously lengthened her own stirrup and loosened the belt of
her riding-dress, and the next minute the hounds were over the
hedge, and the horsemen, leap after leap, after them, and with
every successive jump, my own steed reared and plunged
unmanageably
.
Indeed
, I cannot stand this! cried Lady Caroline, gathering
up her reins, Ellis! see Mr. Berryman home! and away went
the flying Arabian over the hedge with a vault that left me
breathless
with astonishment. One minute I made the vain effort to
control my own horse, and turn his head in the other direction,
but my strength was gone. I had never leaped a fence in my life
on horseback, though a tolerable rider on the road; but before I
could think how it was to be done, or gather myself together for
the leap, Curtal was over the hedge with me, and flying across a
ploughed field like the windSaladin not far before him. With
a glance ahead I saw the red coats rising into the air and
disappearing
over another green hedge, and, though the field was
crossed in twenty leaps, I had time to feel my blood run cold with
the prospect of describing another parabola in the air, and to
speculate on the best attitude for a projectile on horseback. Over
went Saladin like a greyhound, but his mistress's riding-cap
caught the wind at the highest point of the curve, and flew back
into my face as Curtal rose on his haunches, and over I went
again, blinded and giddy, and, with the cap held flat against my
bosom by the pressure of the air, flew once more at a tremendous
pace onward. My feet were now plunged to the instep in the
stirrups, and my back, too weak to support me erect, let me down
to my horse's mane, and, one by one, along the skirt of a rising
woodland, I could see the red coats dropping slowly behind.
Right before me like a meteor, however, streamed back the
loosened
tresses of Lady Caroline, and Curtal kept close on the
track of Saladin, neither losing nor gaining an inch apparently,
and nearer and nearer sounded the baying of the hounds, and
clearer became my view of the steady and slight waist riding so
fearlessly onward. Of my horse I had neither guidance nor
control
.
He needed none. The hounds had crossed a morass, and
we were rounding a half-circle on an acclivity to come up with
them, and Curtal went at it too confidently to be in error. Evenly
as a hand-gallop on a green sward his tremendous pace told off,
and if his was the ease of muscular power, the graceful speed of
the beautiful creature moving before me seemed the aerial
buoyancy
of a bird. Obstructions seemed nothing. That flowing
dress and streaming hair sailed over rocks and ditches, and over
them, like their inseparable shadow, glided I, and, except one
horseman who still kept his distance ahead, we seemed alone in
the field. The clatter of hoofs, and the exclamations of
excitement
had ceased behind me, and, though I was capable of no
exertion beyond that of keeping my seat, I no longer feared the
leap nor the pace, and began to anticipate a safe termination to
my perilous adventure. A slight exclamation from Lady
Caroline
reached my ear and I looked forward. A small river was
before us, and, from the opposite bank, of steep clay, the rider
who had preceded us was falling back, his horse's forefeet high in
the air, and his arms already in the water. I tried to pull my
reins. I shouted to my horse in desperation. And, with the
exertion
,
my heart seemed to give way within me. Giddy and
faint I abandoned myself to my fate. I just saw the flying heels
of Saladin planted on the opposite bank and the streaming hair
still flying onward, when, with a bound that, it seemed to me,
must rend every fibre of the creature beneath me, I saw the
water gleam under my feet, and still I kept on. We flew over a
fence into a stubble field, the hounds just before us, and over a
gate into the public highway, which we followed for a dozen
bounds, and then, with a pace slightly moderated, we successively
cleared a low wall and brought up, on our horses' haunches, in
the midst of an uproar of dogs, cows, and scattering poultrythe
fox having been run down at last in the enclosure of a barn. I
had just strength to extricate my feet from the stirrups, take Lady
Caroline's cap, which had kept its place between my elbows and
knees, and present it to her as she sat in her saddle, and my legs
gave way under me. I was taken into the farmhouse, and, at the
close of a temporary ellipse, I was sent back to Tresethen Castle
in a post-chaise, and once more handed over to the doctor!
Well, my third siege of illness was more tolerable, for I received
daily, now, some message of inquiry or some token of interest from
Lady Caroline, though I learned from the Countess that she was
in sad disgrace for her inveiglement of my trusting innocence. I
also received the cards of the members of the hunt, with many
inquiries complimentary to what they were pleased to consider
American horsemanship, and I found that my seizure of the flying
cap of Lady Caroline and presentation of it to her Ladyship at
the death, was thought to be worthy, in chivalry of Bayard,
and in dexterity of Ducrow. Indeed, when let out again to the
convalescent walk in the conservatory, I found that I was counted
a hero even by the stately Earl. There slipped a compliment,
too, here and there, through the matronly disapprobation of
Lady Tresethenand all this was too pleasant to put aside with
a disclaimerso I bid truth and modesty hold their peace, and
took the honor the gods chose to provide.
But now came dangers more perilous than my ride on Curtal.
Lady Caroline was called upon to be kind to me! Daily as the
old servant left me in the alley of japonicas, she appeared from
the glass door of her mother's boudoir and devoted herself to my
comfortwalking with me, while I could walk, in those fragrant
and balmy avenues of flowers, and then bringing me into her
mother's luxurious apartment, where books, and music, and
conversation
as frank and untrammelled as man in love could ask,
wiled away the day. Wiled it away?winged itshod it with
velvet and silence, for I never knew how it passed! Lady
Caroline
had a mind, of the superiority stamped so consciously on her
lip. She anticipated no consequences from her kindness,
therefore
she was playful and unembarrassed. She sang to me, and I
read to her. Her rides were given up, and Saladin daily went
past the window to his exercise, and, with my most zealous scrutiny,
I could detect in her face neither impatience of confinement nor
regret at the loss of weather fitter for pleasures out of doors.
Spite of every caution with which hope could be chained down, I
was flattered.
You smile(Tom said, though he was looking straight into the
water, and had not seen my face for half an hour)but, without
the remotest hope of taking Lady Caroline to Kentucky, or of
becoming English on the splendid dowry of the heiress of
Tresethen
,
I still felt it impossible to escape from my lover's attitude
impossible to avoid hoarding up symptoms, encouragements,
flatteries
,
and all the moonshine of amatory anxiety. I was in love
and who reasons in love?
One morning, after I had become an honorary patientan
invalid
only by sufferanceand was slowly admitting the unwelcome
conviction that it was time for me to be shaping my adieuxthe
conversation took rather a philosophical turn. The starting point
was a quotation, in a magazine, from Richter: Is not a man's
universe
within
his head, whether a king's diadem or a torn
scullcap
be
without
?and I had insisted rather strenuously on the
8
levelling privilege we enjoyed in the existence of a second world
around usthe world of revery and dreamwherein the tyranny,
and check, and the arbitary distinctions of the world of fact, were
never feltand where he, though he might be a peasant, who had
the consciousness in his soul that he was a worthy object of love
to a princess, could fancy himself beloved and revel in imaginary
possession.
Why, said I, turning with a sudden flush of self-confidence
to Lady Caroline, Why should not the passions of such a world,
the loving and returning of love
in fancy
, have the privilege of
language? Why should not matches be made, love confessed,
vows exchanged, and fidelity sworn, valid within the realm of
dream-land
only? Why should I not say to you, for example, I adore
you, dear lady, and in my world of thought you shall, if you so
condescend, be my bride and mistress; and why, if you responded
to this and listened to my vows of fancy, should your bridegroom
of the world of fact feel his rights invaded?
In fancy let it be then! said Lady Caroline, with a blush
and a covert smile, and she rang the bell for luncheon.
WellI still lingered a couple of days, and, on the last day of
my stay at Tresethen, I became sufficiently emboldened to take
Lady Caroline's hand, behind the fountain of the conservatory,
and to press it to my lips with a daring wish that its warm
pulses belonged to the world of fancy.
She withdrew it very kindly, and (I thought) sadly, and begged
me to go to the boudoir and bring her a volume of Byron that
lay on her work-table.
I brought it, and she turned over the leaves a moment, and,
with her pencil, marked two lines and gave me the book, bidding
me an abrupt good morning. I stood a few minutes with my
heart beating and my brain faint, but finally summoned courage
to read:
I can not lose a world for thee
But would not lose thee for the world!
I left Tresethen the next morning, and
Hold on, Tom! cried Ithere comes the boat with our
dinner from Valetta, and we'll have your sorrows over our
Burgundy
.
Sorrows! exclaimed Tom, I was going to tell you of the
fun I had at her wedding!
Lord preserve us!
Bigamywasn't it?after our little nuptials in dream-land!
She told her husband all about it at the wedding breakfast, and
his lordship (she married the Marquis of ) begged to know
the extent of
my
prerogatives. I was sorry to confess that they
did not interfere very particularly with
his!
BEWARE OF DOGS AND WALTZING.
The
birds that flew over County Surrey on the twelfth of
June, 1845, looked down upon a scene of which many a lord
of creation, travelling only by the roads, might well have envied
them the seeing. For, ever so merry let it be
within
the lordly
parks of England, the trees that look over the ring fence upon
the world
without
, keep their countenancearistocrats that they
are! Round and round Beckton park you might have travelled
that sunny day, and often within arrow-shot of its hidden and
fairy lawn, and never suspected, but by the magnetic tremor in
your veins, that beautiful women were dancing near by, and
marvellous proper men, more or less enamored, looking on
every pink and blue girdle a noose for a heart, of course, and
every gay waistcoat a victim venturing near the trap (though
this last is mentioned entirely on my own responsibility).
But what have we to do with the unhappy exiles
without
this
pretty Paradise! You are an invited guest, dear reader! Pray
walk in!
Did you ask about the Becktons? The Becktons are people
blessed with money and a very charming acquaintance. That is
enough to know about them. Yet stay! Sir Thomas was
knighted for his behavior at some great crisis in India (for he
made his fortune in India)and Lady Beckton is no great beauty,
but she has the mania of getting handsome people together, and
making them happier than belongs properly to handsome people's
destiny. And this, I think, must suffice for a first introduction.
The lawn, as you see, has the long portico of the house on one
side of it, a bend of the river on two other sides, and a thick
shrubbery on the fourth. The dancing-floor is in the centre,
inlaid at the level of the smooth sward, and it is just now
vibrating
to the measured step of the mazurkabeautifully danced, we
must
say!
And now let me point out to you the persons most concerned in
this gossip of mine.
First, the ladies.
Miss Blakeney(and she was never called anything but Miss
Blakeneynever Kate, or Kitty, or Kathleen, I mean, though
her name was Catherine)Miss Blakeney is that very stylish,
very striking, very magnificent girl, I think I may say, with the
white chip hat and black feather. Nobody but Miss Blakeney
could venture to wear just the dress she is sporting, but she must
dash, though she is in half-mourning, and, faith! there is nothing
out of keeping, artistically speaking, after all. A white dress
embroidered
with black flowers, dazzling white shoulders turned over
with black lace, white neck and forehead (brilliantly white), waved
over and kissed by luxuriant black ringlets (brilliantly black)!
And very white temples with very black eyes, and very white
eyelids with long black lashes; and, since those dazzling white
teeth were without a contrast, there hung upon her neck a black
cross of ebony. And now we have put her in black and white,
where she will stay put.
Scripta verba manent
, saith the
cautionary proverb.
Here and there, you observe, there is a small Persian carpet
spread on the sward for those who like to lounge and look at the
dancers, and though a score of people, at least, are availing
themselves
of this oriental luxury, no one looks so modestly pretty,
half-couched on the richly-colored woof, as that simply-dressed
blonde, with a straw hat in her lap, and her light auburn curls
taking their saucy will of her blue-veined neck and shoulders.
That lady's plain name is Mabel Brown, and, like yourself, many
persons have wished to change it for her. She is half-married,
indeed, to several persons here present, for there is
one
consenting
party.
Mais l'autre ne veut pas
, as a French novelist
laments it, stating a similar dilemma. Meantime, Miss Brown is
the adopted sister of the black and white Miss Blakeney.
One more exercise of my function of
cicerone!
Lying upon the bank of the river, with his shoulder against that
fine oak, and apparently deeply absorbed in the fate of the
acorn-cups
which he throws into the current, you may survey the
elegant person of Mr. Lindsay Mauda gentleman whom I wish
you to take for rather more than his outer seeming, since he will
show you, at the first turn of his head, that he cares nothing for
your opinion, though entitled, as the diplomatists phrase it, to
your high consideration. Mr. Maud is twenty-five, more or
lesssix feet, or thereabouts. He has the sanguineous tint,
rather odd for so phlegmatic a person as he seems. His nose is
un petit peu rtrouss
, his lips full, and his smile easy and ready.
His eyes are like the surface of a very deep well. Curling brown
hair, broad and calm forehead, merry chin with a dimple in it,
and mouth expressive of great good humor, and quite enough of
fastidiousness If this is not your beau ideal, I am very sorry
but experience went to show that Lindsay Maud was a very
agreeable man, and pleased generally where he undertook it.
And now, if you please, having done the honors, I will take up
the story
en simple conteur
.
The sky was beginning to blush about the sun's going to bed,
and the dancers and archers were pairing off, couple by couple, to
stroll and cool in the dim shrubberies of Beckton park. It was
an hour to breakfast, so called, for breakfast was to be served in
the darker edge of the twilight. With the afore-named oak-tree
between him and the gay company, Mr. Lindsay Maud beguiled
his hunger (for hungry he was), by reading a volume of that very
clever novel, Le Perc Goriot, and, chapter by chapter, he
cocked up his car, as the story-books say, hoping to hear the
cheerful bell of the tower announce the serving of the soup and
champagne.
Well, Sir Knight Faineant! said Lady Beckton, stepping
in suddenly between his feet and the river brink, since when
have you turned woman-hater, and enrolled among the
unavailables
?
Here have you lain all day in the shade, with scores of
nice girls dancing on the other side of your hermit tree, and not a
sign of lifenot a look even to see whether my party, got up with
so much pains, flourished or languished! I'll cross you out of my
little book, recreant!
Maud was by this time on his feet, and he penitently and
respectfully
kissed the fingers threateningly held up to himfor
the unpardonable sin, in a single man, is to appear unamused, let
alone failing to amuse othersat a party sworn to be agreeable.
I have but half an apology, he said, that of knowing that
your parties go swimmingly off, whether I pull an oar or no; but
I deserve not the less to be crossed out of your book. Something
ails me. I am growing old, or my curiosity has burnt out, or I
am touched with some fatal lethargy. Upon my word, I would as
lief listen to a Latin sermon as chat for the next half hour with
the prettiest girl at Beckton! There's no inducement, my dear
Lady Beckton! I'm not a marrying man, you know, and
flirtation
flirtation
is such tiresome repetitionendless reading of
prefaces, and never coming to the agreeable first chapter. But
I'll obey orders. Which is the destitute woman? You shall see
how I will redeem my damaged reputation!
But Lady Beckton, who seldom refused an offer from a beau to
make himself useful at her parties, seemed hardly to listen to
Maud's justification. She placed her arm in his, and led him
across the bridge which spanned the river a little above, and they
were presently out of hearing in one of the cool and shaded
avenues of the park.
A penny for your thought! said Maud, after walking at her
side a few minutes in silence.
It is a thought, certainly, in which pennies are concerned,
replied Lady Beckton, and that is why I find any trouble in
giving expression to it. It is difficult enough to talk with
gentlemen
about love, but that is easy to talking about money.
Yet they make a pretty tandem, money on the lead!
Oh! are you there? exclaimed Lady Beckton, with a laugh;
I was beginning too far back, altogether! My dear Lindsay,
see how much better I thought of you than you deserved! I was
turning over in my mind, with great trepidation and
embarrassment
,
how I should venture to talk to you about a money-and-love
match!
Indeed! for what happy man?
Toi mme, mon ami!
Heavens! you quite take away my breath! Spare yourself
the overture, my dear Lady Beckton! I agree! I am quite
readysold from this hour if you can produce a purchaser, and
possession given immediately!
Now you go too fast; for I have not time to banter, and I
wish to see my way in earnest before I leave you. Listen to me.
I was talking you over with Beckton this morning. I'll not
trouble you with the discussionit would make you vain,
perhaps. But we arrived at this: Miss Blakeney would be a
very good match for you, and, if you are inclined to make a
demonstration that way, why, we will do what we can to make it
plain sailing. Stay with us a week, for instance, and we will keep
the Blakeneys. It' a sweet month for pairing, and you are an
expeditious love-maker, I know. Is it agreed?
You are quite serious?
Quite!
I'll go back with you to the bridge, kindest of friends, and
return and ramble here till the bell rings by myself. I'll find
you at table, by-and-by, and express my gratitude at least. Will
that be time enough for an answer?
Yesbut no ceremony with me! Stay and ponder where
you are!
Au revoir!
I must see after my breakfast!
And away tripped the kind-hearted Lady Beckton.
Maud resumed his walk. He was rather taken aback. He
knew Miss Blakeney but as a waltzing partner, yet that should be
but little matter; for he had long ago made up his mind that, if
he did not marry rich, he could not marry at all.
Maud was poorthat is to say, he had all that an angel would
suppose necessary in this hungry and cold worldassurance of
food and clothingin other words, three hundred a year. He
had had his unripe time like other youths, in which he was ready
to marry for love and no money; but his timid advances at that
soft period had not been responsibly met by his first course of
sweethearts, and he had congratulated himself and put a price
upon his heart accordingly. Meantime, he thought, the world is
a very entertaining place, and the belonging to nobody in
particular
has its little advantages.
And very gayly sped on the second epoch of Mr. Lindsay
Maud's history. He lived in a country where, to shine in a
profession
requires the
audace, patience et volont de quoi renverser
le monde
, and, having turned his ambition well about, like a strange
coin that might perhaps have passed current in other times, he laid
it away, with romance and chivalry, and other things suited only
to the cabinets of the curious. He was well born, he was well
bred. He was a fair candidate for the honors of a gay man
about townthat untaxed exemptthat guest by privilege
irresponsible denizen of high life, possessed of every luxury on
earth except matrimony and the pleasures of payment. And,
for a year or two, this was very delightful. He had a half
dozen of those charming female friendships which, like other
ephemera in this changing world, must die or turn into something
else at the close of a season, and, if this makes the feelings very
hard, it makes the manners very soft; and Maud was content with
the compensation. If he felt, now and then, that he was idling
life away, he looked about him and found countenance at least;
for all his friends were as idle, and there was an analogy to his
condition in nature (if need were to find one), for the butterfly
had his destiny like the bee, and was neither pitied nor
reproached
that he was not a honey-maker.
But Maud was now in a third lustrum of his existence, and it
was tinted somewhat differently from the rose-colored epochs
precedent
.
The twilight of satisfied curiosity had fallen
imperceptibly
around him. The inner veils of society had, one by one,
lifted, and there could be nothing new for his eye in the world to
which he belonged.
A gay party, which was once to him as full of unattained
objects
as the festal mysteries of Eleusinia to a rustic worshipper
of Ceres, was now as readable at a glance as the stripes of a
backgammon-board. He knew every man's pretensions and
chances, every woman's expectations and defences. Not a
damsel whose defects he had not discovered, whose mind he had
not sounded, whose dowry he did not know; not a beauty,
married or single, whose nightly game in society he could not
perfectly foretell; not an affection unoccupied of which he could
not put you down the cost of engaging it in your favor, the
chances of constancy, the dangers of following or abandoning.
He had no stake in society, meantime, yet society itself was all
his world. He had no ambitions to further by its aid. And,
until now, he had looked on matrimony as a closed doorfor he
had neither property, nor profession likely to secure it, and
circumstances
like these, in the rank in which he moved, are
comprehended
among the any impediments. To have his own
way, Maud would have accepted no invitations except to dine
with the
beaux esprits
, and he would have concentrated the
remainder
of his leisure and attentions upon one agreeable woman
(at a time)two selfishnesses very attractive to a
blas
, but
not permitted to any member of society short of a Duke or a
Crsus.
And now, with a new leaf turning over in his dull book of life
a morning of a new day breaking on his increasing night
Lindsay Maud tightly screwed his arms across his breast, and
paced the darkening avenue of Beckton Park. The difference
between figuring as a fortune-hunter, and having a fortune hunted
for him by others, he perfectly understood. In old and
aristocratic
societies, where wealth is at the same time so much more
coveted and so much more difficult to win, the eyes of envy,
malice, and all uncharitableness, are alike an omnipresent Argus,
in their watch over the avenues to its acquisition. No step, the
slightest, the least suspicious, is ever taken toward the hand of an
heiress, or the attainment of an inheritance, without the awakening
and counter-working of these busy monsters; and, for a
society-man
,
better to be a gambler or seducer, better to have all the
fashionable vices ticketed on his name, than to stand
affiched
as a
fortune-hunter. If to have a fortune cleverly put within reach by
a powerful friend, however, be a proportionate beatitude, blessed
was Maud. So thought he, at least, as the merry bell of Beckton
tower sent its summons through the woods, and his revery gave
place to thoughts of something more substantial.
And thus far, oh adorable reader! (for I see what
unfathomable
eyes are looking over my shoulder) thus far, like an artist
making a sketch, of which one part is to be finished, I have dwelt
a little on the touches of my pencil. But, by those same
unfathomable
eyes I know (for in those depths dwell imagination), that, if the
remainder be done ever so lightly in outline, even then there will
be more than was needed for the comprehension of the story.
Thy ready and boundless fancy, sweet lady, would supply it all
Given, the characters and scene, what fair creature who has
loved, could fail to picture forth the sequel and its more minute
surroundings, with rapidity and truth daguerreotypical?
Sketchily, then, touch we the unfinished
dnouement
of our
story.
The long saloon was already in glittering progress when Maud
entered. The servants in their blue and white liveries were
gliding rapidly about, with the terrestrial nutriment for eyes
celestialto wit, wines and oysters.
Half blinded with the glare of the numberless lights, he stood a
moment at the door.
Lady Beckton's compliments, and she has reserved a seat for
you! said a footman approaching him.
He glanced at the head of the table. The vacant chair
was near Lady Beckton and
opposite
Miss Blakeney. Is
a
vis-a-vis
better for love-making than a seat at the lady's ear?
thought Maud. But Lady Beckton's tactics were to spare his
ear and dazzle his eye, without reference especially to the
corresponding
impressions on the eyes and ear of the lady. And
she had the secondary object of avoiding any betrayal of her
designs till they were too far matured to be defeated by
publicity.
Can you tell me, Mr. Maud, said the sweet voice of
Mabel Brown, as he drew his chair to the table, what is
the secret of Lady Beckton's putting you next me so
pertinaciously
?
A greater regard for my happiness than yours, probably,
said Maud; but why `pertinaciously?' Has there been a
skirmish for this particular chair?
No skirmish, but three attempts at seizure by three of my
admirers.
If they admire you more than I, they are fitter companions
for a
tte--tte
than a crowded party, said Maud. I am as
near a lover as I can be, and be agreeable!
To this Maud expected the gay retort due to a bagatelle of
gallantry; but the pretty Mabel was silent. The soup
disappeared
and the
entremets
were served. Maud was hungry, and
he had sent a cutlet and a glass of Johannisberg to the clamorous
quarter before he ventured to look toward his hostess.
He felt her eyes upon him. A covert smile stole through her
lips as they exchanged glances.
Yes? she asked, with a meaning look.
Yes!
And, in that dialogue of two monosyllables, Lady Beckton
presumed
that the hand and five thousand a year of Miss Catherine
Blakeney, were virtually made over to Mr. Lindsay Maud. And
her diplomacy made play to that end, without farther
deliberation
.
Very unconscious indeed that she was under the eye of the
man who had entered into a conspiracy to become her husband,
Miss Blakeney sat between a guardsman and a diplomatist,
carrying
on the war in her usual trenchant and triumphant fashion.
She looked exceedingly handsomethat Maud could not but
admit. With no intention of becoming responsible for her
manners
,
he would even have admired, as he often had done, her
skilful coquetries and adroit displays of the beauty with which
nature had endowed her. She succeeded, Maud thought, in
giving both of her admirers the apparent preference (apparent to
themselves, that is to say), and, considering her
vis-a-vis
worth a
chance shaft at least, she honored that very attentive gentleman
with such occasional notice, as, under other circumstances, would
have been far from disagreeable. It might have worn a better
grace, however, coming from simple Miss Blakeney. From the
future Mrs. Lindsay Maud, he could have wished those pretty
inveiglements very much reduced and modified.
At his side, the while, sweet Mabel Brown carried on with him
a conversation, which, to the high tone of merriment opposite, was
like the intermitted murmur of a brook heard in the pauses of
merry instruments. At the same time that nothing brilliant or
gay seemed to escape her notice, she toned her own voice and
flow of thought, so winningly below the excitement around her,
that Maud, who was sensible of every indication of superiority
could not but pay her a silent tribute of admiration. If this
were but the heiress! he ejaculated inwardly. But Mabel
Brown was a dependant.
Coffee was served.
The door at the end of the long saloon was suddenly thrown
open, and, as every eye turned to gaze into the blazing
ball-room
,
a march, with the full power of the band, burst upon
the ear.
The diplomatist who had been sitting at the side of Miss
Blakeney was a German, and a waltzer
comme il y en a peu
. At
the bidding of Lady Beckton, he put his arm around the waist of
the heiress, and bore her away to the delicious music of Strauss,
and, by general consent, the entire floor was left to this pair for a
dozen circles. Miss Blakeney was passionately fond of waltzing,
and built for it, like a Baltimore clipper for running close to the
wind. If she had a fault that her friends were afraid to jog her
memory about, it was the wearing her dresses a flounce too short.
Her feet and ankles were Fenella's own, while her figure and
breezy motion would have stolen Endymion from Diana. She
waltzed too well for a ladyall but well enough for a
premire
danseuse de l'opera
. Lady Beckton was a shrewd woman, but
she made a mistake in crying
encore!
when this single couple
stopped from their admired
pas de deux
. She thought Maud was
just the man to be captivated by that display. But the future
Mrs. Lindsay Maud must
not
have ankles for general admiration.
Oh, no!
Maud wished to efface the feeling this exhibition had caused, by
sharing in the excitement.
Miss Brown, he said, as two or three couples went off,
permit me the happiness of one turn! and, scarce waiting for
an answer, he raised his arm to encircle her waist.
Mabel took his hands, and playfully laid them across each
other on his own breast in an attitude of resignation.
I never waltz, she said. But don't think me a prude!
I don't consider it wrong in those who think it right.
But with this music tugging at your heels! said Maud, who
did not care to express how much he admired the delicacy of her
distinction.
Ah, with a husband or a brother, I should think one could
scarce resist bounding away; but I cannot
Cannot what?cannot take me for either? interrupted
Maud, with an air of affected malice that covered a very strong
desire to ask the question in earnest.
She turned her eyes suddenly upon him with a rapid look of
inquiry, and, slightly coloring, fixed her attention silently on the
waltzers.
Lady Beckton came, making her way through the crowd. She
touched Maud on the arm.
`Hold hook and line!'is it not? she said, in a whisper.
After an instant's hesitation, Maud answered, Yes!but
pages, often, would not suffice to express all that passes through
the mind in an instant's hesitation. All Lindsay Maud's
prospects and circumstances were reviewed in that moment; all
his many steps by which he had arrived at the conclusion that
marriage with him
must
be a matter of
convenience
merely; all his
put-down impulses and built-up resolutions; all his regrets,
consolations
,
and offsets; all his better and worser feelings; all his
former loves (and in that connexion, strangely enough, Mabel
Brown); all his schemes, in short, for smothering his pain in the
sacrifice of his heart, and making the most of the gain to his
pocket, passed before him in that half minute's review. But he
said Yes!
The Blakeney carriage was dismissed that night, with orders to
bring certain dressing-maids, and certain sequents of that useful
race, on the following morning, to Beckton Park, and the three
persons who composed the Blakeney party, an old aunt, Miss
Blakeney, and Mabel Brown, went quietly to bed under the
hospitable
roof of Lady Beckton.
How describe (and what need of it, indeed!) a week at an
English country-house, with all its age of chances for loving and
hating, its eternity of opportunities for all that hearts can have to
regulate in this shorthand life of ours? Let us come at once to
the closing day of this visit.
Maud lay late abed on the day that the Blakeneys were to
leave Beckton Park. Fixed from morning till night in the firm
resolution at which he had arrived with so much trouble and
self-control
,
he was dreaming from night till morning of a felicity in
which Miss Blakeney had little share. He wished the marriage
could be all achieved in the signing of a bond. He found that he
had miscalculated his philosophy, in supposing that he could
venture to loose thought and revery upon the long-forbidden
subject
of marriage. In all the scenes eternally being conjured up
to his fancyscenes of domestic lifethe bringing of Miss
Blakeney
into the picture was an after effort. Mabel Brown stole into
it, spite of himselfthe sweetest and dearest feature of that
enchanting picture, in its first warm coloring by the heart. But,
day by day, he took the place assigned him by Lady Beckton at
the side of Miss Blakeney, riding, driving, dining, strolling, with
reference to being near her only, and, still, scarce an hour could
pass in which, spite of all effort to the contrary, he did not betray
his passionate interest in Mabel Brown.
He arose and breakfasted. Lady Beckton and the young
ladies were bonnetted and ready for a stroll in the park woods,
and her Ladyship came and whispered in Maud's ear, as he leaned
over his coffee, that he must join them presently, and that she
had prepared Miss Blakeney for an interview with him, which
she would arrange as they rambled.
Take no refusal! were her parting words as she stepped out
upon the verandah.
Maud strolled leisurely towards the rendezvous indicated by
Lady Beckton. He required all the time he could get to confirm
his resolutions and recover his usual
maintien
of repose. With
his mind made up at last, and a face in which few would have
read the heart in fetters beneath, he jumped a wicker-fence, and,
by a cross-path, brought the ladies in view. They were walking
separately, but, as his footsteps were heard, Lady Beckton slipped
her arm into Miss Brown's, and commenced, apparently, a very
earnest undertone of conversation. Miss Blakeney turned. Her
face glowed with exercise, and Maud confessed to himself that he
rarely had seen so beautiful a woman.
You are come in time, Mr. Maud, she said, for
something
is going on between my companions from which I am
excluded.
En revanche
, suppose we have our little exclusive secret!
said Maud, offering his arm.
Miss Blakeney colored slightly, and consented to obey the
slight resistance of his arm, by which they fell behind. A silence
of a few moments followed, for, if the proposed secret were a
proposal
of marriage, it had been too bluntly approached. Maud
felt that he must once more return to indifferent topics, and lead
on the delicate subject at his lips with more tact and preparation.
They ascended a slight elevation in the walk which overlooked the
wilder confines of the park. A slight smoke rose from a clump of
trees, indicating an intrusion of gipsies within, and, the next
instant, a deep-mouthed bark rang out before them, and the two
ladies came rushing back in violent terror, assailed at every step
of their flight by a powerful and infuriated mastiff. Maud ran
forward immediately, and succeeded in driving the dog back to
the tents; but, on his return, he found only the terrified Mabel,
who, leaning against a tree, and partly recovered from her
breathless
flight, was quietly awaiting him.
Here is a change of partners as my heart would have it!
thought Maud, as he drew her slight arm within his own. The
transfer looks to me like the interposition of my good angel, and I
accept the warning!
And, in words that needed no management to bring them
skilfully
onwith the eloquence of a heart released from fetters all
but intolerable, and from a threatened slavery for lifeLindsay
Maud poured out the fervent passion of his heart to Mabel
Brown. The crust of a selfish and artificial life broke up in the
tumult of that declaration, and he found himself once more
natural and true to the instincts and better impulses of his
character
.
He was met with the trembling response that such pure
love looks for when it finds utterance, and, without a thought of
worldly calculation, or a shadow of a scheme for their means and
manner of life, they exchanged promises to which the subsequent
ceremony of marriage was but the formal seal.
And, at the announcement of this termination to her
matrimonial
schemes, Lady Beckton seemed much more troubled than
Miss Blakeney.
But Lady Beckton's disappointment was somewhat modified
when she discovered that Miss Blakeney had, long before, secretly
endowed her adopted sister Mabel with the half of her fortune.
THE REVENGE OF THE SIGNOR BASIL.
PART I.
Un homme capable de faire des dominos avec les os de son pere
.
Pere Goriot
.
It
was in the golden month of August, not very long ago, that
the steamer which plies between St. Mark's Stairs, at Venice,
and the river into which Phaeton turned a somerset with the
horses of the sun, started on its course over the lagoon with an
unusual God-send of passengers. The moon was rising from the
unchaste bed of the Adriatic (wedded every year to Venice, yet
every day and night sending the sun and moon from her lovely
bosom to the sky), and while the gold of the west was still
glowing
on the landward side of the Campanile, a silver gleam was
brightening momently on the other, and the Arabic domes of
St. Mark, and the flying Mercury on the Dogana, paled to the
setting
orb and kindled to the rising, with the same
Talleyrandesque
facility.
For the first hour the Mangia-foco sputtered on her way with
a silent company; the poetry of the scene, or the regrets at
leaving
the delicious city lessening in the distance, affecting all alike
with a thoughtful incommunicativeness. Gradually, however,
the dolphin hues over the Brenta faded awaythe marble city
sank into the sea, with its turrets and bright spiresthe still
lagoon
became a sheet of polished glassand the silent groups
leaning
over the rails found tongues and feet, and began to stir and
murmur.
With the usual unconscious crystallization of society, the
passengers
of the Mangia-foco had yielded one side of the deck to a
party of some rank, who had left their carriages at Ferrara, in
coming from Florence to Venice, and were now upon their return
to the city of Tasso, stomaching, with what grace they might,
the contact of a vulgar conveyance which saved them the
hundred
miles of posting between Ferrara and the Brenta. In the
centre of the aristocratic circle stood a lady enveloped in a
cashmere
,
but with her bonnet hung by the string over her armone
of those women of Italy upon whom the divinest gifts of loveliness
are showered with a profusion which apparently impoverishes the
sex of the whole nation. A beautiful woman in that land is
rarely met; but when she does appear, she is what Venus would
have been, after the contest for beauty on Ida, had the weapons of
her antagonists, as in the tournaments of chivalry, been added to
the palm of victory. The Marchesa del Marmore was apparently
twenty-three, and she might have been an incarnation of the
morning-star for pride and brightness.
On the other side of the deck stood a group of young men, who,
by their careless and rather shabby dress, but pale and
intellectual
faces, were of that class met in every public conveyance
of Italy. The portfolios under their arms, ready for a sketch,
would have removed a doubt of their profession, had one existed;
and, with that proud independence for which the class is
remarkable
,
they had separated themselves equally from the noble and
ignobledisqualified by inward superiority from association with
the one, and by accidental poverty from the claims cultivation
might give them upon the other. Their glances at the divine
face turned toward them from the party I have alluded to, were
less constant than those of the vulgar, who could not offend; but
they were evidently occupied more with it than with the
fishing-boats
lying asleep on the lagoon: and one of them, half-buried in
the coil of a rope, and looking under the arm of another, had
already made a sketch of her that might some day make the
world wonder from what seventh heaven of fancy such an angelic
vision of a head had descended upon the painter's dream.
In the rear of this group, with the air of one who would conceal
himself from view, stood a young man who belonged to the party,
but who, with less of the pallor of intellectual habits in his face,
was much better dressed than his companions, and had, in spite
of the portfolio under his arm, and a hat of the Salvator breadth
of brim, the undisguisable air of a person accustomed to the best
society. While maintaining a straggling conversation with his
friends, with whom he seemed a favorite, Signor Basil employed
himself in looking over the sketch of the lovely Marchesa going
on at his elbowoccasionally, as if to compare it with the
original
,
stealing a long look, from between his hand and his slouched
hat, at the radiant creature sitting so unconsciously for her picture,
and in a low voice correcting, as by the result of his gaze, the
rapid touches of the artist.
Take a finer pencil for the nostril, caro mio! said he;
it is as thin as the edge of a violet, and its transparent
curve
Cospetto! said the youth; but you see by this faint light
better than I: if she would but turn to the moon '
The Signor Basil suddenly flung his handkerchief into the
lagoon, bringing its shadow between the Queen of Night and the
Marchesa del Marmore; and, attracted from her revery by the
passing object, the lady moved her head quickly to the light, and,
in that moment, the spirited lip and nostril were transferred to
the painter's sketch.
Thanks, mio bravo! enthusiastically exclaimed the
lookeron
;
Giorgione would not have beaten thee with the crayon!
and, with a rudeness which surprised the artist, he seized the
paper from beneath his hand, and walked away with it to the
stern, and, leaning far over the rails, perused it fixedly by the
mellow
lustre of the moon. The youth presently followed him, and,
after a few words exchanged in an undertone, Signor Basil slipped
a piece of gold into his hand, and carefully placed the sketch in
his own portfolio.
II.
It was toward midnight when the Mangia-foco entered the
Adige, and keeping its steady way between the low banks of the
river, made for the grass-grown and flowery canal which connects
its waters with the Po. Most of the passengers had yielded to
the drowsy influence of the night air, and, of the aristocratic
party on the larboard side, the young Marchesa alone was waking:
her friends had made couches of their cloaks and baggage, and
were reclining at her feet, while the artists, all except the Signor
Basil, were stretched fairly on the deck, their portfolios beneath
their heads, and the large hats covering their faces from the
powerful rays of the moon.
Miladi does justice to the beauty of the night, said the
waking artist, in a low and respectful tone, as he rose from
her feet with a cluster of tuberoses she had let fall from her
hand.
It is indeed lovely, Signor pittore, responded the Marchesa,
glancing at his portfolio, and receiving the flowers with a gracious
inclination; have you touched Venice from the lagoon
tonight
?
The Signor Basil opened his portfolio, and replied to the
indirect
request of the lady by showing her a very indifferent sketch
of Venice from the island of St. Lazzaro. As if to escape from
the necessity of praising what had evidently disappointed her, she
turned the cartoon hastily, and exposed, on the sheet beneath,
the spirited and admirable outline of her own matchless features.
A slight start alone betrayed the surprise of the high-born lady,
and, raising the cartoon to examine it more closely, she said with
a smile, You may easier tread on Titian's heels than
Canaletti's
.
Bezzuoli has painted me, and not so well. I will awake
the Marquis, and he shall purchase it of you.
Not for the wealth of the Medici, madam! said the young
man, clasping his portfolio hastily, pray, do not disturb
monsignore
!
The picture is dear to me!
The Marchesa, looking into his face, with a glance around,
which the accomplished courtier before her read better than she
dreamed, drew her shawl over her blanched shoulders, and
settled herself to listen to the conversation of her new
acquaintance
.
You would be less gracious if you were observed, proud
beauty, thought Basil; but, while you think the poor painter
may while away the tediousness of a vigil, he may feed his eyes
on your beauty as well.
9
The Mangia-foco turned into the canal, threaded its lily-paved
waters for a mile or two, and then, putting forth upon the broad
bosom of the Po, went on her course against the stream, and,
with retarded pace, penetrated toward the sun-beloved heart of
Italy. And while the later hours performed their procession
with the stars, the Marchesa del Marmore leaned sleepless and
unfatigued against the railing, listening with mingled curiosity
and scorn to the passionate love-murmur of the enamored painter.
His hat was thrown aside, his fair and curling locks were flowing
in the night air, his form was bent earnestly but respectfully
toward her, and on his lip, with all its submissive tenderness,
there sat a shadow of something she could not define, but which
rebuked, ever and anon, as with the fierce regard of a noble, the
condescension she felt toward him as an artist.
III.
Upon the lofty dome of the altar in the cathedral of Bologna
stands poised an angel in marble, not spoken of in the books of
travellers, but perhaps the loveliest incarnation of a blessed
cherub that ever lay in the veined bosom of Pentelicus. Lost
and unobserved on the vast floor of the nave, the group of artists,
who had made a day's journey from Ferrara, sat in the wicker
chairs, hired for a baioch during the vesper, and drew silently
from this angel, while the devout people of Bologna murmured
their Ave Marias around. Signor Basil alone was content to look
over the work of his companions, and the twilight had already
begun to brighten the undying lamps at the shrine, when he
started from the pillar against which he leaned, and crossed hastily
toward a group issuing from a private chapel in the western aisle
A lady walked between two gentlemen of noble mien, and behind
her, attended by an equally distinguished company, followed that
lady's husband, the Marchese del Marmore. They were strangers
passing through Bologna, and had been attended to vespers by
some noble friends.
The companions of the Signor Basil looked on with some
surprise
as their enamored friend stepped confidently before the two
nobles in attendance upon the lady, and arrested her steps with a
salutation which, though respectful as became a gentleman, was
marked with the easy politeness of one accustomed to a favorable
reception.
May I congratulate miladi, he said, rising slowly from his
bow, and fixing his eyes with unembarrassed admiration on her
own liquid but now frowning orbs, upon her safe journey over
the Marches! Bologna, he continued, glancing at the nobles
with a courteous smile, welcomes her fittingly.
The lady listened with a look of surprise, and the Bolognese
glanced from the dusty boots of the artist to his portfolio.
Has the painter the honor to know la Signora? asked the
cavalier on her right.
Signor, si! said the painter, fiercely, as a curl arched the
lady's lip, and she prepared to answer.
The color mounted to the temples of the Marchesa, and her
husband, who had loitered beneath the Madonna of Domenichino,
coming up at the instant, she bowed coldly to the Signor Basil,
and continued down the aisle. The artist followed to her
carriage
,
and lifted his hat respectfully as the lumbering equipage
took its way by the famous statue of Neptune, and then, with a
confident smile, which seemed to his companions somewhat
mistimed
,
he muttered between his teeth,
ciascuno son bel' giorno!
and strolled loitering on with them to the trattoria.
IV.
The court of the Grand-Duke of Florence is perhaps the most
cosmopolitan, and the most easy of access, in all Europe. The
Austrian-born monarch himself, adopting in some degree the
frank and joyous character of the people over whom he reigns,
throws open his parks and palaces, his gardens and galleries, to
the strangers passing through; and, in the season of gayety, almost
any presentable person, resident at Florence, may procure the
entre
to the court balls, and start fair with noble dames and
gentlemen for grace in courtly favor. The
ftes
at the Palazzo
Pitti, albeit not always exempt from a leaven of vulgarity, are
always brilliant and amusing, and the exclusives of the court,
though they draw the line distinctly enough to their own eye,
mix with apparent abandonment in the motley waltz and mazurka;
and, either from good nature or a haughty conviction of their
superiority, never suffer the offensive
cordon
to be felt, scarce to
be suspected, by the multitude who divert them. The
Grand-Duke
,
to common eyes, is a grave and rather timid person, with
more of the appearance of the scholar than of the sovereign,
courteous in public, and benevolent and earnest in his personal
attentions to his guests at the palace. The royal quadrille may
be shared without permission of the Grand Chamberlain, and the
royal eye, after the first one or two dances of ceremony, searches
for partners by the lamp of beauty, heedless of the diamonds on
the brow, or the star of nobility on the shoulder. The grand
supper is scarce more exclusive, and, on the disappearance of the
royal
cortge
, the delighted crowd take their departure, having
seen no class more favored than themselves, and enchanted with
the gracious absence of pretension in the
nobilta
of Tuscany.
Built against the side of a steep hill, the Palazzo Pitti encloses
its rooms of state within massive and sombre walls in front, while,
in the rear, the higher stories of the palace open forth on a level
with the delicious gardens of the Boboli, and contain suites of
smaller apartments, fitted up with a cost and luxury which would
beggar the dream of a Sybarite. Here lives the monarch, in a
seclusion rendered deeper and more sacred by the propinquity of
the admitted world in the apartments below; and, in this sanctuary
of royalty is enclosed a tide of life, as silent and unsuspected by
the common inhabitant of Florence as the flow of the
ocean-veiled
Arethusa by the mariner of the Ionian main. Here the
invention of the fiery genius of Italy is exhausted in poetical
luxury; here the reserved and silent sovereign throws off his
maintien
of royal condescension, and enters with equal arms into
the lists of love and wit; here burn (as if upon an altar fed with
spice-woods and precious gums) the fervent and uncalculating
passions of this glowing clime, in senses refined by noble nurture,
and hearts prompted by the haughty pulses of noble blood; and
hereto the threshold of this sanctuary of royal pleasurepress
all who know its secrets, and who imagine a claim to it in their
birth and attractions, while the
lascia-passare
is accorded with a
difficulty which alone preserves its splendor.
Some two or three days after the repulse of the Signor Basil in
the cathedral of Bologna, the group of travelling artists were on
their way from the grand gallery at Florence to their noonday
meal. Loitering with slow feet through the crowded and narrow
Via Calzaiole, they emerged into the sunny Piazza, and, looking
up with understanding eyes at the slender shaft of the Campanile
(than which a fairer figure of religious architecture points not to
heaven), they took their way toward the church of Santa Trinita,
proposing to eat their early dinner at a house named, from its
excellence
in a certain temperate beverage,
La Birra
. The
traveller should be advised, also, that by paying an extra paul in
the bottle, he may have at, this renowned eating-house, an old
wine sunned on the southern shoulder of Fiesol, that hath in its
flavor a certain redolence of Boccaccioscarce remarkable, since
it grew in the scene of the Decameronbut of a virtue which, to
the Hundred Tales of Love (read drinking), is what the
Gradus
ad Parnassum
should be to the building of a dithyrambie. The
oil of two
crazie
upon the palm of the fat waiter Giuseppe will
assist in calling the vintage to his memory.
A thundering rap upon the gate of the adjoining Palazzo
arrested the attention of the artists as they were about to enter
the Birra, and, in the occupant of a dark-green cabriolet, drawn
by a pampered horse of the Duke's breed, they recognised,
elegantly
dressed, and
posed
on his seat
la d'Orsay
, the Signor
Basil. His coat was of an undecided cut and color, and his
gloves were of primrose purity.
The recognition was immediate, and the cordiality of the
greeting mutual. They had parted from their companion at the
gate of Florence, as travellers part, without question, and they
met without reserve to part as questionless again. The artists
were surprised at the Signor Basil's transformation, but no
follower
of their refined art would have been so ill-bred as to express
it. He wished them the
bon appetito
, as a tall chasseur came out
to say that her Ladyship was at home; and, with a slacked rein
the fiery horse sprang through the gateway, and the marble court
of the palace rang with his prancing hoofs.
He who was idle and bought flowers at the Caf of the Colonna,
at Florence, will have remarked, as he sat in his chair upon the
street in the sultry evening, the richly-ornamented terrace and
balustrade of the Palazzo Corsi, giving upon the Piazza Trinita.
The dark old Ghibelline palace of the Strozzi lets the eye down
upon it, as it might pass from a helmeted knight with closed vizor
to his unbonneted and laughing page. The crimson curtains of
the window opening upon the terrace, at the time of our story,
reminded every passing Florentine of the lady who dwelt within
a descendant of one of the haughtiest lines of English chivalry
resident in Italy, since many years for health, but bearing, in her
delicate frame and exquisitely transparent features, the loftiest
type of patrician beauty that had ever filled the eye that looked
upon her. In the inner heaven of royal exclusiveness at the Pitti
in its constellation of rank and witthe Lady Geraldine had
long been the worshipped and ascendant cynosure. Happy in a
husband without rank and but of moderate fortune, she
maintained
the spotless character of an English wife in this sphere of
conventional corruption; and, though the idol of the Duke and
his nobles, it would have been like a whisper against the purity of
the brightest Pleiad, to have linked her name with love.
With her feet upon a sofa covered with a gossamer cashmere,
her lovely head pillowed on a cushion of silk, and a slight
stand, within arm's length, holding a vase of flowers and the
volume from which she had been reading, the Lady Geraldine
received the Count Basil Spirifort, some time
attach
to the
Russian embassy at Paris (where he had first sunned his eyes in
her beauty), and at present the newly-appointed secretary to the
minister of the same monarch near the court of Tuscany.
Without a bow, but with the hasty step and gesture of a long
absent and favored friend, the Count Basil ran to the proffered
hand, and pressed its alabaster fingers to his lips. Had the more
common acquaintances of the diplomate seen him at this moment,
they would have marvelled how the mask of manhood may drop,
and disclose the ingenuous features of the boy. The secretary
knew his species, and the Lady Geraldine was one of those women
for whom the soul is unwilling to possess a secret.
After the first inquiries were over, the lady questioned her
recovered favorite of his history since they had parted. I left
you, she said, swimming the dangerous tide of life at Paris.
How have you come to shore?
Thanks, perhaps, to your friendship, which made life worth
the struggle! For the two extremes, however, you know what I
was at Parisand yesterday I was a wandering artist in velveteen
and a sombrero!
Lady Geraldine laughed.
Ah! you look at my curlsbut Macassar is at a discount!
It is the only grace I cherished in my incognito.
A rsumer
I
got terribly out of love by the end of the year after we parted,
and as terribly in debt. My promotion in diplomacy did
not
arrive, and the extreme hour for my credit
did
. Pozzo di Borgo
kindly procured me
cong
for a couple of years, and I dived
presently
under a broad-brimmed hat, got into a vetturino with
portfolio and pencils, joined a troop of wandering artists, and, with
my patrimony at nurse, have been two years looking at life,
without spectacles, at Venice.
And painting?
Painting!
Might one see a specimen? asked the Lady Geraldine, with
an incredulous smile.
I regret that my immortal efforts in oils are in the possession
of a certain Venetian, who lets the fifth floor of a tenement
washed by the narrowest canal in that fair city. But, if your
Ladyship cares to see a drawing or two
He rang the bell, and his
jocki Anglais
presently brought, from
the pocket of his cabriolet, a wayworn and thinly-furnished
portfolio
.
The Lady Geraldine turned over a half-dozen indifferent
views of Venice, but the last cartoon in the portfolio made her
start.
La Marchesa del Marmore! she exclaimed, looking at
Count Basil, with an inquiring and half-uneasy eye.
Is it well drawn? he asked quietly.
Well drawn?it is a sketch worthy of Raphael. Do you
really draw so well as this, orshe added, after a slight
hesitation
is
it a miracle of love?
It is a divine head, soliloquised the Russian, half closing his
eyes, and looking at the drawing from a distance, as if to fill up
the imperfect outline from his memory.
The Lady Geraldine laid her hand on his arm. My dear
Basil, she said seriously, I should be wretched if I thought
your happiness was in the power of this woman. Do you love
her?
The portrait was not drawn by me, he answered, though I
have a reason for wishing her to think so. It was done by a
fellow-traveller
of mine, whom I wish to make a sketch of yourself,
and I have brought it here to interest you in him as an artist.
Mais revenons a nos moutons;
la Marchesa was also a
fellow-traveller
of mine, and without loving her too violently, I owe her
a certain debt of courtesy contracted on the way. Will you
assist me to pay it?
Relieved of her fears, and not at all suspecting the good faith
of the diplomatist in his acknowledgments of gratitude, the Lady
Geraldine inquired simply how she could serve him.
In the twenty-four hours since my arrival at Florence, he said,
I have put myself, as you will see,
au courant
of the minor
politics
of the Pitti. Thanks to my Parisian renown, the duke has
enrolled me already under the back-stairs oligarchy, and
to-morrow
night I shall sup with you in the saloon of Hercules after the
ball is over. La Marchesa, as you well know, has, with all her
rank and beauty, never been able to set foot within those guarded
penetralia
soit
her malicious tongue,
soit
the interest, against
her, of the men she has played upon her hook too freely. The
road to her heart, if there be one, lies over that threshold,
and I would take the toll. Do you understand me, most
beautiful
Lady Geraldine?
The Count Basil imprinted another kiss upon the fingers of the
fair Englishwoman, as she promised to put into his hand, the
following
night, the illuminated ticket which was to repay, as she
thought, too generously, a debt of gratitude; and, plucking a
flower from her vase for his bosom, he took his leave to return at
twilight to dinner. Dismissing his cabriolet at the gate, he turned
on foot toward the church of San Gaetano, and, with an
expression
of unusual elation in his step and countenance, entered
the
trattoria
, where dined at that moment his companions of the
pencil.
The green lamps, glittering by thousands amid the foliage of the
Boboli, had attained their full brightness, and the long-lived
Italian day had died over the distant mountains of Carrara,
leaving
its inheritance of light apparently to the stars, who, on their
fields of deepening blue, sparkled, each one like the leader of an
unseen host, in the depths of heaven, himself the foremost and the
most radiant. The night was balmy and voluptuous. The
music of the Ducal band swelled forth from the perfumed
apartments
on the air. A single nightingale, far back in the
wilderness
of the garden, poured from his melodious heart a chant of
the most passionate melancholy. The sentinel of the body-guard,
stationed at the limit of the spray of the fountain, leaned on his
halberd and felt his rude senses melt in the united spells of luxury
and nature. The ministers of a monarch's pleasure had done
their utmost to prepare a scene of royal delight, and night and
summer had flung in their enchantments when ingenuity was
exhausted
.
The dark architectural mass of the Pitti, pouring a blaze of
light scarce endurable from its deeply-sunk windows, looked like
the side of an enchanted mountain laid open for the revels of
sorcery. The aigrette and plume passed by; the tiara and the
jewel upon the breast; the gayly-dressed courtiers and glittering
dames; and, to that soldier at his dewy post, it seemed like the
realized raving of the improvisatore when he is lost in some fable
of Araby. Yet, within, walked malice and hate, and the light and
perfume, that might have fed an angel's heart with love, but
deepened in many a beating bosom the consuming fires of envy.
With the gold key of office on his cape, the Grand
Chamberlain
stood at the feet of the Dowager Grand Duchess, and, by a
sign to the musicians, hidden in a latticed gallery behind the
Corinthian capital of the hall, retarded or accelerated the soft
measure of the waltz. On a raised seat in the rear of the
chairs of state, sat the ladies of honor and the noble dames
nearest
allied to royal blood; one solitary and privileged intruder
alone sharing the elevated placethe lady Geraldine. Dressed
in white, her hair wound about her head in the simplest form,
yet developing its divine shape with the clear outline of statuary,
her eyes lambent with purity and sweetness, heavily fringed with
lashes a shade darker than the light auburn braided on her
temples
,
and the tint of the summer's most glowing rose turned out
from the threadlike parting of her lips, she was a vision of
loveliness to take into the memory, as the poet enshrines in his
soul the impossible shape of his ideal, and consumes youth and
age searching in vain for its like. Fair Lady Geraldine! thou
wilt read these passionate words from one whose worship of thy
intoxicating loveliness has never before found utterance, but, if
this truly-told tale should betray the hand that has dared to
describe
thy beauty, in thy next orisons to St. Mary of Pity, breathe
from those bright lips, a prayer that he may forget thee!
By the side of the Lady Geraldine, but behind the chair of the
Grand Duchess, who listened to his conversation with singular
delight
,
stood a slight young man of uncommon personal beauty, a
stranger apparently to every other person present. His brilliant
uniform alone betrayed him to be in the Russian diplomacy; and
the marked distinction shown him, both by the reigning Queen of
the Court, and the more powerful and inaccessible queen of
beauty
,
marked him as an object of keen and universal curiosity.
By the time the fifth mazurka had concluded its pendulous
refrain
,
the Grand Chamberlain had tolerably well circulated the
name and rank of Count Basil Spirifort, the renowned wit and
elegant
of Paris, newly appointed to the court of his royal
highness
of Tuscany. Fair eyes wandered amid his sunny curls, and
beating bosoms hushed their pulses as he passed.
Count Basil knew the weight of a first impression. Count
Basil knew also the uses of contempt. Upon the first principle
he kept his place between the Grand Duchess and Lady
Geraldine
,
exerting his deeply studied art of pleasing, to draw upon
himself their exclusive attention. Upon the second principle,
he was perfectly unconscious of the presence of another human
being; and neither the gliding step of the small-eared princess
Sin the waltz, nor the stately advance of the last female
of the Medici in the mazurka, distracted his large blue eyes a
moment from their idleness. With one hand on the eagle-hilt of
his sword, and his side leaned against the high cushion of red
velvet honored by the pressure of the Lady Geraldine, he gazed
up into that beaming face, when not bending respectfully to the
Duchess, and drank steadfastly from her beauty, as the lotus-cup
drinks light from the sun.
The new Secretary had calculated well. In the deep recess of
the window looking toward San Miniato, stood a lady, nearly
hidden
from view by the muslin curtains just stirring with the
vibration
of the music, who gazed on the immediate circle of the
Grand Duchess, with an interest that was not attempted to be
disguised. On her first entrance into the hall, the Marchesa del
Marmore had recognised in the new minion of favor her
impassioned
lover of the lagoon, her slighted acquaintance of the
cathedral. When the first shock of surprise was over, she looked
on the form which she had found beautiful even in the disguise
of poverty, and, forgetting her insulting repulse when he would
have claimed in public the smile she had given him when
unobserved
,
she recalled with delight every syllable he had murmured
in her ear, and every look she had called forth in the light of a
Venetian moon. The man who had burned, upon the altar of her
vanity, the most intoxicating incensewho had broken through
the iron rules of convention and ceremony, to throw his homage
at her feetwho had portrayed so incomparably (she believed)
with his love-inspired pencil, the features imprinted on his heart
this chance-won worshipper, this daring but gifted plebeian, as
she had thought him, had suddenly shot into her sphere, and
become
a legitimate object of love; and, beautified by the splendor
of dress, and distinguished by the preference and favor of those
incomparably above her, he seemed tenfold, to her eyes, the
perfection
of adorable beauty. As she remembered his eloquent
devotion to herself, and saw the interest taken in him by a woman
whom she hated and had calumniateda woman who she
believed
stood between her and all the light of existenceshe
anticipated
the triumph of taking him from her side, of exhibiting him
to the world as a falcon seduced from his first quarry; and, never
doubting that so brilliant a favorite would control the talisman of
the Paradise she had so long wished to enter, she panted for the
moment when she should catch his eye and draw him from his
lure, and already heard the Chamberlain's voice in her ear,
commanding
her presence, after the ball, in the saloon of Hercules.
The Marchesa had been well observed from the first, by the
wily diplomate. A thorough adept in the art (so necessary to his
profession) of seeing without appearing to see, he had scarce lost
a shade of the varying expressions of her countenance; and
while she fancied him perfectly unconscious of her presence, he
read her tell-tale features as if they had given utterance to her
thoughts. He saw, with secret triumph, the effect of his
brilliant
position upon her proud and vain heart; watched her while
she made use of her throng of despised admirers to create a
sensation
near him, and attract his notice; and, when the ball wore
on, and he was still in unwearied and exclusive attendance upon
the Lady Geraldine, he gazed after her with a momentary curl of
triumph on his lip, as she took up her concealed position in the
embayed window, and abandoned herself to the bitter occupation
of watching the happiness of her rival. The Lady Geraldine
had never been so animated since her first appearance at the
Court of Tuscany.
It was past midnight when the Grand-Duke, flushed and tired
with dancing, came to the side of the Lady Geraldine. Count
Basil gave place, and, remaining a moment in nominal obedience
to the sovereign's polite request, which he was too politic to
construe
literally, he looked down the dance with the air of one who
has turned his back on all that could interest him, and, passing
close to the concealed position of the Marchesa, stepped out upon
the balcony.
The air was cool, and the fountain played refreshingly below.
The Count Basil was one of those minds which never have so
much leisure for digression as when they are most occupied. A
love, as deep and profound as the abysses of his soul, was
weaving
thread for thread with a revenge worthy of a Mohican; yet,
after trying in vain to count eight in the Pleiades, he raised
himself
upon the marble balustrade, and, perfectly anticipating the
interruption to his solitude which presently occurred, began to
speculate aloud on the dead and living at that hour beneath the
roof of the Pitti.
A painter's mistress, he said, immortal in the touch of
her paramour's pencil, is worshipped for centuries on these walls
by the pilgrims of art; while the warm perfection of all
loveliness
the
purest and divinest of highborn womenwill perish
utterly with the eyes that have seen her! The Bella of Titian,
the Fornarina of Raffaellepeasant-girls of Italyhave, at this
moment, more value in this royal palace, than the breathing forms
that inhabit it! The Lady Geraldine herself, to whom the
sovereign
offers at this moment his most flattering homage, would
be less a loss to him than either! Yet they despise the gods of
the pencil who may thus make them immortal! The dull blood
in their noble veins, that never bred a thought beyond the
instincts
of their kind, would look down, forsooth, on the inventive
and celestial ichor, that inflames the brain, and prompts the fiery
hand of the painter! How long will this very sovereign live in
the memories of men? The murderous Medici, the ambitious
Cardinals, the abandoned women, of an age gone by, hang in
imperishable
colors on his walls; while of him, the lord of this
land of genius, there is not a bust or a picture that would bring a
sequin in the market-place! They would buy genius in these
days like wine, and throw aside the flask in which it ripened.
Raffaelle and Buonarotti were companions for a Pope and his
cardinals: Titian was an honored guest for the Doge. The
stimulus to immortalize these noble friends was in the love
they bore them; and the secret in their power to do it, lay half
in the knowledge of their characters, gained by daily intimacy.
Painters were princes then, as they are beggars now; and the
princely art is beggared as well!
The Marchesa del Marmore stepped out upon the balcony,
leaning on the arm of the Grand Chamberlain. The soliloquizing
secretary had foretold to himself both her coming and her
companion
.
Monsieur le Comte
, said the Chamberlain,
la Marchesa del
Marmore
wishes for the pleasure of your acquaintance.
Count Basil bowed low, and, in that low and musical tone of
respectful devotion which, real or counterfeit, made him
irresistible
to a woman who had a soul to be thrilled, he repeated the
usual nothings upon the beauty of the night; and when the
Chamberlain returned to his duties, the Marchesa walked forth
with her companion to the cool and fragrant alleys of the garden,
and, under the silent and listening stars, implored forgiveness
for her pride; and, with the sudden abandonment peculiar to the
clime, poured into his ear the passionate and weeping avowal of
her sorrow and love.
Those hours of penitence in the embayed window, thought
Count Basil, were healthy for your soul. And, as she walked
by his side, leaning heavily on his arm, and half-dissolved in a
confiding tenderness, his thoughts reverted to another and a far
sweeter voice; and, while the carressing words of the Marchesa
fell on an unlistening ear, his footsteps insensibly turned back to
the lighted hall.
VI.
As
the daylight stole softly over Vallombrosa, the luxurious
chariot of the Marchesa del Marmore stopped at the door of
Count Basil. The Lady Geraldine's suit had been successful;
and the hitherto excluded Florentine had received, from the
hand of the man she had once so ignorantly scorned, a privilege
for which she would have bartered her salvation: she had supped
at his side in the saloon of Hercules. With many faults of
character
,
she was an Italian in feeling, and had a capacity, like all
her countrywomen, for a consuming and headlong passion. She
had better have been born of marble.
I have lifted you to heaven, said Count Basil, as her
chariot-wheels
rolled from his door; but it is as the eagle soars
into the clouds with the serpent, We will see how you will
relish
the fall!
PART II.
The
Grand-Duke's carriages, with their six horses and
outriders
,
had turned down the Borg'ognisanti, and the City of the
Red Lily, waking from her noonday slumber, was alive with the
sound of wheels. The sun was sinking over the Apennine which
kneels at the gate of Florence; the streets were cool and shadowy;
the old women, with the
bambina
between their knees, braided
straw at the doors; the booted guardsman paced his black charger
slowly over the jeweller's bridge; the picture-dealer brought
forward
his brightest master to the fading light; and while the
famous churches of that fairest city of the earth called to the
Ave-Maria with impatient bell, the gallantry and beauty of
Tuscany sped through the dampening air with their swift horses,
meeting and passing, with gay greetings, amid the green alleys of
the Cascine.
The twilight had become grey, when the carriages and
horsemen, scattered in hundreds through the interlaced roads of
this loveliest of parks, turned by common consent toward the
spacious square in the centre, and, drawing up, in thickly-serried
ranks, the
soire on wheels
, the
runion en plein air
, which is one
of the most delightful of the peculiar customs of Florence,
commenced
its healthful gayeties. The showy carriages of the
Grand-Duke and the ex-King of Wurtemberg (whose rank would
not permit them to share in the familiarities of the hour)
disappeared
by the avenue skirting the bank of the Arno, and, with
much delicate and some desperate specimens of skill, the
coachmen
of the more exclusive nobility threaded the embarrassed
press of vehicles, and laid their wheels together on the southern
edge of the piazza. The beaux in the saddle, disembarrassed of
ladies and axletrees, enjoyed their usual butterfly privilege of
roving, and, with light rein and ready spur, pushed their impatient
horses to the coronetted panels of the loveliest or most powerful;
the laugh of the giddy was heard here and there over the pawing
of restless hoofs; an occasional screamhalf of apprehension,
half of admirationrewarded the daring caracole of some young
and bold rider; and, while the first star sprang to its place, and
the dew of heaven dropped into the false flowers in the hat of the
belle, and into the thirsting lips of the violet in the field, (
simplicity
,
like virtue, is
its
own reward!), the low murmur of
calumny and compliment, of love and light-heartedness, of
politeness
,
politics, puns, and poetry, arose over that assembly upon
wheels: and, if it was not a scene and an hour of happiness, it was
the fault neither of the fragrant eve nor of the provisions of
nature and fortune. The material for happiness was there.
A showy
calche
, with panels of dusky crimson, the
hammer-cloth
of the same shade, edged with a broad fringe of white, the
wheels slightly picked out with the same colors, and the coachman
and footman in corresponding liveries, was drawn up near the
southern edge of the Piazza. A narrow alley had been left for
horsemen, between this equipage and the adjoining ones, closed up
at the extremity, however, by a dark-green and very plain
chariot, placed, with a bold violation of etiquette, directly across
the line, and surrounded, just now, by two or three persons of the
highest rank, leaning from their saddles in earnest conversation
with the occupant. Not far from the
calche
, mounted upon an
English blood-horse of great beauty, a young man had just drawn
rein as if interrupted only for a moment on some passing errand,
and, with his hat slightly raised, was paying his compliments to
the venerable Prince Poniatowski, at that time the Amphytrion
of Florence. From moment to moment, as the pauses occurred
in the exchange of courteous phrases, the rider, whose spurred
heel was close at his saddle-girths, stole an impatient glance up
the avenue of carriages to the dark-green chariot, and, excited by
the lifted rein and the proximity of the spur, the graceful horse
fretted on his minion feet, and the bending figures from a hundred
vehicles, and the focus of bright eyes radiating from all sides to
the spot, would have betrayed, even to a stranger, that the
horseman
was of no common mark. Around his uncovered temples
floated fair and well-cherished locks of the sunniest auburn; and,
if there was beauty in the finely-drawn lines of his lips, there was
an inexpressibly fierce spirit as well.
II.
The Count Basil had been a month at Florence. In that time
he had contrived to place himself between the Duke's ear and all
the avenues of favor, and had approached as near, perhaps nearer,
to the hearts of the women of his court. A singular and instinctive
knowledge of the weaknesses of human nature, perfected and
concealed
by conversance with the consummate refinement of life at
Paris, remarkable personal beauty, and a quality of scornful
bitterness
for which no one could divine a reason in a character and
fate else so happily mingled, but which, at the same time, added to
his fascination, had given Count Basil a command over the varied
stops of society, equalled by few players on that difficult and
capricious instrument. His worldly ambition went swimmingly
on, and the same wind filled the sails of his lighter ventures as
well. The love of the Marchesa del Marmore, as he had very
well anticipated, grew with his influence and renown. A woman's
pride, he perfectly knew, is difficult to wake after she has once
believed herself adored; and, satisfied that the portrait taken on
the lagoon, and the introduction he had given her to the
exclusive
penetralia of the Pitti, would hold her till his revenge was
complete, he left her love for him to find its own food in his
successes
,
and never approached her but to lay to her heart, more
mordently, the serpents of jealousy and despair.
For the Lady Geraldine the Count Basil had conceived a love,
the deepest of which his nature was capable. Long as he had
known her, it was a passion born in Italy, and, while it partook of
the qualities of the clime, it had for its basis the habitual and
well-founded respect of a virtuous and sincere friendship. At
their first acquaintance at Paris, the lovely Englishwoman,
newly arrived from the purer moral atmosphere of her own
country, was moving in the dissolute, but skilfully disguised
society of the Faubourg St. Germain, with the simple
unconsciousness
of the pure in heart, innocent herself, and naturally
unsuspicious of others. The perfect frankness with which she
established an intimacy with the clever and accomplished
attach
,
had soon satisfied that clear-sighted person that there was no
passion in her preference, and, giddy with the thousand pleasures
of that metropolis of delight, he had readily sunk his first startled
admiration of her beauty in an affectionate and confiding
friendship
.
He had thus shown her the better qualities of his character
only, and, charmed with his wit and penetration, and something
flattered, perhaps, with the devotion of so acknowledged an
autocrat of fashion and talent, she had formed an attachment for
him that had all the earnestness of love without its passion.
They met at Florence, but the knowledge of good and evil
had, by this time, driven the Lady Geraldine from her Eden of
unconsciousness. Still as irreproachable in conduct, and perhaps
as pure in heart as before, an acquaintance with the forms of vice
had introduced into her manners those ostensible cautions which,
while they protect, suggest also what is to be feared.
A change had taken place also in Count Basil. He had left
the vitreous and mercurial clime of France, with its volatile and
superficial occupations, for the voluptuous and indolent air of
Italy, and the study of its impassioned deifications of beauty.
That which had before been in him an instinct of gay pleasure
a pursuit which palled in the first moment of success, and was
second to his ambition or his vanityhad become, in those two
years of a painter's life, a thirst both of the senses and the
imagination
,
which had usurped the very throne of his soul. Like
the Hindoo youth, who finds the gilded plaything of his childhood
elevated in his maturer years into a god, he bowed his heart to
what he held so lightly, and brought the costly sacrifice of time
and thought to its altars. He had fed his eyes upon the divine
glories of the pencil, and upon the breathing wonders of love in
marble, beneath the sky and in the dissolving air in which they
rose to the hand of inspiration; and, with his eye disciplined, and
his blood fused with taste and enthusiasm, that idolatry of beauty,
which had before seemed sensual or unreal, kindled its first fires
in his mind, and his senses were intoxicated with the incense.
There is a kind of compromise in the effects of the atmosphere
and arts of Italy. If the intellect takes a warmer hue in its study
of the fair models of antiquity, the senses in turn become more
refined and intellectual. In other latitudes and lands woman is
loved more coldly. After the brief reign of a passion of instinct,
she is happy if she can retain her empire by habit, or the qualities
of the heart. That divine form, meant to assimilate her to the
angels, has never been recognised by the dull eye that should
have seen in it a type of her soul. To the love of the painter or
the statuary, or to his who has made himself conversant with their
models, is added the imperishable enthusiasm of a captivating and
exalted study. The mistress of his heart is the mistress of his
mind. She is the breathing realization of that secret ideal which
exists in every mind, but which, in men ignorant of the fine arts,
takes another form, and becomes a woman's rival and usurper.
She is like nothing in ambitionshe is like nothing in science or
businessnothing in out-of-door pleasures. If politics, or the
chase, or the acquisition of wealth, is the form of this ruling
passion, she is unassociated with that which is nearest his heart,
and he returns to her with an exhausted interest and a flagging
fancy. It is her strongest tie upon his affection, even, that she
is his refuge when unfit for that which occupies him mostin his
fatigue, his disappointment, his vacuity of head and heart. He
thinks of her only as she receives him in his most worthless
hours; and, as his refreshed intellects awake, she is forgotten
with the first thought of his favorite themefor what has a
woman's loveliness to do with that?
Count Basil had not concluded his first interview with the Lady
Geraldine, without marvelling at the new feelings with which he
looked upon her. He had never before realized her singular and
adorable beauty. The exquisitely-turned head, the small and
pearly ears, the spiritual nostril, the softly-moulded chin, the
clear loftiness of expression yet inexpressible delicacy and
brightness
in the lips, and a throat and bustthan which those of
Faustina in the delicious marble of the Gallery of Florence might
be less envied by the Queen of Lovehis gaze wandered over
these, and followed her in the harmony of her motions, and the
native and unapproachable grace of every attitude; and the
pictures
he had so passionately studied seemed to fade in his mind,
and the statues he had half worshipped seemed to descend from
their pedestals depreciated. The Lady Geraldine, for the first
time,
felt
his eye. For the first time in their acquaintance, she
was offended with its regard. Her embarrassment was read by
the quick diplomate, and at that moment sprang into being a
passion, which perhaps had died but for the conscious
acknowledgment
of her rebuke.
Up to the evening in the Cascine, with which the second
chapter of this mainly true tale commences, but one of the two
leading threads, in the Count Basil's woof, had woven well. The
jealous are the damned, and the daily and deadly agony of the
Marchesa del Marmore was a dark ground from which his love to
the Lady Geraldine rose to his own eye in heightened relief. His
dearest joy forwarded with equal step his dearest revenge; and
while he could watch the working of his slow torture in the
fascinated heart of his victim, he was content to suspend a blow
to which that of death would be a mercy. The law, said Count
Basil, as he watched her quivering and imploring lip, takes
cognizance but of the murder of the
body
. It has no retribution
for the keener dagger of the
soul
.
III.
The conversation between the Russian Secretary and the
Prince Poniatowski ended at last in a graceful bow from the
former to his horse's neck; and the quicker rattling of the small
hoofs on the ground, as the fine creature felt the movement in the
saddle and prepared to bound away, drew all eyes once more
upon the handsomest and most idolized gallant of Florence. The
narrow lane of carriages, commencing with the showy
calche
of
the Marchesa del Marmore, and closed up by the plain chariot of
the Lady Geraldine, was still open; and, with a glance at the
latter which snfficiently indicated his destination, Count Basil
raised his spurred heel, and, with a smile of delight and the
quickness of a barb in the desert, galloped toward the opening.
In the same instant the Marchesa del Marmore gave a convulsive
spring forward, and, in obedience to an imperative order, her
coachman violently drew rein and laid the back and forward
wheels of the
ealche
directly across his path. Met in full career
by this sudden obstacle, the horse of the Russian reared high in
10
air, but, ere the screams of apprehension had arisen from the
adjacent carriages, the silken bridle was slacked, and with a low
bow to the foiled and beautiful Marchesa as he shot past, he
brushed the hammer-cloths of the two scarce separated
carriages
,
and, at the same instant, stood at the chariot window of the
Lady Geraldine, as calm and respectful as if he had never known
danger or emotion.
A hundred eyes had seen the expression of his face as he leaped
past the unhappy woman, and the drama, of which that look was
the key, was understood in Florence. The Lady Geraldine alone,
seated far back in her chariot, was unconscious of the risk run for
the smile with which she greeted its hero; and unconscious, as
well, of the poignant jealousy and open mortification she had
innocently assisted to inflict, she stretched her fair and
transparent
hand from the carriage, and stroked the glossy neek of his
horse, and while the Marchesa del Marmore drove past with a
look of inexpressible anguish and hate, and the dispersing nobles
and dames took their way to the city gates, Count Basil leaned
close to the ear of that loveliest of breathing creatures, and forgot,
as
she
forgot in listening to the bewildering music of his voice,
that the stars had risen, or that the night was closing around
them.
The Cascine had long been silent when the chariot of the Lady
Geraldine took its way to the town, and, with the reins loose upon
his horse's neck, Count Basil followed at a slower pace, lost in
the revery of a tumultuous passion. The sparkling and
unobstructed
stars broke through the leafy roof of the avenue whose
silence was disturbed by those fine and light-stepping hoofs, and
the challenge of the Duke's forester, going his rounds ere the
gates closed, had its own deep-throated echo for its answer.
The Arno rippled among the rushes on its banks, the occasional
roll of wheels passing the paved arch of the Ponte Seraglio, came
faintly down the river upon the moist wind, the pointed cypresses
of the convent of Bello Sguardo laid their slender fingers against
the lowest stars in the southern horizon, and, with his feet pressed,
carelessly, far through his stirrups, and his head dropped on his
bosom, the softened diplomate turned instinctively to the left in
the last diverging point of the green alleys, and his horse's ears
were already pricked at the tread, before the gate, of the
watchful
and idle
doganieri
.
Close under the city walls on this side Florence, the traveller
will remember that the trees are more thickly serried, and the
stone seats, for the comfort and pleasure of those who would step
forth from the hot streets for an hour of fresh air and rest, are
mossy with the depth of the perpetual shade. In the midst of
this dark avenue, the unguided animal beneath the careless and
forgetful rider suddenly stood still, and the next moment starting
aside, a female sprang high against his neck, and Count Basil,
ere awake from his revery, felt the glance of a dagger-blade
across his bosom.
With the slender wrist that had given the blow firmly arrested
in his left hand, the Count Basil slowly dismounted, and, after a
steadfast look, by the dim light, into the face of the lovely
assassin
,
he pressed her fingers respectfully, and with well
counterfeited
emotion, to his lips.
Twice since the Ave-Maria! he said, in a tone of
reproachful
tenderness, and against a life that is your own!
He could see, even in that faint light, the stern compression of
those haughty lips, and the flash of the darkest eyes of the Val
d'Arno. But leading her gently to a seat, he sat beside her, and,
with scarce ten brief moments of low-toned and consummate
eloquence
,
he once more deluded her soul!
We meet to-morrow, she said, as, after a burst of
irrepressible
tears, she disengaged herself from his neck, and looked
toward the end of the avenue, where Count Basil had already
heard the pawing of her impatient horses.
To morrow! he answered; but,
mia carissima
! he
continued
,
opening his breast to stanch the blood of his wound, you
owe me a concession after this rude evidence of your love.
She looked into his face as if answer was superfluous.
Drive to my palazzo at noon, and remain with me till the
Ave-Maria.
For but half a moment the impassioned Italian hesitated.
Though the step he demanded of her was apparently without
motive or reasonthough it was one that sacrificed, to a whim,
her station, her fortune, and her friendsshe hesitated but to
question her reason if the wretched price of this sacrifice would
be paidif the love, to which she fled from this world and heaven,
was her own. In other countries, the
crime
of infidelity is
punished: in Italy it is the
appearance
only that is criminal. In
proportion as the sin is overlooked, the violation of the outward
proprieties of life is severely visited; and, while a lover is
stipulated
for in the marriage-contract, an open visit to that lover's
house is an offence which brands the perpetrator with irremediable
shame. The Marchesa del Marmore well knew, that, in going
forth from the ancestral palace of her husband on a visit to Count
Basil, she took leave of it for ever. The equipage that would
bear her to him would never return for her; the protection, the
fortune, the noble relations, the troops of friends, would all drop
from her. In the pride of her youth and beautyfrom the
highest
pinnacle of rankfrom the shelter of fortune and esteem
she would descend, by a single step, to be a beggar for life and
love from the mercy of the heart she fled to!
I will come, she said, in a firm voice, looking close into his
face, as if she would read in his dim features the prophetic answer
of his soul.
The Count Basil strained her to his bosom, and, starting back,
as if with the pain of his wound, he pleaded the necessity of a
surgeon
,
and bade her a hasty good-night. And, while she gained
her own carriage in secrecy, he rode round to the other gate,
which opens upon the Borg'ognisanti, and, dismounting at the
Caf Colonna, where the artists were at this hour usually
assembled
,
he sought out his fellow-traveller, Giannino Speranza, who
had sketched the Marchesa upon the lagoon, and made an
appointment
with him for the morrow.
IV.
While the Count Basil's revenge sped thus merrily, the just
Fates were preparing for him a retribution in his love. The
mortification of the Marchesa del Marmore, at the Cascine, had
been made the subject of conversation at the
prima sera
of the
Lady Geraldine; and, other details of the same secret drama
transpiring at the same time, the whole secret of Count Basil's
feelings toward that unfortunate woman flashed clearly and fully
upon her. His motives for pretending to have drawn the portrait
of the lagoonfor procuring her an admission to the exclusive
suppers of the Pittifor a thousand things which had been
unaccountable
,
or referred to more amiable causeswere at once
unveiled. Even yet, with no suspicion of the extent of his
revenge, the Lady Geraldine felt an indignant pity for the
unconscious
victim, and a surprised disapproval of the character
ummasked to her eye. Upon further reflection, her brow flushed
to remember that she herself had been made the most effective
tool of his revenge; and, as she recalled circumstance after
circumstance
in the last month's history, the attention and
preference
he had shown her, and which had gratified her, perhaps,
more than she admitted to herself, seemed to her sensitive and
resentful mind to have been only the cold instruments of jealousy.
Incapable as she was of an unlawful passion, the unequalled
fascinations
of Count Basil had silently found their way to her heart,
and, if her indignation was kindled by a sense of justice and
womanly pity, it was fed and fanned unaware by mortified pride.
She rang, and sent an order to the gate that she was to be
denied for the future to Count Basil Spirifort.
The servant had appeared with his silver tray in his hand, and,
before leaving her presence to communicate the order, he
presented
her with a letter. Well foreseeing the
claircissement
which must follow the public scene in the Cascine, the Count
Basil had left the caf for his own palazzo; and, in a letter, of
which the following is the passage most important to our story,
he revealed, to the lady he loved, a secret, which he hoped would
anticipate the common rumor:
* * * * * But these passionate words will have offended
your ear, dearest lady, and I must pass to a theme on which I
shall be less eloquent. You will hear to-night, perhaps, that
which, with all your imagination, will scarce prepare you for
what you will hear to-morrow. The Marchesa del Marmore is
the victim of a revenge which has only been second in my heart
to the love I have for the first time breathed to you. I can never
hope that you will either understand, or forgive, the bitterness in
which it springs; yet it is a demon to which I am delivered, soul
and body, and no spirit but my own can know its power. When
I have called it by its name, and told you of its exasperation, if
you do not pardon, you will pity me.
You know that I am a Russian, and you know the station my
talents have won me; but you do not know that I was born a serf
and a slave! If you could rend open my heart and see the pool
of blackness and bitterness that lies in its bottomfallen, drop
by drop, from this accursed remembrancethere would be little
need to explain to you how this woman has offended me. Had I
been honorably born, like yourself, I feel that I could have been,
like you, an angel of light; as it is, the contumely of a
look
has
stirred me to a revenge which has in it, I do not need to be
told, the darkest elements of murder.
My early history is of no importance, yet I may tell you it
was such as to expose to every wind this lacerated nerve. In a
foreign land, and holding an official rank, it was seldom breathed
upon. I wore, mostly, a gay heart at Paris. In my late exile at
Venice I had time to brood upon my dark remembrance, and it
was revived and fed by the melancholy of my solitude. The
obscurity
in which I lived, and the occasional comparison between
myself and some passing noble in the Piazza, served to remind me,
could I have forgotten it. I never dreamed of love in this
humble
disguise, and so never felt the contempt that had most power
to wound me. On receiving the letters of my new appointment,
however, this cautious humility did not wait to be put off with my
sombrero. I started for Florence, clad in the habiliments of
poverty
,
but with the gay mood of a courtier beneath. The first
burst of my newly-released feelings was admiration for a woman
of singular beauty, who stood near me on one of the most
love-awakening
and delicious eves that I ever remember. My heart
was overflowing, and she permitted me to breathe my passionate
adoration in her ear. The Marchesa del Marmore, but for the
scorn of the succeeding day, would, I think, have been the
mistress
of my soul. Strangely enough, I had seen
you
without
loving you.
I have told you, as a bagatelle that might amuse you, my
rencontre with del Marmore and his dame in the cathedral of
Bologna. The look she gave me, there, sealed her doom. It was
witnessed by the companions of my poverty, and the concentrated
resentment of years sprang up at the insult. Had it been a man,
I must have struck him dead where he stood: she was a woman,
and I swore the downfall of her pride.
Thus briefly dismissing the chief topic of his letter, Count Basil
returned to the pleading of his love. It was dwelt on more
eloquently
than his revenge; but as the Lady Geraldine scarce read
it to the end, it need not retard the procession of events in our
story. The fair Englishwoman sat down beneath the Etruscan
lamp, whose soft light illumined a brow cleared, as if by a sweep
from the wing of her good angel, of the troubled dream which
had overhung it, and, in brief and decided, but kind and warning
words, replied to the letter of Count Basil.
V.
It was noon on the following day, and the Contadini from the
hills were settling to their siesta on the steps of the churches, and
against the columns of the Piazza del Gran' Duea. The artists
alone, in the cool gallery, and in the tempered halls of the Pitti,
shook off the drowsiness of the hour, and strained sight and thought
upon the immortal canvas from which they drew; while the
sculptor, in his brightening studio, weary of the mallet, yet
excited
by the bolder light, leaned on the rough block behind him,
and, with listless body but wakeful and fervent eye, studied the
last touches upon his marble.
Prancing hoofs, and the sharp quick roll peculiar to the wheels
of carriages of pleasure, awakened the aristocratic sleepers of
the Via del Servi, and with a lash and jerk of violence, the
coachman of the Marchesa del Marmore, enraged at the loss of
his noonday repose, brought up her showy
calche
at the door of
Count Basil Spirifort. The fair occupant of that luxurious
vehicle
was pale, but the brightness of joy and hope burned almost
fiercely in her eye.
The doors flew open as the Marchesa descended, and, following
a servant in the Count's livery, of whom she asked no question,
she found herself in a small saloon, furnished with the peculiar
luxury which marks the apartment of a bachelor, and darkened
like a painter's room. The light came in from a single tall
window
,
curtained below, and under it stood an easel, at which, on
her first entrance, a young man stood sketching the outline of a
female head. As she advanced, looking eagerly around for another
face, the artist laid down his palette, and, with a low reverence,
presented her with a note from Count Basil. It informed her
that political news of the highest importance had called him
suddenly
to the cabinet of his
chef
, but that he hoped to be with her
soon; and, meantime, he begged of her, as a first favor in his
newly-prospered love, to bless him with the possession of her
portrait, done by the incomparable artist who would receive her.
Disappointment and vexation overwhelmed the heart of the
Marchesa, and she burst into tears. She read the letter again,
and grew calmer; for it was laden with epithets of endearment,
and seemed to her written in the most sudden haste. Never
doubting for an instant the truth of his apology, she removed her
hat, and, with a look at the deeply-shaded mirror, while she
shook out from their confinement the masses of her luxuriant
hair, she approached the painter's easel, and, with a forced
cheerfulness
,
inquired in what attitude she should sit to him.
If the Signora will amuse herself, he replied, with a bow,
it will be easy to compose the picture, and seize the expression
without annoying her with a
pose
.
Relieved thus of any imperative occupation, the unhappy
Marchesa seated herself by a table of intaglios and prints, and,
while she apparently occupied herself in the examination of these
specimens of art, she was delivered, as her tormentor had well
anticipated, to the alternate tortures of impatience and remorse.
And while the hours wore on, and her face paled, and her eyes
grew bloodshot with doubt and fear, the skilful painter, forgetting
everything in the enthusiasm of his art, and forgotten utterly by
his unconscious subject, transferred too faithfully to the canvas
that picture of agonized expectation.
The afternoon, meantime, had worn away, and the gay world
of Florence, from the side toward Fiesole, rolled past the Via
dei Servi on their circuitous way to the Cascine, and saw, with
dumb astonishment, the carriage and liveries of the Marchesa del
Marmore at the door of Count Basil Spirifort. On they swept
by the Via Mercata Nova to the Lung' Arno, and there their
astonishment redoubled: for, in the window of the Casino dei
Nobili, playing with a billiard-cue, and laughing with a group of
lounging exquisites, stood Count Basil himself, the most
unoccupied
and listless of sunset idlers. There was but one deduction
to be drawn from this sequence of events; and, when they
remembered
the demonstration of passionate jealousy on the previous
evening in the Cascine, Count Basil, evidently innocent of
participation in her passion, was deemed a persecuted man,
and the Marchesa del Marmore was lost to herself and the
world!
Three days after this well-remembered circumstance in the
history of Florence, an order was received from the Grand-Duke
to admit into the exhibition of modern artists a picture by a
young Venetion painter, an
elve
of Count Basil Spirifort. It
was called The Lady expecting an Inconstant, and had been
pronounced by a virtuoso, who had seen it on private view, to be
a masterpiece of expression and color. It was instantly and
indignantly recognised as the portrait of the unfortunate
Marchesa, whose late abandonment of her husband was fresh
on the lips of common rumor; but, ere it could be officially
removed, the circumstance had been noised abroad, and the
picture had been seen by all the curious in Florence. The order
for its removal was given; but the purpose of Count Basil had
been effected, and the name of the unhappy Marchesa had become
a jest on the vulgar tongue.
This tale had not been told, had there not been more than a
common justice in its sequel. The worse passions of men, in
common life, are sometimes inserutably prospered. The revenge
of Count Basil, however, was betrayed by the last act which com
pleted it; and, while the victim of his fiendish resentment finds a
peaceful asylum in England under the roof of the compassionate
Lady Geraldine, the once gay and admired Russian wanders from
city to city, followed by an evil reputation, and stamped
unaccountably
as a
jattatore
.
[1]
[1]
A man with an evil eye.
LOVE AND DIPLOMACY.
Pray pardon me,
For I am like a boy that hath found money
Afraid I dream still.
Ford or Webster
.
It
was on a fine September evening, within
my
time (and I am
not, I trust, too old to be loved), that Count Anatole L, of
the impertinent and particularly useless profession of
attach
,
walked up and down before the glass in his rooms at the
Archduke
Charles, the first hotel, as you know, if you have travelled,
in the green-belted and fair city of Vienna. The brass ring was
still swinging on the end of the bell-rope, and, in a respectful
attitude at the door, stood the just-summoned Signor Attilio, valet
and privy councillor to one of the handsomest coxcombs errant
through the world. Signor Attilio was a Tyrolese, and, like his
master, was
very
handsome.
Count Anatole had been idling away three golden summer
months in the Tyrol, for the sole purpose, as far as mortal eyes
could see, of disguising his fine Phidian features in a callow
mustache and whiskers. The
crines ridentes
(as Eneas Sylvius
has it) being now in a condition beyond improvement, Signor
Attilio had, for some days, been rather curious to know what
course of events would next occupy the diplomatic talents of his
master.
After a turn or two more, taken in silence, Count Anatole
stopped in the middle of the floor, and, eying the well-made
Tyrolese from head to foot, begged to know if he wore at
the present moment his most becoming breeches, jacket, and
beaver.
Attilio was never astonished at anything his master did or said.
He simply answered,
Si, signore
.
Be so kind as to strip immediately, and dress yourself in that
travelling suit lying on the sofa.
As the green, gold-corded jacket, knee-breeches, buckles, and
stockings, were laid aside, Count Anatole threw off his
dressing-gown
,
and commenced encasing his handsome proportions in the
cast-off habiliments. He then put on the conical, slouch-rimmed
hat, with the tall eagle's-feather stuck jauntily on the side, and
the two rich tassels pendant over his left eye; and, the toilet of
the valet being completed, at the same moment, they stood
looking
at one another with perfect gravityrather transformed, but
each apparently quite at home in his new character.
You look very like a gentleman, Attilio, said the Count.
Your Excellency has caught to admiration,
l'aria del paese
,
complimented back again the sometime Tyrolese.
Attilio!
Signore!
Do you remember the lady in the forest of Friuli?
Attilio began to have a glimmering of things. Some three
months before, the Count was dashing on at a rapid post-pace
through a deep wood in the mountains which head in the Adriatic.
A sudden pull-up at a turning in the road nearly threw him from
his britska; and, looking out at the
anima di porco!
of the
postilion
,
he found his way impeded by an overset carriage, from
which three or four servants were endeavoring to extract the body
of an old man, killed by the accident.
There was more attractive metal for the traveller, however,
in the shape of a young and beautiful woman, leaning pale and
faint against a tree, and apparently about to sink to the ground,
unassisted. To bring a hat full of water from the nearest brook,
and receive her falling head on his shoulder, was the work of a
thought. She had fainted away, and taking her, like a child,
into his arms, he placed her on a bank, by the road-side, bathed
her forehead and lips, and chafed her small white hands, till his
heart, with all the distress of the scene, was quite mad with her
perfect beauty.
Animation, at last began to return, and as the flush was
stealing
into her lips, another carriage drove up with servants in the
same livery, and Count Anatole, thoroughly bewildered in his
new dream, mechanically assisted them in getting their living
mistress
and dead master into it; and until they were fairly out of
sight, it had never occurred to him, that he might possibly wish
to know the name and condition of the fairest piece of work he
had ever seen from the hands of his Maker.
An hour before, he had doubled his
bono mano
to the postilion,
and was driving on to Vienna as if to sit at a new Congress.
Now, he stood leaning against the tree, at the foot of which the
grass and wild flowers showed the print of a new made pressure,
and the postilion cracked his whip, and Attilio reminded him of
the hour he was losing, in vain.
He remounted after a while; but the order was to go back to
the last post-house.
Three or four months at a solitary albergo in the neighborhood
of this adventure, passed by the Count in scouring the country on
horseback in every direction, and by his servant in very
particular
ennui, brings up the story nearly to where the scene opens.
I have seen her! said the Count.
Attilio only lifted up his eyebrows.
She is here, in Vienna?
Felice lei!
murmured Attilio.
She is the Princess Leichstenfels, and, by the death of that
old man, a widow.
Veramente!
responded the valet, with a rising inflexion,
for he knew his master and French morals too well, not to
foresee
a damper in the possibility of matrimony.
Veramente!
gravely echoed the Count. And now listen.
The princess lives in close retirement. An old friend or two,
and a tried servant, are the only persons who see her. You are
to contrive to see this servant to-morrow, corrupt him to leave
her, and recommend me in his place, and then you are to take
him as your courier to Paris; whence, if I calculate well, you
will return to me before long, with important despatches. Do you
understand me?
Signor, si!
In the small boudoir of a
masion de plaisance
, belonging to the
noble family of Leichstenfels, sat the widowed mistress of one of
the oldest titles and finest estates of Austria. The light from a
single long window, opening down to the floor, and leading out
upon a terrace of flowers, was subdued by a heavy, crimson
curtain
,
looped partially away; a pastille lamp was sending up from
its porphyry pedestal a thin, and just perceptible curl of smoke,
through which the lady musingly passed backward and forward
one of her slender fingers; and, on a table near, lay a sheet of
black-edged paper, crossed by a small, silver pen, and scrawled
over irregularly with devices and disconnected words, the work
evidently of a fit of the most absolute and listless idleness.
The door opened, and a servant in mourning livery stood before
the lady.
I have thought over your request, Wilhelm, she said. I
had become accustomed to your services, and regret to lose you;
but I should regret more to stand in the way of your interest.
You have my permission.
Wilhelm expressed his thanks with an effort that showed he
had not obeyed the call of Mammon without regret, and
requested
leave to introduce the person he had proposed as his
successor.
Of what country is he?
Tyrolese, your Excellency.
Any why does he leave the gentleman with whom he came to
Vienna?
H est amoureue d'une Viennaise, madame
, answered the
exvalet
,
resorting to French to express what he considered a
delicate
circumstance.
Pauvre enfant!
said the Princess, with a sigh that partook
as much of envy as of pity; let him come in!
And the Count Anatole, as the sweet accents reached his ear,
stepped over the threshold, and in the coarse, but gay dress of
the Tyrol, stood in the presence of her, whose dewy temples he
had bathed in the forest, whose lips he had almost pryed into
for breath, whose snowy hands he had chafed and kissed when
the senses had deserted their celestial organsthe angel of his
perpetual dream, the lady of his wild and uncontrollable, but
respectful
and honorable love.
The Princess looked carelessly up as he approached, but her
eyes seemed arrested in passing over his features. It was but
momentary. She resumed her occupation of winding her taper
fingers in the smoke-curls of the incense-lamp, and, with half a
sigh, as if she had repelled a pleasing thought, she leaned back
in the silken fauteuil, and asked the new-comer his name.
Anatole, your Excellency.
The voice again seemed to stir something in her memory. She
passed her hand over her eyes, and was for a moment lost in
thought.
Anatole, she said (oh, how the sound of his own name,
murmured in that voice of music, thrilled through the fiery veins
of the disguised lover!) Anatole, I receive you into my service.
Wilhelm will inform you of your duties, andI have a fancy for
the dress of the Tyrolyou may wear it instead of my livery, if
you will.
And, with one stolen and warm gaze from under his drooping
eyelids, and heart and lips on fire, as he thanked her for her
condescension
,
the new retainer took his leave.
Month after month passed onto Count Anatole in a
bewildering
dream of ever-deepening passion. It was upon a soft and
amorous morning of April, that a dashing equipage stood at the
door of the proud palace of Lichstenfels. The arms of E
blazed on the panels, and the
insouciants
chassures leaned against
the marble columns of the portico, waiting for their master, and
speculating on the gaiety likely to ensue from the suite he was
prosecuting within. How could a prince of E be supposed
to sue in vain?
The disguised footman had ushered the gay and handsome
nobleman
to his mistress's presence. After re-arranging a family of
very well-arranged flower pots, shutting the window to open it
again, changing the folds of the curtain not at all for the better,
and looking a stolen and fierce look at the unconscious visitor, he
could find no longer an apology for remaining in the room. He
shut the door after him in a tempest of jealousy.
Did your Excellency ring? said he, opening the door again
after a few minutes of intolerable torture.
The Prince was on his knees at her feet!
No, Anatole; but you may bring me a glass of water.
As he entered, with a silver tray trembling in his hand, the
Prince was rising to go. His face expressed delight, hope,
triumpheverything that could madden the soul of the irritated
lover. After waiting on his rival to his carriage, he returned to
his mistress, and, receiving the glass upon the tray, was about
leaving the room in silence, when the Princess called to him.
In all this lapse of time, it is not to be supposed that Count
Anatole played merely his footman's part. His respectful and
elegant demeanor, the propriety of his language, and that deep
devotedness of manner which wins a woman more than all things
else, soon gained upon the confidence of the Princess; and before
a week was passed, she found that she was happier when he stood
behind her chair, and gave him, with some self-denial, those
frequent
permissions of absence from the palace, which she supposed
he asked to prosecute the amour disclosed to her on his
introduction
to her service. As time flew on, she attributed his
earnestness
,
and occasional warmth of manner, to gratitude; and,
without
reasoning much on her feelings, gave herself up to the
indulgence
of a degree of interest in him which would have alarmed
a woman more skilled in the knowledge of the heart. Married
from a convent, however, to an old man, who had secluded her
from the world, the voice of the passionate Count in the forest of
Friuli was the first sound of love that had ever entered her ears.
She knew not why it was that the tones of her new footman, and
now and then a look of his eyes, as he leaned over to assist her at
table, troubled her memory like a trace of a long-lost dream.
But, oh, what moments had been
his
, in these fleeting months!
Admitted to her presence in her most unguarded hoursseeing
her at morning, at noon, at night, in all her unstudied, and
surpassing
lovelinessfor ever near her, and with the world shut out
her rich hair blowing, with the lightest breeze, across his
fingers
in his assiduous serviceher dark, full eyes, unconscious of
an observer, filling with unrepressed tears, or glowing with
pleasure
over some tale of loveher exquisite form flung upon a
couch, or bending over flowers, or moving about the room in all
its native and untrammelled graceand her voice, tender, most
tender, to him, though she knew it not, and her eyes, herself
unaware
,
ever following him in his loitering attendanceand he,
the while, losing never a glance nor a motion, but treasuring all
up in his heart with the avarice of a miserwhat, in common
life, though it were the life of fortune's most favored child, could
compare with it for bliss?
Pale and agitated, the Count turned back at the call of his
mistress, and stood waiting her pleasure?
Anatole!
Madame!
The answer was so low, and deep, it startled even himself.
She motioned him to come nearer. She had sunk upon the
sofa, and, as he stood at her feet, she leaned forward, buried her
hands and arms in the long curls which, in her retirement, she
allowed
to float luxuriantly over her shoulders, and sobbed aloud.
Overcome, and forgetful of all but the distress of the lovely
creature
before him, the Count dropped upon the cushion on which
rested the small foot in its mourning slipper, and, taking her hand,
pressed it suddenly and fervently to his lips.
The reality broke upon her! She was belovedbut by whom?
A menial! and the appalling answer drove all the blood of her
proud race in a torrent upon her heart, sweeping away all
affection
as if her nature had never known its name. She sprang to
her feet, and laid her hand upon the bell.
Madame! said Anatole, in a cold, proud tone.
She stayed her arm to listen.
I leave you for ever.
And again, with the quick revulsion of youth and passion, her
woman's heart rose within her, and she buried her face in her
hands, and dropped her head in utter abandonment on her bosom.
It was the birthday of the Emperor, and the courtly nobles of
Austria were rolling out from the capital to offer their
congratulations
at the royal Palace of Schoenbrunn. In addition to the
usual attractions of the scene, the drawing-room was to be graced
by the first public appearance of a new Ambassador, whose
reputed
personal beauty, and the talents he had displayed in a late
secret negotiation, had set the whole Court, from the Queen of
Hungary, to the youngest
dame d'honneur
, in a flame of curiosity.
To the Prince E there was another reason for writing the
day in red letters. The Princess Leichstenfels, by an express
message from the Empress, was to throw aside her widow's weeds,
and appear once more to the admiring world. She had yielded
to the summons, but it was to be her last day of splendor. Her
heart and hand were plighted to her Tyrolese minion; and the
brightest and loveliest ornament of the Court of Austria, when
the ceremonies of the day were over, was to lay aside the costly
bauble from her shoulder, and the glittering tiara from her brow,
and forget rank and fortune as the wife of his bosom!
The dazzling hours flew on. The plain and kind old Emperor
welcomed and smiled upon all. The wily Metternich, in the
prime of his successful manhood, cool, polite, handsome, and
winning, gathered golden opinions by every word and look; the
young Duke of Reichstadt, the mild and gentle son of the struck
eagle of St. Helena, surrounded and caressed by a continual
cordon
of admiring women, seemed forgetful that Opportunity and
Expectation awaited him, like two angels with their wings
outspread
;
and haughty nobles and their haughtier dames, statesmen,
scholars, soldiers, and priests, crowded upon each other's heels,
and mixed together in that doubtful
podrida
, which goes by the
name of
pleasure
. I could moralize here, had I time!
The Princess of Leichstenfels had gone through the ceremony
of presentation, and had heard the murmur of admiration, drawn
by her beauty, from all lips. Dizzy with the scene, and with a
bosom full of painful and conflicting emotions, she had accepted
the proffered arm of Prince E to breathe a fresher air upon
the terrace. They stood near a window, and he was pointing out
to his fair, but inattentive companion, the various characters as
they passed within.
I must contrive, said the Prince, to show you the new
Envoy. Oh! you have not heard of him. Beautiful as
Narcissus
,
modest as Pastor Corydon, clever as the Prime Minister
himself, this paragon of diplomatists has been here in disguise
these three monthsnegotiating about Metternich and the devil
knows whatbut rewarded at last with an Ambassador's star, and
but here he is: Princess Leichstenfels, permit me to
present
She heard no more. A glance from the diamond star on his
breast, to the Hephstion mouth, and keen, dark eye of Count
Anatole, revealed to her the mystery of months. And, as she
leaned against the window for support, the hand that sustained
her in the forest of Friuli, and the same thrilling voice, in almost
the same never-forgotten cadence, offered his impassioned
sympathy
and aidand she recognized and remembered all.
I must go back so far as to inform you, that Count Anatole, on
the morning of this memorable day, had sacrificed a silky but
prurient
moustache, and a pair of the very sauciest dark whiskers out
of Coventry. Whether the Prince E recognized, in the new
Envoy, the lady's gentleman who so inopportunely broke in upon
his tender avowal, I am not prepared to say. I only know (for I
was there) that the Princess Leichstenfels was wedded to the
new Ambassador in the leafy month of June; and the Prince
E, unfortunately prevented by illness from attending the
nuptials, lost a very handsome opportunity of singing with
effect
If she be not fair for me
supposing it translated into German.
Whether the enamored Ambassadress prefers her husband in
his new character, I am equally uncertain; though, from much
knowledge of German Courts and a little of human nature, I think
she will be happy, if, at some future day, she would not willingly
exchange her proud envoy for the devoted Tyrolese, and does not
sigh that she can no more bring him to her feet with a pull of a
silken string.
THE MAD HOUSE OF PALERMO.
He
who has not skimmed over the silvery waters of the Lipari,
with a summer breeze right from Italy in his topsails, the smoke
of Stromboli alone staining the unfathomable-looking blue of the
sky, and, as the sun dipped his flaming disk in the sea, put up his
helm for the bosom of
La Concha d'Oro
the Golden Shell, as
they beautifully call the bay of Palermohe who has not thus
entered, I say, to the fairest spot on the face of this very fair
earth, has a leaf worth the turning in his book of observation.
In ten minutes after dropping the anchor, with sky and water
still in a glow, the men were all out of the rigging, the spars of
the tall frigate were like lines pencilled on the sky, the band
played inspiringly on the deck, and every boat along the gay
Marina was freighted with fair Palermitans on its way to the
stranger ship.
I was standing with the officer-of-the-deck, by the capstan,
looking at the first star, which had just sprung into its place like
a thing created with a glance of the eye.
Shall we let the ladies aboard, sir? said a smiling middy,
coming aft from the gangway.
Yes, sir. And tell the boatswain's mate to clear away for a
dance on the quarter-deck.
11
In most of the ports of the Mediterranean, a ship-of-war, on a
summer cruise, is as welcome as the breeze from the sea.
Bringing
with her forty or fifty gay young officers overcharged with life
and spirits, a band of music never so well occupied as when
playing
for a dance, and a deck whiter and smoother than a ball-room
floor, the warlike vessel seems made for a scene of pleasure.
Whatever her nation, she no sooner drops her anchor, than she is
surrounded by boats from the shore; and when the word is
passed for admission, her gangway is crowded with the
mirth-loving
and warm people of these southern climes, as much at home
on board, and as ready to enter into any scheme of amusement,
as the maddest-brained midshipman could desire.
The companion-hatch was covered with its grating, lest some
dizzy waltzer should drop his partner into the steerage, the band
got out their music-stand, and the bright buttons were soon
whirling
round from larboard to starboard, with forms in their clasp,
and dark eyes glowing over their shoulders, that might have
tempted the devil out of Stromboli.
Being only a passenger myself, I was contented with sitting on
the side of a carronade, and, with the music in my ear, and the
twilight flush deepening in the fine-traced angles of the rigging,
abandoning myself to the delicious listlessness with which the very
air is pregnant in these climates of Paradise.
The light feet slid by, and the waltz, the gallopade, and the
mazurka, had followed each other till it was broad moonlight on
the decks. It was like a night without an atmosphere, the
radiant
flood poured down with such an invisible and moonlike
clearness.
Do you see the lady leaning on that old gentleman's arm by
the hammock-rail? said the first lieutenant, who sat upon the
next gunlike myself a spectator of the scene.
I had remarked her well. She had been in the ship five or ten
minutes, and, in that time, it seemed to me, I had drunk her
beauty, even to intoxication. The frigate was slowly swinging
round to the land breeze, and the moon, from drawing the curved
line of a gipsy-shaped
capella di paglia
with bewitching
concealment
across her features, gradually fell full upon the dark limit
of her orbed forehead. Heaven! what a vision of beauty!
Solemn, and full of subdued pain as the countenance seemed, it
was radiant with an almost supernatural light of mind. Thought
and feeling seemed steeped into every line. Her mouth was
largethe only departure from the severest model of the Greek
and stamped with calmness, as if it had been a legible word
upon her lips. But her eyeswhat can I say of their unnatural
lightningof the depth, the fulness, the wild and maniac-like
passionateness of their every look?
My curiosity was strongly moved. I walked aft to the
capstan
,
and, throwing off my habitual reserve with some effort,
approached
the old gentleman on whose arm she leaned, and begged
permission to lead her out for a waltz.
If you wish it,
carissima mia!
said he, turning to her with
all the tenderness in his tone of which the honeyed language of
Italy is capable.
But she clung to his arm with startled closeness, and without
even looking at me, turned her lips up to his ear, and murmured,
Mai piu!
At my request the officer on duty paid them the compliment
of sending them ashore in one of the frigate's boats; and, after
assisting them down the ladder, I stood upon the broad stair on
the level of the water, and watched the phosphoric wake of the
swift cutter till the bright sparkles were lost amid the vessels
nearer land. The coxswain reported the boat's return; but all
that belonged to the ship had not come back in her. My heart
was left behind.
The next morning there was the usual bustle in the gun-room
preparatory to going ashore. Glittering uniforms lay about upon
the chairs and tables, sprinkled with swords, epaulettes, and
cocked hats; very well-brushed boots were sent to be re-brushed,
and very nice coats to be made, if possible, to look nicer; the
ship's barber was cursed for not having the hands of Briareus, and
no good was wished to the eyes of the washerwoman of the last
port where the frigate had anchored. Cologne-water was in great
request, and the purser had an uncommon number of private
interviews.
Amid all the bustle, the question of how to pass the day was
busily agitated. Twenty plans were proposed; but the sequel
a dinner at the
Hotel Anglais
, and a stroll for a lark after it
was the only point on which the speakers were quite
unanimous
.
One proposition was to go to Bagaria, and see the palace of
Monsters. This is a villa about ten miles from Palermo, which
the owner, Count Pallagonia, and an eccentric Sicilian noble, has
ornamented with some hundreds of statues of the finest
workmanship
,
representing the form of woman, in every possible
combination
with beasts, fishes, and birds. It looks like the
temptation
of St. Anthony, on a splendid scale, and is certainly one of
the most extraordinary spectacles in the world.
Near it stands another villa, the property of Prince Butera
(the present minister of Naples at the court of France),
containing
in the depths of its pleasure-grounds, a large monastery, with
wax monks, of the size and appearance of life, scattered about the
passages and cells, and engaged in every possible unclerical
avocation
.
It is a whimsical satire on the Order, done to the life.
Another plan was to go to the Capuchin convent, and see the
dried friarssix or eight hundred bearded old men,
baked
, as
they died, in their cowls and heards, and standing against the
walls in ghastly rows, in the spacious vaults of the monastery. A
more infernal spectacle never was seen by mortal eyes.
A drive to Monreale, a nest of a village on the mountain above
the towna visit to the gardens of a nobleman who salutes the
stranger with a
jet d'eau
at every turningand a lounge in the
public promenade of Palermo itselfshared the honors of the
argument.
I had been in Sicily before, and was hesitating which of these
various `lions' was worthy of a second visit, when the surgeon
proposed
to me to accompany him on a visit to a Sicilian Count,
living
in the neighborhood, who had converted his chteau into a
lunatic asylum, and devoted his time and a large fortune entirely
to this singular hobby. He was the first to try the system, (now,
thank God, generally approved!) of winning back reason to the
most wretched of human sufferers by kindness and gentle
treatment
.
We jumped into one of the rattling
calesini
standing in the
handsome corso of Palermo, and fifteen minutes beyond the gates
brought us to the
Casa dei Pazzi
. My friend's uniform and
profession were an immediate passport, and we were introduced
into a handsome court, surrounded by a colonnade, and cooled by
a fountain, in which were walking several well-dressed people,
with books, drawing-boards, battledores, and other means of
amusement. They all bowed politely as we passed, and, at the
door of the interior, we were met by the Count.
Good God! I exclaimedshe was insane, then!
It was the old man who was on board the night before!
E ella?
said I, seizing his arm before he had concluded his
bow, quite sure that he must understand me with a word.
Era pazza
. He looked at me as he answered, with a
scrutiny, as if he half suspected my friend had brought him a
subject.
The singular character of her beauty was quite explained.
Yet what a wreck!
I followed the old Count around his establishment in a kind of
dream, but I could not avoid being interested at every step.
Here were no chains, no whips, no harsh keepers, no cells of stone
and straw. The walls of the long corridors were painted in fresco,
representing sunny landscapes, and gay, dancing figures.
Fountains
and shrubs met us at every turn. The people were dressed
in their ordinary clothes, and all employed in some light work or
amusement. It was like what it might have been in the days of
the Count's ancestorsa gay chteau, filled with guests and
dependants
,
with no more apparent constraint than the ties of
hospitality
and service.
We went first to the kitchen. Here were ten people, all, but
the cook, stark mad! It was one of the peculiarities of the
Count's system, that his patients led in his house the lives to
which they had previously been accustomed. A stout Sicilian
peasant girl was employed in filling a large brasier from the basin
of a fountain. While we were watching her task, the fit began
to come on her, and, after a fierce look or two around the room,
she commenced dashing the water about her with great violence
The cook turned, not at all surprised, and, patting her on the back,
with a loud laugh, cried,
Brava, Pepina! brava!
ringing at
the same moment a secret bell.
A young girl of sixteen with a sweet, smiling countenance,
answered the summons, and, immediately comprehending the case,
approached the enraged creature, and putting her arms
affectionately
round her neck, whispered something in her ear. The
expression of her face changed immediately to a look of delight,
and dropping the bucket, she followed the young attendant out of
the room with peals of laughter.
Venite!
said the Count, you shall see how we manage our
furies.
We followed across a garden, filled with the sweetest flowers, to
a small room opening on a lawn. From the centre of the ceiling
was suspended a hammock, and Pepina was already in it, swung
lightly from side to side by a servant, while the attendant stood
by, and, as if in play, threw water upon her face at every
approach
.
It had all the air of a frolic. The violent laughter of
the poor maniac grew less and less as the soothing motion and the
coolness of the water took effect, and in a few minutes her strained
eyes gently closed, the hammock was swung more and more gently,
and she fell asleep.
This, said the Count, with a gratified smile, is my
substitute
for a forced shower-bath and chains; and this, kissing his
little attendant on the forehead, for the whip and the grim
turnkey. I blessed him in my heart.
Come! said he, as we left the sleeper to her repose, I
must show you my grounds.
We followed him to an extensive garden, opening from the
back of the chteau, laid out, originally, in the formal style of an
Italian villa. The long walks had been broken up, however, by
beautiful arbors with grottoes in their depths, in which wooden
figures, of the color and size of life, stood or sat in every attitude
of gaiety or grotesqueness. It was difficult, in the deep shadow
of the vines and oleanders, not to believe them real. We walked
on through many a winding shrubbery, perfumed with all the
scented flowers of the luxuriant climate, continually surprised
with little deceptions of perspective, or figures half concealed in
the leaves, till we emerged at the entrance of a charming
summer
theatre, with sodded seats, stage, orchestra, and scenery,
complete. Orange-trees, roses, and clematis, were laced together
for a wall in the rear.
Here, said the old man, bounding gayly upon the stage,
here we act plays, the summer long.
What! not with your patients?
Si signore!
Who else? And he went on to describe to
us the interest they took in it, and the singular power with which
the odd idea seized upon their whimsied intellects. We had been
accompanied, from the first, by a grave, respectable-looking man,
whom I had taken for an assistant. While we were listening to
the description of the first attempt they had made at a play, he
started out from the group, and putting himself in an attitude
upon the stage, commenced spouting a furious passage in Italian.
The Count pointed to his forehead, and made a sign to us to
listen
.
The tragedian stopped at the end of his sentence, and after a
moment's delay, apparently in expectation of a reply, darted
suddenly
off and disappeared behind the scenes.
Poveretto!
said the Count, it is my best actor!
Near the theatre stood a small chapel, with a circular lawn
before
it, on which the grass had been lately much trodden. It
was surrounded partly by a green bank, and here the Count
seated
us, saying, with a significant look at me, that he would tell us
a story.
I should like to give it you in his own wordsstill more with
his own manner; for never was a tale told with more elegance of
language, or a more natural and pleasant simplicity. But a sheet
of wire-wove is not a Palermitan Cavaliere, and the cold
English
has not the warm eloquence of the Italian. He laid aside
his hat, ordered fruit and wine, and proceeded.
Almost a year ago, I was called upon by a gentleman of a
noble physiognomy and address, who inquired very particularly
into my system. I explained it to him, at his request, and he did
me the honor, as you gentlemen have done, to go over my little
establishment. He seemed satisfied, and, with some hesitation,
informed me that he had a daughter in a very desperate state of
mental alienation. Would I go and see her?
This is not, you know, gentlemen, a public institution. I am
crazy, he said it very gravely, quite crazythe first of my
family of fools, on this particular themeand this asylum is
my toy. Of course it is only as the whim seizes me that I
admit
a patient; for there are some diseases of the brain, seated in
causes with which I wish not to meddle.
However, I went. With the freedom of a physician, I
questioned
the father, upon the road, of the girl's history. He was a
Greek, a prince of the Fanar, who had left his degraded people
in their dirty and dangerous suburb at Constantinople, to forget
oppression and meanness in a voluntary exile. It was just before
the breaking out of the last Greek revolution, and so many of
his kinsmen and friends had been sacrificed to the fury of the
11*
Turks, that he had renounced all idea of ever returning to his
country.
`And your daughter?'
`My dear Katinka, my only child, fell ill upon receiving
distressing
news from the Fanar, and her health and her reason
never rallied after. It is now several years, and she has lain in
bed till her limbs are withered, never having uttered a word, or
made a sign which would indicate even consciousness of the
presence
of those about her.'
I could not get from him that there was any disappointment
of the heart at the bottom of it. It seemed to be one of those
cases of sudden stupefaction, to which nervously sensitive minds
are liable after a violent burst of grief; and I began, before I
had seen her, to indulge in bright hopes of starting once more the
scaled fountains of thought and feeling.
We entered Palermo, and passing out at the other gate,
stopped at a vine-laced casino on the lip of the bay, scarcely a
mile from the city wall. It was a pretty, fanciful place, and on
a bed in its inner chamber, lay the most poetical-looking creature
I had ever seen out of my dreams. Her head was pillowed in
an abundance of dark hair, which fell away from her forehead in
masses of glossy curls, relieving, with a striking effect, the wan and
transparent paleness of a face which the divinest chisel could
scarce have copied in alabaster.
Dio mio!
how transcendant was
the beauty of that poor girl!
The Count stopped and fed his memory, a moment, with closed
eyes upon the image.
At the first glance I inwardly put up a prayer to the Virgin,
and determined, with her sweet help, to restore reason to the
fairest of its earthly temples. I took up her shadow of a hand,
and spread out the thin fingers in my palm, and, as she turned her
large wandering eye toward me, I felt that the blessed Mary had
heard my prayer, `You shall see her well again,' said I confidently.
Quite overcome, the Prince Ghika fell on the bed and
embraced
his daughter's knees in an agony of tears.
You shall not have the
seccatura
, gentlemen, of listening to
the recital of all my tedious experiments for the first month or
two. I brought her to my house upon a litter, placed her in a
room filled with every luxury of the East, and suffered no one to
approach her except two Greek attendants, to whose services she
was accustomed. I succeeded in partially restoring animation to
her benumbed limbs by friction, and made her sensible of music,
and of the perfumes of the East, which I burned in a
pastillelamp
in her chamber. Here, however, my skill was baffled. I
could neither amuse nor vex. Her mind was beyond me. After
trying every possible experiment, as it seemed to me, my
invention
was exhausted, and I despaired.
She occupied, however, much of my mind. Walking up and
down yonder orange-alley one sweet morning, about two months
ago, I started off suddenly to my chamber with a new thought.
You would have thought me the maddest of my household, to
have seen me, gentlemen! I turned out by the shoulders the
regazza
, who was making my bed, washed and scented myself,
as if for a ball, covered my white hairs with a handsome brown
wig, a relic of my coxcombical days, rouged faintly, and, with
white gloves, and a most youthful appearance altogether, sought
the chamber of my patient.
She was lying with her head in the hollow of her thin arm,
and, as I entered, her dark eyes rested full upon me. I
approached
,
kissed her hand with a respectful gallantry, and in the
tenderest tones of which my damaged voice was susceptible,
breathed into her ear a succession of delicately-turned
compliments
to her beauty.
She lay as immovable as marble, but I had not calculated
upon the ruling passion of the sex in vain. A thin flush on her
cheek, and a flutter in her temple, only perceptible to my
practised
eye, told me that the words had found their way to her
long-lost consciousness.
I waited a few moments, and then took up a ringlet that fell
negligently over her hand, and asked permission to sever it from
the glossy mass in which the arm under her head was literally
buried.
She clutched her fingers suddenly upon it, and glancing at
me with the fury of a roused tigress, exclaimed in a husky whisper,
`
Lasciate me, signore!
'
I obeyed her, and, as I left the room, I thanked the Virgin
in my heart. It was the first word she had spoken for years.
The next day, having patched myself up more successfully, in
my leisure, in a disguise so absolute that not one even of my pets
knew me as I passed through the corridor, I bowed myself up
once more to her bedside.
She lay with her hands clasped over her eyes, and took no
notice of my first salutation. I commenced with a little raillery,
and, under cover of finding fault with her attitude, contrived to
pay an adroit compliment to the glorious orbs she was hiding
from admiration. She lay a moment or two without motion, but
the muscles of her slight mouth stirred just perceptibly, and
presently
she drew her fingers quickly apart, and looking at me with
a most confiding expression in her pale features, a full sweet smile
broke like sudden sunshine through her lips. I could have wept
for joy.
I soon acquired all the influence over her I could wish. She
made an effort, at my request, to leave her bed, and in a week or
two walked with me in the garden. Her mind, however, seemed
to have capacity but for one thought, and she soon began to grow
unhappy, and would weep for hours. I endeavored to draw from
her the cause, but she only buried her face in my bosom, and
wept more violently, till one day, sobbing out her broken words
almost inarticulately, I gathered her meaning. She was grieved
that I did not
marry her!
Poor girl! soliloquised the Count, after a brief pause, she
was only true to her woman's nature. Insanity had but removed
the veil of custom and restraint. She would have broken her
heart before she had betrayed such a secret, with her reason.
I was afraid at last she would go melancholy mad, this one
thought preyed so perpetually on her brainand I resolved to
delude her into the cheerfulness necessary to her health by a
mock ceremony.
The delight with which she received my promise almost
alarmed me. I made several delays, with the hope that in the
convulsion of her feelings a ray of reason would break through
the darkness; but she took every hour to heart, and I found it
was inevitable.
You are sitting, gentlemen, in the very scene of our mad
bridal. My poor grass has not yet recovered, you see, from the
tread of the dancers. Imagine the spectacle. The chapel was
splendidly decorated, and, at the bottom of the lawn, stood three
long tables, covered with fruits and flowers, and sprinkled here
and there with bottles of colored water (to imitate wine), sherbets,
cakes, and other such innocent things as I could allow my crazy
ones. They were all invited.
Good God! said the surgeon, your lunatics?
Allall! And never was such a sensation produced in a
household
since the world was created. Nothing else was talked of for
a week. My worst patients seemed to suspend, for a time, their
fits of violence. I sent to town for quantities of tricksy stuffs, and
allowed the women to deck themselves entirely after their own
taste. You can conceive nothing like the business they made of
it! Such apparitions!
Santa Maria!
shall I ever forget that
Babel?
The morning came. My bride's attendants had dressed her
from her Grecian wardrobe; and, with her long braid parted over
her forehead, and hanging back from her shoulders to her very
heels, her close-fitted jacket, of gorgeous velvet and gold, her
costly bracelets, and the small spangled slippers upon her
unstockinged
feet, she was positively an angelic vision of beauty. Her
countenance was thoughtful, but her step was unusually elastic,
and a small red spot, like a rose-leaf under the skin, blushed
through the alabaster paleness of her cheek.
My maniacs received her with shouts of admiration. The
women were kept from her at first with great difficulty, and it was
only by drawing their attention to their own gaudier apparel, that
their anxiety to touch her was distracted. The men looked at
her, as she passed along like a Queen of Love and Beauty, and
their wild, gleaming eyes, and quickened breaths, showed the
effect of such loveliness upon the unconcealed feelings. I had
multiplied my attendants, scarce knowing how the excitement of
the scene might affect them; but the interest of the occasion, and
the imposing decencies of dress and show, seemed to overcome
them effectually. The most sane guests at a bridal could scarce
have behaved with more propriety.
The ceremony was performed by an elderly friend of mine,
the physician to my establishment. Old as I am, gentlemen, I
could have wished that ceremony to have been in earnest. As
she lifted up her large liquid eyes to heaven, and swore to be true
to me till death, I forgot my manhood, and wept. If I had been
younger
ma, che porcheria!
After the marriage the women were invited to salute the
bride, and then all eyes in my natural party turned at once to the
feast. I gave the word.Fruits, cakes, and sherbets, disappeared
with the rapidity of magic, and then the music struck up from
the shrubbery, and they dancedas you see by the grass.
I committed the bride to her attendants at sunset, but I could
with difficulty tear myself away. On the following day, I called
at her door, but she refused to see me. The next day and the
next, I could gain no admittance without exerting my authority.
On the fourth morning I was permitted to enter. She had
resumed
her usual dress, and was sad, calm, and gentle. She said
little, but seemed lost in thought to which she was unwilling or
unable to give utterance.
She has never spoken of it since. Her mind, I think, has
nearly recovered its tone, but her memory seems confused. I
scarce think she remembers her illness, and its singular events,
as more than a troubled dream. On all the common affairs of
life she seems quite sane, and I drive out with her daily, and
have taken her once or twice to the Opera. Last night we were
strolling on the Marina, when your frigate came into the bay, and
she proposed to join the crowd, and go off to hear the music.
We went on board as you know; and now, if you choose to
pay your respects to the lady who refused to waltz with you, take
another sip of your sherbet and wine, and come with me.
To say more, would be trespassing, perhaps, on the patience of
my readers, but certainly on my own feelings. I have described
this singular case of madness and its cure, because I think it
contains
in itself the seeds of much philosophy on the subject. It
is only within a very few years that these poor sufferers have been
treated otherwise than as the possessors of incarnate devils,
whom it was necessary to scourge out with unsparing cruelty. If
this literal statement of a cure in the private mad-house of the
eccentric Conte , of Palermo, induce the friends of a single
unfortunate maniac to adopt a kind and rational system for his
restoration, the writer will have been repaid for bringing
circumstances
before the public, which have since had much to do with
his own feelings.
AN UP-TOWN CRISIS;
OR, MRS. LUTHER LEATHERS'S FIRST FRIDAY MORNING.
It
was one o'clock, in a certain new four-story house, within
fashionable reach of Union-Square. The two drawing-rooms,
with the folding doors sheathed to the glass handles, were in
faultless order. There was a fire in one of the grates, to take off
the smell of the new furniture, and the chill of a November day;
and just audible was the tick of a showy French clock, wound up
for the first time, and expected to swing its pendulum that
morning
and thereafter, in the first society of New York.
As the unsuspecting and assenting clock struck one, there was
a rustle of silk down the banisters of the staircase, and the lady
of the house(the seaffolding of a well-built woman who had
fallen in)sailed into the room.
Betsey!that is to say, Judkins!are you there? she
inquired
,
as she gave the blue curtains of the front windows a
twitch each.
Yes, mem, said a voice from the little verandah room in the
rear.
Is the chocolate hot?
Bilin', mem!
Now, Judkins, you remember all Mr. Cyphers told you about
how to behave when the ladies come in there?
I can't help it, Mrs. Leathers! said the invisible speaker,
without answering the question, but it flusters me to be called
`Judkins,' so blunt and sudden-like! I shall upset this
chocolate-pot
,
I know I shall, if you call me so when there's company.
Why, it's just like hearing my poor, dead husband called up out
of his grave, Mrs. Leathers! If you please, mem, let it be `
Betsey
,'
or `
Mrs.
Judkins'least-wise till I get used to it,
somehow
?
But this remonstrance had been heard before, and the mistress
of the aggrieved Mrs. Judkins paid no attention to it. She had
been assured, by fashionable Mr. Cyphers, that head maids in
first families, were always called by their sirnames, for it
implied
a large establishment, with two classes of servantsthe
chambermaids and kitchen scrubs being the only legitimate
Sallys and Betseys.
A ring at the bell, while Judkins was meditating another
remonstrance
,
suddenly galvanized Mrs. Leathers into the middle
of the sofa, facing the door; and there she sat, as composed as if
she had been sitting an hour for her picture, when the gentleman
whose advice had just been acted upon, was shown in by the new
footman.
Like every unfashionable rich man's ambitious wife, Mrs.
Leathers had one fashionable male friendher counsellor in all
matters of taste, and the condescending guide of herself and her
husband's plebeian million through the contempts which form the
vestibule to good society. Mr. Theodore Cyphers was one
of two dwindled remainders to a very old familya sister,
who seemed to be nothing but the family nose walking about in a
petticoat, sharing with him the reversed end of cornucopial
ancestry
.
He was, perhaps, thirty-five, of a very genteel ugliness of
personal appearance, good-humored, and remarkably learned upon
the motives, etiquette and usages of fashionable society. Of a
thought unconnected with the art of gentility, or of the making
of a penny, Mr. Cyphers was profoundly incapable. Skill at
thinking, indeed, would have been a superfluity, for he had had a
grandfather, in a country where grandfathers are fewer and more
prized than anywhere else, and he had only to do nothing and be
highly respectable. The faculty of earning something would
scarcely have bettered his condition, either, for his rarity as an
unemployed gentleman, in a city where excessive industry is too
universal to be a virtue, gave him that
something to be known by
,
which it is the very devil to be without. What paid for Mr. or
Miss Cyphers's sustenance and postage, was one of the few
respectable
mysteries of New York. He had now and then a note
discounted by the house of Leathers and Co., Wall-street; but
of course it was not taken up at maturity by his attentions to
Mrs.
Leathers, nor have we any knowledge that these promises of
Cyphers to pay, were still under indefatigable renewal up to the
date of the great stockholder's wife's first Friday Morning.
It was in expectation of a proper reception call, that Mrs.
Leathers had taken her seat upon the sofa, and, upon the
appearance
of Mr. Cyphers, she came out of her attitude with a slight
look of disappointment.
I have dropped in early, my dear friend, she he, to see
that everything is
comme il faut
. Bless me, how light the room
is! Nobody would come twice where there is such a glare on
the complexion! Will you allow me to call Csar to shut the
outside blinds? Csar! he cried, stepping back to the entry to
recall the man who had let him in.
But no Csar answered, for the black footman had a sirname
as well as Betsey Judkins, and if
she
was to be called Judkins,
he
would be called Fuzzard, and he would answer to nothing
else.
It cannot be permitted, my dear Mrs. Leathers!
expostulated
Mr. Cyphers, when the man carried his point, and shut
the blinds to an order given him by the name of Fuzzard; a
head servant, with a white cravat, is the only man who can go by
a sirname in a genteel family. A triflebut little things show
style. Pay the man more wages to let himself be called Csar,
but call him
Csar!
Pardon me! (continued Mr. Cyphers,
suddenly changing to an apologetic cadence,) might I venture
to suggest a little change in your toilette, my dear madam?
Mine! cried Mrs. Leathers, coloring slightly, but looking
as frightened as if she had been pulled back from a precipice.
Why, Mr. Cyphers, this is the very last fashion out from
Paris! I hopeI trustwhy, what do you mean, Mr.
Cyphers
?
and Mrs. Leathers walked to the pier glass and looked
at herself, behind and before, in rapid succession.
For the Opera, very well, my dear friend, he replied,
appealingly
,
or for a bridal call, or a
fte champtre
. It is as pretty
a three-quarter toilette as ever I saw, and you look quite lovely
in it, dear Mrs. Leathers, but
But what, I should like to know?
Why, in your own house, you see, it is stylish to be rather
under
-dressed; as if seeing people were such an every-day
matter
,
that you had not thought it worth while to appear in more
than your ordinary toilette.
And so everybody in my own house is to look well but
me!
remonstratively exclaimed Mrs. Leathers.
Nopardon me; morning caps and well studied
ngliges
are very becoming; but it is not
that
exactly. Let me explain
the principle to you. Sitting up in showy dress to receive calls,
looks, (does it not?) as if you made a great event of it; as if the
calls were an unusual honoras if you meant to be extremely
deferential towards your visitors.
`But
they
are splendidly dressed when they make the calls,
Mr. Cyphers!
Yes, but it is, as one may say, open to supposition that they
are going somewhere else, and have only taken your house in their
waydon't you see? And then, supposing nobody comesa
thing that might happen, you know, my dear Mrs. Leathers;
why, there you arein grand toiletteevidently expecting
somebody; of course mortified, yourself, with the failure of your
matinc
, and, what is worse,
seen
to be mortified, by your
neighbors
across the way!
La! mercy! of course! exclaimed Mrs. Leathers,
discovering
that there was a trap or two for the unwary in good
society, of which she had been entirely unsuspicious; but
what am I to do? I have no time to dress over again! Mrs.
Ingulphus might be here, and
Oh! interrupted Cyphers, with a prophetic foreboding that
(spite of his influence with Mrs. Ingulphus, and the hundred and
fifty At home on Friday mornings which had been left on
people she did not know,) Mrs. Leathers would have very few
visitors for many a Friday morning yet to come, Oh, my dear
madam, you are abundantly in time. Pray go up and slip into
your prettiest demi-toilette, and take your chance of any one's
coming. It looks well, in fact, not to be ready when people call;
not to have expected them so early, as it were. While you are
gone, by-the-bye, I will make a little arrangement of your place
to sit, etc. etc., which strikes me, at this moment, as a matter
we had quite overlooked. Go, my dear Mrs. Leathers!
It was upon the call of Mrs. Ingulphus, so confidently alluded
to by Mrs. Leathers, that Mr. Cyphers secretly built all his hope
of making his friend fashionable. Mrs. Ingulphus's carriage,
seen at any door for half an hour, was a sufficient keystone for a
new aspirant's arch of aristocracy; but of such demonstration,
Mrs. Ingulphus was exceedingly chary. The sagacious leader of
fashion knew that her house must, first of all, be attractive and
amusing. She was too wise to smother its agreeableness
altogether
,
with people who had
descended
from grandfathers; but, to
counteract this very drowse of dwindledom, she required, of the
grandfatherless, either beauty or talent. Mr. Cyphers, in making
interest for Mrs. Leathers, had not pleaded her wealth. That
was now so common as to have ceased to be a distinction, or, at
least, it was a distinction which, in mounting to Mrs. Ingulphus's
drawing-room, Mrs. Leathers must leave in the gutter with her
carriage.
What Mrs. Leathers was like, after getting inside a door, was
the question. She might be dull, if she was Knickerbocratic
low-born, if stylish and beautifulscandalized, if willing to
undertake
wall-flowers and make her fascinations useful, but she
must be something besides rich and vulgar. Cyphers could plead
for her on none of the usual grounds, but, with a treacherous
ingenuity
,
he manufactured an attraction which was, in fact, a
slander
on Mrs. Leathers. He reminded Mrs. Ingulphus that
foreigners liked a house where the married ladies would flirt, and
whispered, confidentially, that Mrs. Leathers had a dull money
bag for a husband, and (to use his own phrase), would listen to
reason.
Mrs. Ingulphus said she would think of it, and, upon this
encouragement
,
Cyphers cherished a hope that she would call.
With the aid of Judkins and Fuzzard, Mr. Cyphers, on Mrs.
Leathers's disappearance, made some important changes in the
furniture of the front drawing-room. A fancy writing-desk was
taken out from under the pier-table, opened, and set upon a
work-stand in the corner, the contents scattered about in
epistolary
confusion, and a lounging chair wheeled up before it
With some catechising, Judkins remembered an embroidered
footstool
in one of the closets up stairs, and this was sent for and
placed in front of the
fauteuil
. The curtains all let down, except
one, and the sofa wheeled up with its back to this one entrance
for the lightMr. Cyphers saw that he could do no more.
Now, my very expeditious Mrs. Leathers, he said, as she
entered, in an unobjectionable morning dress, and a cap rather
becoming, one little word more of general directions. Ladies
love to sit with their backs to the light, in a morning call, and as
the sofa is placed now, they will easily take a seat in a becoming
position, and without any inconvenient drawing up of a chair.
As to yourself, sit you at this desk and write
Bless me! I have nothing to write! interrupted Mrs.
Leathers.
Oh, copy an advertisement from a newspaper, if you like,
resumed her polite instructor, but write something, and let it be
upon note paper. You must
seem
to be passing your morning
quite independently of visits, and to be rather broken in upon
than otherwise, by any one's coming in. Fashionable people
you know, admire most those who can do without them I think
that's in Pelham.
La! and must I write till somebody comes?
Dip your pen in the ink when the bell rings, that's all; and
write till their coming in makes you look up, suddenly and
unconsciously
,
as it were. Staysuppose I sit in your chair, and
show you how I would receive a call? You are the visitor, say,
and I am Mrs. Leathers?
Mr. Cyphers crossed his feet, in an clongated position, upon
the embroidered footstool, and threw his hankerchief over them
in imitation of a petticoat, just disclosing a toe and an instep;
then, taking up a pen, he went through the representation of a
lady surprised, writing, by a morning call. As, upon Mrs.
Leathers' trying to do it after him, he found there were several
other points in her attitude and manners which required slight
emendation, we will leave these two at their lesson above stairs,
and take a look into the basement parlor of the story below.
PART II.
THE LEATHERS'S BASEMENT.
A pair
of beautiful partridges, cooked to a turn, had just
succeeded
a bass, done in port-wine sauce; the potatoes were hot,
and the pint bottle of champagne had given place to a decanter
of sherry, at the right hand of Mr. Luther Leathers, dining alone
in his basement parlor. A fire of bituminous coal burned very
brightly in the grate. Dividing her attention between watching
the blaze, and looking up placidly to the face of the stock-broker
as he soliloquized over his dinner, sat a hunchback girl of
nineteen
or twenty, carefully propped on a patent easy-chair upon
wheels. There was no servant waiting on table. The bread and
water were within Mr. Leathers's reach, and the bell-handle was
at the right hand of the pale and patient-looking little cripple in
the corner.
Lucy, my dear girl, said the carver of the partridge,
holding up a bit of the breast of the bird upon his fork, I wish
I could persuade you to take a bit of this. See how nice it
looks!
I know you wish it, she answered, with an affectionate half
smile, and you would give me your own health to enjoy it, if
you could, but I have no appetite to-dayexcept sympathy with
yours.
Leathers was a short, stout man, of about forty. He had a face
roughly lined with anxiety, and a knit contraction of brows,
which showed a habit of forcibly contracting his attention at short
notice. The immediate vicinity of his mouth, however, was
pliable and good-humored, and, in fact, looked as if neither care
nor meanness had ever been permitted to have a pull upon it. His
hair was pushed rudely away from a compact, well-filled forehead,
the lids were habitually drawn together around his small
twinkling
grey eyes, and his head was set forward upon his shoulders,
in the attitude of one giving close attention. A very
carelessly-tied
cravat, coat-sleeves turned back over the wrist, and hands
that evidently never wore a glove, showed that the passion for
fashionable life, which reigned up stairs, had little influence on
the thoughts or toilettes in the basement below.
Yet, to the policy or proceedings of his wife, to her
expensiveness
,
12
or her choice of friends, her hours of going or coming, her
intimacies or her ambitions, Mr. Leathers made no manner of
objection. He differed wholly from her in her valuation of
things and people, and, perhaps, there was a little dislike of
trouble in his avoidance of the desperate task of setting her right;
but there was another and less easily divined reason for his
strange letting of Mrs. Leathers have her own silly way so
entirely. There was a romantic chivalry of mind, laid away,
unticketted and unsuspected by himself, in a corner of his
capacious
brain, and, silly woman as she was, he had married her for
love. In the suburb where he had found her, she was a sort of
school girl belle, and, as he had not then struck his vein of
prosperity, and was but a poor clerk, with his capacities
unsuspected
,
her station in life was superior to his, and he had first
taken her to his bosom with the feeling of a plebian honored with
the condescending affection of a fair patrician.
To this feeling of gratitude, though they had so essentially
changed placeshe having given her a carriage as a millionaire's
wife, and she having only grown silly, and lost her beautyhe
remained secretly and superstitiously loyal. It was his proud
pleasure to give her everything she could ask for, and still retain
his nominal attitude as the receiver of favor. He never, by look
or word, let Mrs. Leathers understand that the promise of eternal
love was not a promise, religiously to pay. Of the dis-illusion in
his heartof his real judgment of her characterof the entire
abandonment, by his reason, of all the castles in the air for which
he had romantically marriedshe, fortunately, never had a
suspicion
,
or asked a question, and he would have cut off his hand
sooner than enlighten her. In public he assumed a manner of
respect and devotion, because his good sense told him there might
be those who would think ill of her if he did not. Ignorant of the
motive, and his appearance not being fashionable, Mrs. Leathers
would often rather have been waited on by Mr. Cyphers, and this
the husband saw without uneasiness, and would have yielded to,
but for the wish to serve her, in spite of herself. With this single
exception of occasional contradictoriness, and the exercise of
quiet and prior authorityas to his own hours of dining, and his
own comforts, and those of hunchback Lucy, in the basement
the stock-broker and his establishment were under the apparently
complete control of Mrs. Leathers, and, thereby, in a state of
candidacy for admission into the list of New York fashionable
aristocracy.
Of course, Leathers, the stock-broker, had a heart; and, like
other hearts, human and disappointed, it might have buried its
hopes without a funeral, and sought consolation elsewhere without
a drum. It was necessary that he should love and love well.
How long a want of this nature may go unexplained in the breast
that feels itthe love-needing man being miserable, he knows
not whydepends on circumstances; but, as Leathers was
beginning to turn his un-escapeable business faculty of attention
upon himself to see what the deuce he wanted, and how to get it,
he was accidentally appointed, by the whim of a nominating
committee
,
one of the wardens of a poor-house. Compelled, for his
character's sake, to visit and report upon the condition of this
establishment, he chanced to see, in one of the wards, a little
orphan hunchback, whose pitiful and delicate face excited his
compassion. His unemployed heart sprang to the childhe
adopted her, and took her homegave Mrs. Leathers a carriage
and horses on the same day, to appease and propitiate herand
thenceforward had an object of affection, which, (engrossed with
business as he was,) sufficed to fill the void in his existence.
Lucy had no other name, that she knew of, but that was
enough. Her education had been such as she could pick up in
an alms-house, but she was fond of reading, and passionately
fond of music, and when her benefactor was not at home, she
was happy with her books in the arm-chair, or with her piano,
and Mrs. Leathers seldom saw her except at breakfast. Lucy
thought the stock-broker an angel, and so, to her, he was. He
loved her with a tear in his throat, and kissed her small, white
forehead at night and morning, with a feeling many a brilliant
beauty has sighed in vain to awaken. At half-past three, every
day, Leathers alighted from the omnibus, at his own house,
having
,
perhaps, passed his wife in her carriage, on his way up from
Wall street, and, with an eager happiness, unexplained to
himself
,
went in at the basement door and sat down to his punctual
dinner. Lucy dined with him, or sat by the fire. From the
moment of his entering she had no thought, wish, or attention,
for anything but him. Her little thin lips wore an involuntary
smile, and her soft, blue eyes fairly leaned up against his heart in
their complete absorption in what he said. She showed the most
pleasure, however, when he talked most about himself, and, by
questions and leadings of the conversation, she drew from him,
daily, the history of his morning, his hopes, successes, obstacles
or disappointments.
He did not confess to her, for he did not confess to himself,
why
this or that operation had pleased him, but there was
sympathy in having its mere mention heard with carnest
attentiveness
,
and he felt expanded and lightened at heart by her
smile or nod of congratulation. This daily recital, with its
interruptions and digressions, usually occupied the hour of dinner,
and then, genial with his glass of wine and his day's work,
Leathers drew up his chair to Lucy's, and had no earthly
desire
,
save the passing of his evening between her talk and his
newspaper.
Little stuff for poetry as there would seem to be in Wall-street
mornings, Leathers was not undramatic, in his view of his own
worldly position, and in his descriptions of business operations to
Lucy. He had, early in life, looked askance, with some
bitterness
,
at people with whom he could never compete, and at
refinements
and advantages he could never attain. Too sensible a man
to play a losing game at anything, he had stifled his desire to
shine, and locked down the natural chivalry, for which, with his
lack of graces, he was so certain to lack appreciation. In giving
up all hope of distinction in matters of show, however, he had
prepared himself to enjoy more keenly the satisfaction of
controlling
those who were its masters, and it was this secret feeling of
supremacy, over the very throne of the empire that had rejected
and exiled him, which gave his business the zest of a tourney, and
made him dwell on its details, with delight in Lucy's eager and
sympathetic listening.
The household, in short, went on very harmoniously. Mrs.
Leathers was never up at breakfast, and usually made her dinner
of the lunch in her boudoir, at which Mr. Cyphers daily played a
part, and drank his bottle of champagne. Leathers was asleep
when
she
went to bed, she asleep when
he
got up; she spent
money without stint, and used her carriage as she and Mr.
Cyphers
pleased, and that made all comfortable
above
stairs.
Below
,
Leathers was autocrat undisputed, and all was happiness
there.
PART III.
WILL MRS. INGULPHUS CALL?
By the French clock, it was getting towards half-past four in
the drawing-room. At five minutes to four, Mrs. Leathers had
ordered Fuzzard to oil the joint of the door-bell, for it was
inconceivable
that nobody should have come, and perhaps the bell
wouldn't ring. Ladies in good society would give up an
acquaintance
rather than split their gloves open with straining at a tight
bell-handleso Mr. Cyphers seriously assured her.
The afternoon wore on, and still no sign of a visitor. Of her
unfashionable acquaintances she was sure not to see one, for, on
them, Mrs. Leathers had left At Homes for Saturday, to
preserve
an uncontaminated Friday for the list made out by Mr.
Cyphers.
Mrs. Leathers walked the room nervously, and, at every turn,
looked through the lace curtain of her front window.
I'll move from this house, said the unhappy woman, twisting
her handkerchief around her elbow and thumb, for there are
those Sneden girls opposite, with their bonnets on, peeping
through the blinds, and, if nobody comes, they'll stay away
themselves
and tell everybody else. Mr. Cyphers! if some carriage
don't stop at the door before dark, I shall die! How came you
to put those nasty Snedens on the list, Mr. Cyphers? To leave
a card and not have it returned, is so mortifying!
Nasty Snedens, as you say, echoed Cyphers, but it's no
use to despise people till you have something to refuse. Wait
till they want to come to a party because Mrs. Ingulphus is
coming!
Why, do the Snedens know Mrs. Ingulphus? inquired Mrs.
Leathers, half incredulously.
Know her?she couldn't live without them! and glad of
anything to take off the attention of his friend from her
disappointment
,
and enliven the dullness of that very long morning,
Cyphers proceeded to define the Snedens.
They are of a class of families, he continued, common to
every well-regulated society,all girls and all regular failures
a sort of collapsed-looking troop of young ladies, plain and good
for nothing, but dying to be fashionable. Every stylish person
at the head of a set has one such family in her train.
But what on earth can the Snedens do for Mrs. Ingulphus?
inquired Mrs. Leathers rather listlessly.
Why, they pick up her scandal, do her cheap shopping,
circulate
what she wants known, put down reports about her, collect
compliments, entertain bores, praise her friends and ridicule her
rivalsdirty work you may say, but
has to be done!
No `
position'
without itI assure you I have come to that conclusion. In
natural history there is a corresponding classjackals. As
clever what-d'ye-call-him says, a leader of fashion without a
family of girls of disappointed prospects, is like a lion starving to
death for want of jackals.
Twenty minutes to five! digressed Mrs. Leathers; I
wonder
if Mrs. Ingulphus is sick! Oh, Mr. Cyphers! she
continued
,
in a tone of as much anguish as she could possibly feel,
can't
you go round and implore herbeg heranything to
make her comeonly this once! You told me you knew her so
well, and she was certain to be here!
Cyphers, in fact, had about given up Mrs. Leathers's Friday
morning as a failure; but he went on consoling. The light
perceptibly lessened in the room. It was evident that the
evening
,
without any regard to Mrs. Leathers's feelings, was about to
close over the visiting hour. Meantime, however, a scene had
been going on in the basement, which eventually had an
important
influence on Mrs. Leathers's Friday mornings, and of
which we must, therefore, give the reader a glimpse, though, (our
story is getting so long,) we must confine ourselves to its closing
tableau.
PART IV.
WHAT BROUGHT MRS. INGULPHUS.
A middle-aged man, of a very high-bred mould of feature, sat
on the forward edge of a chair, leaning far over the table toward
Mr. Leathers. He was dressed for a dinner party, and a pair of
white gloves lay on the cloth beside him; but his face looked
very little like that of a man on his way to a festivity. The
sweat stood in large drops on his forehead and upper lip. His
closed left hand was clutched in the palm of his right; his
elbows were crowded to his side; his drawn-up shoulders crushed
his white cravat into a wisp under his ears, and he sat with his
mouth partly open, and eyes glaring upon the stock-broker, as if
expecting life or death from his immediate decision. Lucy sat in
her chair, looking on, but not with her ordinary calmness. Her
lips were trembling to speak, and her thin hand clutched the
handle
of the lever which moved her patent chair, while her little
bent back was lifted from its supporting cushion, with the
preparatory
effort to wheel forward. Leathers, on whom her moist
eyes were intently fixed, sat gazing on a bundle of papers, with
his under lip pinched between his knuckle and thumb.
Think, I implore, before you decide, said the visitor, at last,
breaking the silence. You are my last hope! I could not
plead with you this morning in Wall street. I should have
betrayed
myself to people coming in. I did not then think of
asking you again. I went home, despairing. Afraidyes,
afraidto stay alone with my own thoughts, I dressed to go out.
My wife will be here in a moment to take me up, on her way to a
dinner-party. Oh God! how little she dreams we may be
beggars to-morrow!
He pressed his forehead between his two hands for a moment,
and crowded his elbows down upon the table. Lucy rolled her
chair a little forward, but Leathers motioned her back.
You may think, he resumed, that I might go to others
more intimate friendsin such extremityfamily friends. But
I know them. It would be utterly in vain, Mr. Leathers! I
have no friend, much less a relative, in the world, of the least use
in misfortune. I had strained my credit to the last thread before
coming to you, in Wall street. Why I suddenly resolved to
come to you, here, with no claim, and at such an unfit hour for
business, I know not. Instinct prompted. It seemed to me,
while I was dressing, like the whisper of an angel!
12*
Leathers made a movement as if to speak.
Take care, sir! for God's sake, take care! With one word
you may bind me to you while I live, with the gratitude of
desperation
,
or you plunge me into ruin!
The stock-broker took up the schedules of property which lay
before him, and, after an instant's hesitation, pushed them across
the table. During the half-hour, while proud Ingulphus, the
millionaire, had been pleading with him for salvation from ruin,
he had not been examining these, though his eyes were bent on
them. He had satisfied himself of their unavailable value, before
his refusal of the morning. The struggle in his heart between
pity and prudence occupied him now. He knew that the chances
were against his ever seeing again the very large sum necessary to
prevent the present bankruptcy of Ingulphus, and that a turn in
business might make the same urgently necessary to himself
tomorrow
but
his compassion was moved. He would have refused
over again, outright and without ceremony, in Wall street; but
Ingulphus had taken him at a business disadvantage, with his
heart uppermost and open, and a pleading angel listening and
looking on.
As the three sat silent, pity gradually overcoming the reluctant
prudence of the stock-broker's judgment, there was a dash of
wheels and hoofs upon the clear pavement near the curb-stone, a
sudden pull-up, and the splendid equipage of the Ingulphuses
stood at Leathers's door. Lucy's heart sank within her, for she
had been praying to Heaven, with all her might of sympathy and
inward tears, for the success of the plea, and she felt that the
influence of this ostentatious arrival was unfavorable. Leathers
looked over his shoulder into the street, and rose from his chair as
the footman in livery crossed the sidewalk to ring the bell.
For God's sake! gasped the desperate pleader, in an
agonised tone, knitting his hands together, and turning his face
with the movement, as the stock-broker took his stand before the
fire.
There was refusal in the attitude of Leathers, and in his brow,
compressed with the effort to utter it.
The thin, white fingers of the little hunchback gently took the
hand of her benefactornow brought within her reachand held
it to her lips, while the tears dropped upon it freely.
For
my sake!
she murmured, in a tone of appealing and
caressing tenderness, which a more hard-hearted man than her
benefactor would have been troubled to resist.
Leathers turned and opened his large eyes with an expression
of sudden tenderness upon her.
For
your
sake be it, then, my sweet child! he said, giving
her a kiss with a rapid movement, as if his heart had joyfully
broken through its restraint with the impulse she had lent it.
And now, for the sake of this little angel, Mr. Ingulphus,
he continued
But the sudden rush of hope, and the instant relaxation of
despair, were too much for the high-strung frame of the proud
suppliant.
Excited to the utmost tension by anxiety, and, doubtless, for
months overdone with sleeplessness and fatigue, his nervous
system gave way, and, as Leathers turned to him from Lucy, he
fell fainting from his chair.
To ring the bell and send suddenly to the carriage for Mrs.
Ingulphus, was the work of a moment; and, to the astonishment
of the Snedens opposite, and the mingled relief and surprise of
Cyphers and Mrs. Leathers, who were peeping at the carriage
from the drawing-room window, the queen of the up-town fashion
ran up the steps, in full dinner-dress, and went in at the
Leathers's!
A present of a bouquet with the Snedens's card the next
morning was the beginning of Mrs. Leathers's recognition by the
discriminating paste-board of fashionbut there are many, who,
(till they read this story), have considered Mrs. Leathers's
admission
to the lngulphus's set, as one of the most inexplicable
mysteries of this astounding century.
THE ICY VEIL;
OR, THE KEYS TO THREE HEARTS THOUGHT COLD.
On
an afternoon of Autumn's tranquillizing and thoughtful
sweetness, the public band, in the Rosenthal of Leipsic, chanced
upon an air that troubled the tears of a lady among the listeners.
The music, which is sometimes stationed at a small garden nearer
the town, was, for that day, at the
caf
, deeper in the wood; and
the small tables scattered around beneath the trees, were, at this
hour, covered by the coffee and ices of the crowd, an untouched
glass of sherbet (her apology for occupancy of a chair) standing
before the lady to whose heart the music, as it seemed, had an
errand. It was an hour every way delicious, and to all there who
had not, in their own bosoms, the discontent that dissolved the
spell, the gardens of the Rosenthal were, for that evening,
enchanted. The shadow under the thick grove was golden with
the coming sunset. The gaily-painted porticoes of the little
maison de plaisance
looked festal with the addition of the bright
colors of shawls and bonnets, students' caps and soldiers'
uniforms
.
The avenues around were thronged with promenaders.
Flower-girls curtsied about with baskets of roses.
The lady in the simple straw bonnet was alone, except that a
servant, standing at the entrance of the wicket enclosure,
unobstrusively
kept her in sight. She was dressed with a skill
detectable
only by those of her own class in life, and, to all eyes,
plainly; but the slender wreath of blue and crimson flowers
which lay well back between the bonnet and the oval of her
cheek, betrayed an unwillingness that the dark hair should be
robbed wholly of embellishing contrast, and her movements,
though habitual and unthought of, were those of unerring elegance,
impressed (indefinably but effectually) with a singular pride and
majesty. Beauty, such as is appreciable by common eyes, she
had not. The freshness of youth had departed; but, to the few
who know, at first sight, the lustrous up-gleaming from a warm
heart deeply covered, she would, at this moment, have seemed
more beautiful than in youth. The morning light throws a glitter
upon the surface of the sea, that pleases the thoughtless; but the
diver for pearls finds more beauty in the unglittering
profoundness
of the sea's look at noon.
Betrayals by angels (it may be!) of what the pride would
wrongfully conceal, are the tears, so little subject to the bidding
of the eyes that shed them; and those to which the music of the
Rosenthal had so unexpectedly called upon to give testimony,
were destined to fulfil their mission. A new comer to the crowd
had taken his seat at a table under the porticoa young man of
remarkable beauty of personand, at the same moment that,
with a start of surprise, he rose to address the lady as a recognized
acquaintance, her suffused eyes arrested his attention, and
prevented
what would have been, at that moment, an evident
intrusion. Resuming his seat, and guarding against recognition,
by bringing the lattice of the portico between himself and his
discovery, he had leisure, during the playing of an overture of
Mozart, to marvel at so singular a rencontre in a public garden
of
Leipsic; and still more, at such a miracle of things out of place,
as tears in the cold eyes of a woman he had thought made of
marble!
With his fancy weaving cobwebs of conjecture on these points,
however, the attention of the stranger was, a second time,
arrested. A Tyrolese glove-girl, in the drooping hat and short
green petticoat of her country, had approached him with her box
suspended over her shoulder, and, with a second glance at her
face, he had smilingly removed his ring, and extended his hand to
be fitted with a specimen of her merchandise; availing himself of
the opportunity to study her features with the absorbing gaze of
an artist. His mind was pre-occupied, however. Hours after, the
peculiar value (artistically speaking) of the physiognomy he thus
unconsciously stored away, became for the first time apparent to
him, and he wondered that he could have parted, so carelessly, with
a face so full of meaning But his own featuresbeautiful to a
degree seldom seen in the person of a manwere destined to be
better remembered.
The music ceased suddenly, and the lady in the straw bonnet,
followed at a distance by her servant, took her way long the
meadow-path of the Rosenthal. After a few steps she was over
taken by the artist.
The Countess Isny-Frere, or her apparition, I believe! he
said, removing his hat and addressing her with the deference of a
ceremonious acquaintance.
She stopped suddenly, with a look that began in unwelcome
surprise, and ended in well-bred carelessness.
I must rally, to think which it is that you see, she replied,
for (I have the pleasure of speaking to Mr. Tremlet, I believe)
the sight of an English face has startled me, soul or body, quite
out of Leipsic!
And may I ask, meantime, what Leipsic has done to deserve
a visit from the Countess Isny-Frere? he gayly continuedbut
the next instant he remembered that he had but just now seen
tears in the eyes of the stately person he was addressing, and his
tone and manner became suddenly thoughtful and subdued. The
transition was one of insensible ease, howeverthe certainty that
he was thus ministering to her chance mood giving him a
confidence
,
the key to which she was little aware of having herself
furnished; and, as they slowly paced the smooth walk of the
Rosenthal, the two, who had never before met but as formal
acquaintances
,
fell gradually far within the limits of ceremonious
reserve.
The darkly-shaded avenue that alternately touches and recedes
from the banks of the Elster, is like a succession of approaches
to lovely picturesso beautiful are the sudden disclosures of the
secluded bends of the river, at the openings contrived for the
purpose. At each opening there is a seat beneath the trees, the
swift waters curling its eddies to the bank on which it is placed,
and he would be a cold observer of Nature who could pass such
landscapes without availing himself of the opportunity to loiter.
Seated in these successive nooks, and leisurely pacing the
winding
alleys that intervene, Tremlet and the Countess had each the
leisure to weigh the expediency of extending acquaintance into
friendship; though, in the mind of each, an under-current of
wondering reverie kept pace with the conversationeach other's
capability of natural and tender thoughtfulness being a mutual and
most pleasurable surprise. To Tremlet, more particularly, the
riddle was inexplicable, for the Countess's simple and confiding
ingenuousness was wholly irreconcileable with her character as a
heartless leader of fashion. Her house, of all resorts of
exclusiveness
,
in London, was the one, he believed, the most
heartlessly
frequented, and she herself known, even among her friends,
by the appellation of the cold Countess, was esteemed, by
society
at large, as the pre-eminent model of a worldlingproud,
cautious, and passionless.
Tremlet's errand to Germany was briefly told. He was
uniting
a partly professional object with a summer's excursion.
The great Fair of Leipsic had drawn him hither from the Rhine,
for in no other gathering in the world, perhaps, are there
assembled
so many varieties of strange costume and physiognomy; and
in a week's jostling among the long-robed and bearded Hebrews,
the green-jacketed Tyrolese, the mild Hungarians, and the
German
mountaineers and students, he looked to find novel subjects
for his pencil. But this was not all. He had been long seeking
a model of female beauty for an unfinished pictureone which
he designed for the
chef d'uvre
of his penciland the peculiar
quality of maiden countenance that was necessary to its
completion
had evaded, thus far, both his search among the living, and
his imaginative conception. As the subject of the picture had
been suggested by one of the wild legends of Tieck, he thought
it more probable that he should find the face also in the
neighborhood
of the first inspiration.
And, strangely enough, he added, after a moment's pause
I saw a glove-girl in the garden where I met you, whose
countenance
impresses me more in remembrance than when I saw it
possibly one of those faces that lack but the heightening of their
natural expression to become beautiful.
He stopped abruptly, recalling musingly the singular
countenance
of the Tyrolese, and mentally resolving to find her on the
morrow, and induce her to sit to him for a portrait of careful
study. The Countess at this moment chose the left of two paths
the one which she took leading in the direction opposite from
the return through the Park.
It is my turn at the confessional, she said, and(she
hesitated, coloring slightly)I presume it would be my best
policy, if I am not to part from you before going further, to be
frank as to the `wherefore' of my summering here at Leipsic.
Whole secrets, she added, smilingly, are better kept than
halves, and less dangerous if told.
She resumed after a few steps onward.
You will be surprised to discover how little mystery there
need be, properly, in what looks at first sight so formidably
mysterious
my
giving up of friends and identity for four months in
the yearbut my friends in England should be as welcome to the
secret as you will be, if they could comprehend it, or would give
any credit, indeed, either to the simplicity of my life here, or its
still more incredibly simple motive. You know how I live in
London. I lack nothing there that can be given to a woman of
wealth and position. But I have another home which is far
sweeter to mea small house in a village adjoining this Park of
the Rosenthal. The exterior of this little retreat, which I will
presently show you, looks as it did when I first saw itlike the
house of a German villagerbut the interior is, of course, suited
to my taste and liking. The village, by the way, is celebrated as
having been the residence of Schiller, who lodged for some time in
one of its humble houses, and wrote here his famous `Song to
Joy'but it is a veritable village at this day, and, though a most
desirable residence, as standing on the skirt of a Park which
alone separates it from Leipsic, it is inhabited only by veritable
villagersmyself hardly a noticeable exception. Here I have a
faithful household of servants who know me but by the German
name of my husband's family(by-the-bye, remember to address
me in conversation as Madame Isny)and who serve me without a
question, as a widow who has reasons for being absent a great
part of the year. But the sunset is losing its brilliancy. Let us
hasten our steps towards this mysterious `whereabout' of mine.
Over a cup of tea, I may, perhaps, tell you its `why and
wherefore
.'
A sudden turn from the graveled walk of the Park brought
them to a rude and picturesque bridge over a mill-stream, and a
narrow lane led thence to the village. The street upon which
they entered was a common thoroughfare, between irregular rows
of houses, each with its rough gate and shrubbery, and the
humble
entrance to one of these, which was in no way distinguished
from the rest, was opened by the plainly dressed servant of the
Countess. A small garden, arranged after the common manner
of the country, separated the front door from the neighbor's wall.
The entry was of German simplicity, and a small room on the
right, in which the Countess first, with mischievous formality,
requested
Tremlet to be seated, was uncarpeted and furnished with
the ill-contrived conveniencies of a German parlorevidently
kept as a place of reception for any intrusive visitor whose
curiosity
might be troublesome. But, from the landing of the dark
staircase leading to the second-story, Tremlet entered an
apartment
occupying the whole upper floor of the house, and here he
recognized, at once, a fitting home for the luxurious habits of the
inmate. It was a blending of boudoir and library, in which there
was nothing merely for show, but everything for luxurious case
a charming abundance of fawn-colored divans, bookcases and
contrivances for comfortthe mirror panels so multiplying the
recesses, and so deceiving the eye as to the space enclosed between
the walls, that it seemed a little wilderness of indefinable extent
and luxury. The single alteration that had been made in the
exterior of the house was in the long window, from the ceiling to
the floor, which was of a single plate of glass, so clear that it was
difficult to tell whether it was shut or open. This costly change
in the humble architecture was on the side opposite from the
street, invisible to the passers-by; and as the house stood on the
little acclivity of the village, the window commanded a lovely
reach over the Rosenthal, with glimpses of the Elster.
An artist of genius is more than half poet, and Tremlet's
appreciation
of this unsuspected hiding-place of feminine caprice
was glowingly complete. Left alone for a few minutes, he smiled
as he buried himself in the silken cushions of a divan,
remembering
how formally he had visited in London the presiding spirit of
this living romance, and how mistakenly from what he thus
hastily saw of her, he had pronounced upon her character as cold
and ostentatious. As yet, it is true, he was in the dark as to the
motive of this singular seclusion; but her conversation in the
Rosenthal had been of a thoughtful and unaffected earnestness,
that satisfied him completely of the elevation and purity of the
heart in which the motive had its source, however singular the
whim by which it found its way to development.
A most delicious strain of music commenced suddenly. It was
like that of a band stationed at just such a distance that the
articulation of the harmony and melody came, to the room in
which he sat, softened to the most dreamy degree short of
indistinctness
.
That is Beethoven's Sonata to Giulietta, said the Countess,
entering, and it is one of the most eloquent replies of music to
the dumb questioning of a heart-ache that was ever vouchsafed to
mortal inspiration. You must not think it theatrical in me to
have surprised you with music, she added with a deprecating
humility, that sat very gracefully on her proud lips, for, to tell
you the truth, you have brought London eyes into my hitherto
unseen seclusion, and I cannot resist feeling, for the moment, that
the ideal of the spot is a little disenchanted. The music which
is ordinarily my only company, is so associated with my solitude
that it will re-conjure the spirit of the spotbut, meantime, let
me dissolve the mystery of its production.
The Countess touched a spring which threw open one of the
mirror panels of the library, and disclosed a little oratory, or
chapel, decorated simply with one female figure, of exquisite
sculpture, whose face was hidden in prayerthe cross and the
devotee both in chased silver. This again swung partly open,
and showed a closet in the wall, filled with musical cylinders like
the barrels of an organ.
This, of course, she said, is but a musical box on an
extended
scale, but it has very varied capabilities. It was
constructed
for me by an ingenious Swiss, who changes or adds to its
numerous barrels at my pleasure; but I must own that I am as
little fickle in my musical likings as in my foundness for poems,
and I can scarce tire of a composition that has once moved me.
You are aware that several of the composers of Germany have
tried their hands upon `Songs without words,' in imitation of this
touching love-letter in music, which you have just heard, and
which Beethoven addressed to the high-born Giulietta. By this
to my apprehension at leastthey have advanced one chamber
nearer to the inner sanctuary of feeling, of which common music,
if I may so express it, fills only the ante-chamber. I have had
all these `Songs without words' added to my little musical
oratory, and the barrels are so arranged that I can either select
the melodies I want, or let them follow in a chance succession of
several hours' continuance. I used to be fond of the harp; but
playing requires an effortand to think luxuriously during music,
one should be the listener and not the player. Any trouble with
the procuring of music spoils it for me, and if the music is to be
used as an habitual accompaniment to reverie, some such obedient
automaton as this must be resorted to.
Tremlet begged to listen to it in silence for awhile.
It shall play while we idle over our tea, said the Countess,
after a few minutes of silent attentionpossibly in that time it
may exorcise the English presence out of the room; but you are
too new a comer to be admitted at once to the full luxury of
silence.
The closet of music, with its costly intricacy of mechanism,
was closed and left to play. Its effects, softened with the shutting
of the doors, were choral and orchestral, and, in wonderful
resemblance to the performances of a troop of admirable
musicians
,
it executed the delicious compositions chosen as food for
reverie. The twilight had meantime died away, and as the room
was flooded with a soft light from lamps unseen, Tremlet felt
himself fully subject to the influence of the spot.
It is indeed a place where one might forget the world, he
said at last.
It is a place in which to rest from the world, replied the
Countess, and in that you have the key of the use to which I
devote it. You need not be reminded what London ishow
wearisome its round of well-bred gayetieshow heartless and cold
its fashionable display. Providence, I think, has confined to a
comparatively low level the hearty and joyous sympathies of our
nature; and it avenges the humble, that the proud, who rise above
them, rise also above the homely material for happiness. An
aristocrat I am doomed to be. I am, if I may so express it,
irrevocably
pampered, and must live and associate with the class in
which I have been thrown by accident and education. But how
inexpressibly tedious to me is the round of such a life, the pains I
have here taken to procure a respite from it, may, perhaps,
partially convey to you. It is possibleprobable indeedthat I
entertain at my house people who envy me the splendors I
dispense
,
yet who are themselves happier than I. To young people,
for whom it is a noveltyto lovers whose happiness is wholly
separable from all around themto the ambitious who use it as a
convenient laddergay London life is (what any other life would
be with the same additions) charming. But, to one who is
not youngfor whom love is a closed book, and who has no
ambition in progressthis mere society, without heart or
joyousness
,
is a desert of splendor. I walk through my thronged rooms,
and hear, night after night, the same ceremonious nothings. I
drive in my costly equipage, separated by its very costliness from
the sympathy of the human beings who pass me by. There are
those who call themselves my intimate friends; but their friendship
lacks homeliness and abandonment. Fear of committal, dread of
ridicule, policy to please or repel, are like chains worn unseen on
the tongues and hearts of all who walk the world at that level.
Tremlet listened without reply, except in looks expressive of
assent.
It has probably passed through your mind, continued the
Countess, that I might have found a seclusion, as complete as
this, in a remote part of England. But I chose Germany for
several reasons. I was partly educated here, and the language
and habits of the people are like those of a native land to me.
My husband's relatives, on one side of the descent, are German,
and a presumed visit to these connections furnishes the necessary
excuse for absenting myself unattended. But, above all, the
people are differentthe pervading magnetism of the common
air is as different as that of another planet. I see no society, it
is true. My musical oratory and my books are all the
companionship
I have, within doors. But I go into the public gardens
of the Rosenthal, (as in Germany a lady may,) not only fearing
no intrusion, but receiving, as one of the crowd, my share of its
social magnetism. The common enjoyment of the music of the
band brings all in the crowd to a temporary common sympathy.
Rid thus of the `fine lady' separation between me and my kind,
which I feel in England like a frozen wall, my heart expandsI
cannot express to you how genially and breathingly! And now
is all this comprehensible to you? asked the Countess, crushing
her handkerchief, with both hands upon her eyes, with the
natural
suddenness of an impassioned child.
The reply was one that gave no check to the expansion of
heart on which she had entered.
This is singular frankness on my part, she continued. I
presume I shall not discover immediately why I am thus
unguardedly
confiding in one whom I have only known hitherto as
an acquaintance. It is an instinctive impulse, however, and I
trust it. I was hesitating before trying to express another charm
of this seclusion to mepartly because I feared I should find
some difficulty in putting my meaning into language, and more,
perhaps, because it will be the disclosure of a feeling which I
have, as yet, hardly dared to summon up for my own
examination
.
In this joyous out-of-doors society of Germanyin the
general distribution of complaisance and regard, the interchange
of kindly salutations between all classes, and the strong
expressions
of good will in which ordinary politeness is usually phrased
I find, somehow, a prolonging of the life-time of the affections
a continuance of verdure, as it were, into the desert of the age
past loving. A wise woman submits, of course, with well-bred
outward acquiescence, when the world's manner informs her that
the love-summer of her youth is over. But it came upon
me
when my heart was in the most prodigal flowering of its
tenderness
when
my capacity to
give
love, at least, was growing, it
seemed to me, hourly, of more value and profoundness. To
abandon,
then
, all hope of lovingand with this unlavished wealth
too in the heartwas society's bitter exaction. I submitted. I
would not be the ridicule of the world, for pretensions to
attractiveness
I had outlived, nor would I be a mark for such attentions
as are always ready for those who seem approachable through
weakness. I was a widow, wealthy, and without children; and,
if I would retain the pride of my position, and, particularly, if I
would defy the malice of the envious, I must either marry a man
older than myself or show the seeming of a heart beyond all
possible
susceptibility. You yourself visited me in this latter
character
,
and you know how unshrinkingly, when in England, I
revolve and shine in my icy orbit! Oh, I have a thousand times
envied the beggar at my door! But this life must be lived on.
Walls within wallscircumstances and feelings I cannot now
explain
to youhedge in the necessity of my continuing the
maintenance
of this conspicuous station in England. Respite,
however
breathing
13
timeis indispensable! To escape from those
who so relentlessly measured my period of loveablenessto step
out from my fixed place among those of mature years, though
without a thought of resuming youthto descend from the cold
height of exclusiveness, and claim, once a year, my common share
of common life and sympathyfor these privileges, and to relax
tongue and heart in weeks of luxurious silence and
self-abandonment
I
contrived the retreat you have stumbled upon.
Did you think, asked the Countess, touching the spring of
the enchanted closet, and with a gesture compelling silence for
the music, by way obviating replydid you think that this
formidable mystery had so little in it that was mysterious?
With luxury, music and complete isolation fom the world, love
ripens apace. It was one morning, but a fortnight after the
chance meeting of the Countess and Tremlet, described in the
foregoing pages, that the artist found himself, for the first time
in his life, wholly unsusceptible of the seductive temptings of his
pencil. He could not paint. Something more critical than any
ordinary anxiety outweighed his art. There sat Jessonda, the
Tyrolese, in the posture in which she was daily placed(for the
character her portrait was to represent)the half-finished sketch
on his easel fairly breathing with a new vision of beautybut he
saw, that day, neither the sketch nor Jessonda. The living
original
might well have inspired him, however, for love more intense
than was expressed in her face and posture, never offered itself
to be pictured. So, indeed, the artist had interpreted it, if one
might believe his canvasfor her intense gaze of adoration was
well copied, though with the addition of a lofty refinement of
intellect
breathing through the strangely expressive lineaments
but he had given his imagination credit for the love as well as th
intellect portrayed before him.
With no suspicion of what so distracted his attention for that
day, however, Jessonda was troubled. In the usually absorbed
devotion
of the artist to her portraitin the flushed cheek and
eager
eye with which he gazed on the face she saw copied from her
ownshe had found stuff for dreams that made her capable of
jealousy when that picture was neglected. She had half risen
to leave him, when a servant entered with a letter. The door
closed upon her as he broke the seal, and Jessonda and his picture
were at once forgotten in the persual
My Dear Tremlet
,In the two days that I have exiled
you from my presence, I have exiled my happiness alsoas you
well know without my confessingbut I needed to sleep and wake
more than once upon your welcome but unexpected avowal. I
fear, indeed, that I need much more time, and that reflection
would scarce justify what I am now about to write to you. But
my life, hitherto, has been such a succession of heart-chilled
waitings
upon Reason, that, for once, while I have the power, I am
tempted to bound away with Impulse, after happiness.
Of course you understand in this an acceptance of your offer.
But I have conditions to impose. It is possible that you may
withdraw your offer when you know them. Yet they are so
much of a character with our acquaintance, and with our
intercourse
,
for the month into which we have crowded an age, that
I have strong hopes of your not finding them distasteful. Let me
preface my exactions by some sort of apology, howevershowing
you, that is to say, the ground work of the foible (if such you
think it) which is to be humored by your acquiescence.
I have partially expressed to you, in conversation, how
completely
my whole life has been a sacrifice of natural preferences
to worldly expediency. For my present station, such as it is, I
have given gradually the entire provision made by nature for my
happinessmy girlish joyfulness, my woman's power of loving,
my hopes, my dreams, my sympathies, my person. I was forced
to sacrifice an early affection, to marry for title and fortune. I
have since been unceasingly called upon to choose between my
heart's wishes and freedom from humiliation. You will say
it was at my own risk if I preferred the latterbut in every
important
crisis of option, the threatened evils looked appalling,
and the happiness comparatively partial. Meantime, (I am quite
ready to believe,) my pride has been thus fed to a disease.
Of course there is something wrung from the world by these
sacrifices. To most victims, the wordly advantages are a
sufficient
consolation. But fortune and title alone would not have
continued to tempt me. I could be happy without homage,
and with a hundredth part of the luxury I can command. But
there is another privilege, accompanying high station coldly
maintained
,
and bought by me with these same bitter sacrifices
a
disdainful
independence
of the world that has so robbed us! What
will you say if I tell you that this is what I am trying to preserve
to myself
as a twin happiness with your love!
What will you
think of me, if I confess to you, that the strongest feeling in my
bosom, till you wakened love there, was resentment against
society for the cruelties it has sown my life with! Individuals of
course are blameless of design against me, but the cruelty lies in
the pervading heartlessness of the class. In their mockery of
everything but that which dazzles themin their polished
rejoicing
over the downfall of any social superioritylies the
inevitableness
of the submissions I resent. Is it strange, then, that
I wish to
preserve an ascendancy over it, and remain above its sneer or its
pity
? With the glow of tenderness now in my heart, I cannot
find the bitter words to express to you how much I value this
undeniable power of disdainbut this it is which seems to me the
only equivalent I have wrung from the worldthis it is which I
look on as the true price of the heart sold, pulse by pulse, at the
hateful
bidding of the opinions of the class I live in! And (for you have
already seen my drift) it is this privilege which an open marriage
with you would endanger. You are ten years younger than I.
Your character and tastes are peculiar. The qualities you love
in me, ripen only in the meridian of life. We shall be happy in
marriage, I have reason to believe.
But the world would not
believe
it!
Oh no! The first knowledge of the step would be
received
with a smile, and, with that smile, lightly as it would pass
around, would fall from me, like a dream, the ascendancy in which
lies my power.
Of course you anticipate what I have to propose. I will but
name it to you now, and explain its possibility when we meet. It
is to
marry you privately
, here in Germany. After a week more
in this sweet retirement, (for my time here is nearly expired,) I
will leave you, and resume my apparently heartless life in
England
.
You shall return to England soon yourself, also
apparently
single, and we will be known to the world but as we werethe
cold Countess Isny-Frere, and Tremlet, the unimpressible
artist. The secret can be kept. More difficult things are done
by the simplest people around us. Part of the year we will pass
in this retirement or another, and, with means so ample as mine,
and a character so little open to suspicion of such a secret,
innumerable
varieties, in the masquerading part of our life, will
always
be possible.
Do you not see, my gifted and beautiful lover, how I thus add, to
the wealth of your affection, the jewel for which I sold all my
happiness till I met you? Do not feel offended that in your love
I have not forgotten it. We value what has cost us our heart's
blood, though it be but a worthless trifle to another. Oh, you
must let me preserve my icy veil between me and the world
preserve it, for my heart to beat behind it, in a heaven of every
day affection. I plead for it with my whole soulbut
it is yours
to decide!
I began my letter thinking that I should inflexibly
exact it. I could not hesitate, however, now, in a choice between
it and you. I will marry you openly if you so require.
Come to me at sunset. Having once broken my wish to you,
I can venture to talk of it. And nowimpatient to press my
lips upon your beautiful foreheadI record myself your
Edith
.
Another fortnight had elapsed. The golden light of another
autumnal sunset streamed into the painting room of Tremlet, at
Leipsic. Around, against the walls, stood unfinished sketches,
in oil, of the most peculiar faces and costumes that had been seen
during the crowded fair just over. A Jew from Poland, with his
shaggy fur cap, pelisse and shaggy beard; a Greek from
Constantinople
,
in flowing juktanilla and cap of scarlet; peasants and
peasant girls, with the sunny hair and strange dresses of
mountain
Germany; pedlars from the Friuli, and Hungarians swathed
in twine and tatters, were here transferred from the street to
canvas
material
to figure hereafter in groups of historical pictures.
But, among these rough sketches (that, rude as they were, still
showed the hand of the master) there was one subject finished
with careful study
a portrait of the Tyrolean glove-girl
true
to life, yet representing a quality of beauty rare as the second
rainbow! It stood now upon the painter's easela figure of
matchless nobleness and graceand the colors were fresh about
the lips, where he had retouched them within the parting hour.
The original of this
treasure trove
(for such was the face of
Jessonda to the artist) had just risen from the kneeling posture,
in which she had bent herself to his elaborate pencil for an hour
of almost every day since their first meeting in the Rosenthal;
and she stood looking alternately at her portrait and at him, with
compressed lips, and an expression far beyond a gratified curiosity.
With the eye of genius Tremlet had seen, in this girl's embryal
beauty, the look with which it would beam, were it perfected to the
utmost capability of its peculiar type; and she saw now, on the
easel, a beauty that could only be hers after years of culture, yet
of which she still felt as conscious as of the swelling heart under
her boddice of green. Her emotions had grown from day to day
more tumultuous. While the artist looked on
her
beauty as on
the fitting but cold and shuttered tenement of an unarrived angel
of intellect, she looked on his as on something already worthy of
the idolatrous worship of that angel. The coupling of the two
before herherself, as made beautiful on canvas, and the artist,
as he stood breathingly beautiful in the glowing light of the
sunset
was
an appreciation of fitness that might well have come to
a brain less enamored. Tremlet was as perfect in form and
feature
as a sculptor's ideal of Antinous. His personal advantages
had (contradictorily enough) increased by undervaluing; for, of
the adulation that had been paid him in his first manhood, the
greater part, of course, had come from the thoughtless and silly,
and he had flung himself, with the reaction of disgust, upon the
cultivation of qualities less open to common appreciation.
Absorbed
in his art, he had half lost the remembrance of his beauty;
and nature, thus left to herself in one of her most felicitous
combinations
,
added one grace morethat of a noble
unconsciousness
.
After a few years of seclusion, his eminent promise in the
art brought him back by a new gate to society, and it was as
Tremlet the distinguished artist, that he had been a formal visitor
at the house of the Countess Isny-Frere. His early shrinking
from superficial admiration, however, had left a habit in his
manners
that acted like an instinctive avoidance of the gay and
youthful, and he passed for a dreamy man, as marble cold as he
was splendidly handsome. The Countess had exchanged with him
the politenesses of society without suspicion of his true nature. In
the masked procession of London life, spirits the most congenial
may walk side by side for years without recognition.
Upon Jessonda, the glove-girl, Tremlet had made an indelible
impression, the day she fitted his hand from her glove-case in the
garden of the Rosenthal. His manner to her was soft and
winning
,
without the forwardness against which she was habitually
armed; and, possessed herself of mental superiority in the rough,
she had recognized his nobleness without being able to define it.
Vivid as was her admiration, however, she would probably have
parted from him without the aspiring venture of loving him, if
she had not seen disclosed, in the daily progress of her picture,
an angel's ladder by which the heaven of an equality with him
might be reached. She felt, within her, a vague consciousness of
the character he had drawn in the elevated beauty of her
portrait. She was capable, she thought, to become like to
this heightened semblance of herself. It explained her waking
dreams. Her heart declared itself interpreted in the picture's
expression. But prophetic flattery, more bewildering was never
addressed to mortaland it was little wonder that the heart of
Jessonda sprang to its interpreter. As she looked now upon the
pictured foreshadowing of what she
might be
, and from that to the
noble form that stood beside it, she saw, with a glowing soul, that
were it the picture of his wife, it would be a picture of his mate
by nature. The chasm between her present self and her arrival
at the lofty reach of this pictured equality, she shrank from
measuring. Hope threw before it its glittering veil. Ah, poor
Jessonda!
She took up from the floor her tall hat with its gold tassel.
The band of Tyrolese merchants were already on their way
southward
,
and she was waited for by her kinsmen at the gate of
Leipsic.
When shall we meet again? asked Tremlet, taking her two
hands kindly for a farewell.
She raised his hands hurriedly to her lips, choked back her
emotion with a strong effort, and pointed to the picture.
Remember me by that, she said, not by what I am!
When you see me again I shall be like it!
Another instant and she was gone.
Her voice lingered on the painter's ear, and, after a few
minutes
of musing, he started to recall her, for her words suddenly
assumed a new meaning to him; but another thought checked
him, and he returned to his studio, oppressed with an
embarrassing
sadness. He lighted his lamp and sat down to write
to his bride, who, a few days before, had preceded him on her
way to England.
It was five years after the acting of this chance romance at
Leipsic, when Europe became filled with the murmur of a
new renown; and, from her
debt
at Vienua, the great songstress,
13*
, made her way through adoring capitals toward London.
Report spoke in wonder of the intellect that beamed through her
expressive beauty, but with still more emphatic wonder at such
passionate fervor in the acting of one whose heart seemed
invulnerable
to love; and while articles of agreement were concluding
at Brussels for her appearance at the Queen's Opera, the
exclusives
of London were delighted to know that they should first
have a privileged sight of the unsusceptible enchantress, for the
cold Countess had sent over a messenger to engage her for a
private concert.
A few days wore on, and her arrival in England was announced;
and, on the morning of the day on which she was to sing at the
concert of the Countess Isny-Frere, Tremlet the artist received,
at his studio, the following brief letter:
I promised to return to you when I should resemble my
picture
.
It is possible that exile from your presence has marred
more beauty than mental culture has developedbut the soul
you drew in portrait has, at least found its way to my features
for the world acknowledges what you alone read prophetically at
Leipsic. I have kept myself advised of your movements, with a
woman's anxiety. You are still toiling at the art which made us
acquainted, and, (thank God!)
unmarried
. To-night, at the
concert of the Countess Isny-Frere, I shall sing to you, for I
have taken pains to know that you will be there. Do not speak
to me till you can see me alonebut hear me in my art before
I abandon myself to the joy long deferred, of throwing myself
at your feet with the fortune and fame it is now mine to offer
you.
Only yours,
Jessonda
.
But Jessonda did not sing for the Countess that night. The
guests were assembled, and the leading performers of the opera
were there, to accompany the new
prima donna
, when a note
arrived, written apparently by her
dame de compagnie
, and
announcing
her sudden and unaccountable illness. As she had been seen
driving in the Park that afternoon, apparently in perfect health,
it was put down as one of the inexplicable caprices common to
those intoxicated with sudden fame, and paragraphed upon,
accordingly
,
in the morning papers. The disappointment to the
Countess was less than to her guestsfor she had lived, now
five years, in a world of happiness little suspected by the gay
world about herbut, slight as it was, she chanced long to
remember
it by a coincidence. In her private journal, under the
same date with the record of so comparative a trifle as a public
singer's failure to appear at her concert, was recorded, with a
trembling hand, the first cloud upon her life of secret happiness
her husband, Tremlet, having come to her, after the departure
of her guests that night, with a gloom upon his spirits, over
which her caresses, for the first time, had no power!
BORN TO LOVE PIGS AND CHICKENS.
The
guests at the Astor House were looking mournfully out of
the drawing-room windows, on a certain rainy day of an October
passed over to history. No shoppingno visiting! The
morning
must be passed in-doors. And it was some consolation, to
those who were in town for a few days to see the world, that
their time was not quite lost, for the assemblage in the large
drawing-room was numerous and gay. A very dressy affair is the
drawing-room of the Astor, and as full of eyes as a peacock's tail
(which, by the way, is also a very dressy affair). Strangers
who wish to see and be seen (and especially be seen) on rainy
days, as well as on sunny days, in their visits to New York,
should, as the phrase goes, patronize the Astor. As if there
was any
patronage
in getting the worth of your money!
Wellthe people in the drawing-room looked a little out of
the windows, and a great deal at each other. Unfortunately, it is
only among angels and underbred persons that introductions can
be dispensed with, and, as the guests of that day at the Astor
House were mostly strangers to each other, conversation was very
fitful and guarded, and any movement whatever extremely
conspicuous
.
There were four very silent ladies on the sofa, two
very silent ladies in each of the windows, silent ladies on the
ottomans, silent ladies in the chairs at the corners, and one silent
lady, very highly dressed, sitting on the music-stool, with her
back to the piano. There was here and there a gentleman in the
room, weather-bound and silent; but we have only to do with one
of these, and with the last-mentioned much-embellished young
lady.
Well, I can't sit on this soft chair all day, cousin Meg! said
the gentleman.
'Sh!call me Margaret, if you must speak so loud, said the
lady. And what would you do out of doors this rainy day?
I'm sure it's very pleasant here.
Not for me. I'd rather be thrashing in the barn. But there
must be some `rainy-weather work' in the city as well as the
country. There's some fun,
I
know, that's kept for a wet day,
as we keep corn-shelling and grinding the tools.
Dear me!
Wellwhat now?
Oh, nothing!but I
do
wish you wouldn't bring the stable
with you to the Astor House.
The gentleman slightly elevated his eyebrows, and took a leaf
of music from the piano, and commenced diligently reading the
mystic dots and lines. We have ten minutes to spare before the
entrance of another person upon the scene, and we will make use
of the silence to conjure up for you, in our magic mirror, the
semblance of the two whose familiar dialogue we have just jotted
down.
Miss Margaret Pifflit was a young lady who had a large share
of what the French call
la beaut du diable
youth and freshness.
(Though, why the devil should have the credit of what never
belonged to him, it takes a Frenchman, perhaps, to explain.) To
look at, she was certainly a human being in very high perfection.
Her cheeks were like two sound apples; her waist was as round
as a stove-pipe; her shoulders had two dimples just at the back,
that looked as if they defied punching to make them any deeper;
her eyes looked as if they were just made, they were so bright and
new; her voice sounded like C sharp in a new piano; and her
teeth were like a fresh break in a cocoa-nut. She was inexorably,
unabatedly, desperately healthy. This fact, and the difficulty of
uniting all the fashions of all the magazines in one dress, were her
two principal afflictions in this world of care. She had an ideal
model, to which she aspired with constant longingsa model
resembling
in figure the high-born creatures whose never-varied
face is seen in all the plates of fashion, yet, if possible, paler and
more disdainful. If Miss Pifflit could have bent her short wrist
with the curve invariably given to the well-gloved extremities of
that mysterious and nameless beauty; if she could but have sat
with her back to her friends, and thrown her head languishingly
over her shoulder without dislocating her neck; if she could but
have protruded from the flounce of her dress a foot more like a
mincing little muscle-shell, and less like a jolly fat calm; in brief,
if she could have drawn out her figure like the enviable joints of
a spy-glass, whittled off more taperly her four extremities, sold
all her uproarious and indomitable roses for a pot of carmine, and
compelled the publishers of the magazines to refrain from the
distracting multiplicity of their monthly fashionswith these
little changes in her allotmentMiss Pifflit would have realised all
her maiden aspirations up to the present hour.
A glimpse will give you an idea of the gentleman in question.
He was not much more than he looked to bea compact,
athletic young man of twenty-one, with clear, honest, blue eyes,
brown face, (where it was not shaded by the rim of his hat,)
curling brown hair, and an expression of fearless qualities,
dashed just now by a tinge of rustic bashfulness. His dress was
a little more expensive and gayer than was necessary, and he
wore his clothes in a way which betrayed that he would be more
at home in shirt-sleeves. His hands were rough, and his attitude
that of a man who was accustomed to fling himself down on the
nearest bench, or swing his legs from the top rail of a fence, or
the box of a wagon. We speak with caution of his rusticity,
however, for he had a printed card, Mr. Ephraim Bracely,
and he was a subscriber to the Spirit of the Times. We shall
find time to say a thing or two about him as we get on.
Eph. Bracely and Meg Pifflit were engaged. With
the young lady it was, as the French say,
faute de mieux
, for her
beau-ideal
(or, in plain English, her ideal-beau) was a tall, pale
young gentleman, with white gloves, in a rapid consumption.
She and Eph. were second cousins, however, and as she was an
orphan, and had lived since childhood with his father, and,
moreover
,
had inherited the Pifflit farm, which adjoined that of the
Bracelys, and, moreover, had been told to kiss her little
husband
,
and love him always by the dying breath of her mother,
and (moreover third) had been let be his sweetheart by the
unanimous consent of the neighborhood, why, it seemed one of
those matches made in Heaven, and not intended to be travestied
on earth. It was understood that they were to be married as
soon as the young man's savings should enable him to pull down
the old Pifflit house and build a cottage, and, with a fair season,
that might be done in another year. Meantime, Eph. was a loyal
keeper of his troth, though never having had the trouble to win the
young lady, he was not fully aware of the necessity of courtship,
whether or no; and was, besides, somewhat unsusceptible of the
charms of moonlight, after a hard day's work at haying or
harvesting
.
The neighbors thought it proof enough of his love that
he never went sparking elsewhere, and, as he would rather
talk of his gun or his fishing-rod, his horse or his crop, pigs,
polities, or anything else, than of love or matrimony, his
companions
took his engagement with his cousin to be a subject upon
which he felt too deeply to banter, and they neither invaded his
domain by attentions to his sweetheart, nor suggested thought by
allusions to her. It was in the progress of this even tenor of
engagement, that some law business had called old Farmer
Bracely to New York, and the young couple had managed to
accompany him. And, of course, nothing would do for Miss
Pifflit but the Astor.
And now, perhaps, the reader is ready to be told whose
carriage
is at the Vesey street door, and who sends up a dripping
servant to inquire for Miss Pifflit.
It is allotted to the destiny of every country-girl to have one
fashionable female friend in the citysomebody to correspond
with, somebody to quote, somebody to write her the particulars of
the last elopement, somebody to send her patterns of collars, and
the rise and fall of
tournures
, and such other things as are not
entered into by the monthly magazines. How these apparently
unlikely acquaintances are formed, is as much a mystery as the
eternal youth of post-boys, and the eternal duration of donkeys.
Far be it from me to pry irreverently into those pokerish corners
of the machinery of the world. I go no farther than the fact, that
Miss Julia Hampson was an acquaintance of Miss Pifflit's.
Everybody knows Hampson and Co.
Miss Hampson was a good deal what the Fates had tried to
make her. If she had not been admirably well dressed, it would
have been by violent opposition to the united zeal and talent of
dressmakers and milliners. These important vicegerents of the
Hand that reserves to itself the dressing of the butterfly and lily,
make distinctions in the exercise of their vocation. Wo be to an
unloveable woman, if she be not endowed with taste supreme.
She may buy all the stuffs of France, and all the colors of the
rainbow, but she will never get, from those keen judges of fitness,
the loving hint, the admiring and selective persuasion, with which
they delight to influence the embellishment of sweetness and
loveliness
.
They who talk of anything's looking well on a pretty
woman, have not reflected on the Lesser Providence of
dressmakers
and milliners. Woman is never mercenary but in
monstrous
exceptions, and no tradeswoman of the fashions will
sell
taste or counsel; and, in the superior style of all charming women,
you see, not the influence of manners upon dress, but the
affectionate
tribute of these dispensers of elegance to the qualities they
admire. Let him who doubts, go shopping with his dressy old
aunt to-day, and to-morrow with his dear little cousin.
Miss Hampson, to whom the supplies of elegance came as
naturally as bread and butter, and occasioned as little speculation
as to the whence or how, was as unconsciously elegant, of course,
as a well-dressed lily. She was abstractly a very beautiful girl,
though in a very delicate and unconspicuous style; and by dint of
absolute fitness in dressing, the merit of her beauty, by common
observers at least, would be half given to her fashionable air and
unexceptionable toilet. The damsel and her choice array,
indeed, seemed the harmonious work of the same maker. How
much was Nature's gift, and how much was bought in Broadway,
was probably never duly understood by even her most discriminate
admirer.
But we have kept Miss Hampson too long upon the stairs
The two young ladies met with a kiss, in which (to the surprise
of those who had previously observed Miss Pifflit) there was no
smack of the latest fashion
My dear Julia!
My dear Margerine! (This was a romantic variation of
Meg's, which she had forced upon her intimate friends at the
point of the bayonet.)
Eph. twitched, remindingly, the
jupon
of his cousin, and she
introduced him with the formula which she had found in one of
Miss Austin's novels.
Oh, but there was a mock respectfulness in that deep
courtesy, thought Eph. (and so there wasfor Miss Hampson
took an irresistible cue from the inflated ceremoniousness of the
introduction).
Eph. made a bow as cold and stiff as a frozen horse-blanket.
And if he could have commanded the blood in his face, it would
have been as dignified and resentful as the eloquence of Red
Jacketbut that rustic blush, up to his hair, was like a mask
dropped over his features.
A bashful country-boy, thought Miss Hampson, as she
looked compassionately upon his red-hot forehead, and forthwith
dismissed him entirely from her thoughts.
With a consciousness that he had better leave the room, and
walk off his mortification under an umbrella, Eph. took his seat,
and silently listened to the conversation of the young ladies.
Miss Hampson had come to pass the morning with her friend,
and she took off her bonnet, and showered down upon her dazzling
neck a profusion of the most adorable brown ringlets. Spite of
his angry humiliation, the young farmer felt a thrill run through
his veins as the heavy curls fell indolently about her shoulders.
He had never before looked upon a woman with emotion. He
hated heroh, yes! for she had given him a look that could
never be forgivenbut for
somebody
, she must be the angel of the
world. Eph. would have given all his sheep and horses, cows,
crops, and hay-stacks, to have seen the man she would fancy to be
her equal. He could not give even a guess at the height of that
conscious superiority from which she individually looked down
upon him; but it would have satisfied a thirst which almost made
him scream, to measure himself by a man with whom
she
could be
familiar. Where was his inferiority? What was it? Why had
he been blind to it till now? Was there no surgeon's knife, no
caustic, that could carve out, or cut away, burn or scarify, the
vulgarities she looked upon so contemptuously? But the devil
take her superciliousness, nevertheless!
It was a bitter morning to Eph. Bracely, but still it went like
a dream. The hotel parlor was no longer a stupid place. His
cousin Meg had gained a consequence in his eyes, for she was the
object of caress from this superior creatureshe was the link
which kept her within his observation. He was too full of other
feelings just now to do more than acknowledge the superiority of
this girl to his cousin. He
felt
it in his after thoughts, and his
destiny then, for the first time, seemed crossed and inadequate to
his wishes.
(We hereby draw upon your imagination for six months,
courteous
reader. Please allow the teller to show you into the
middle of the following July.)
Bracely farm, ten o'clock of a glorious summer morningMiss
Pifflit extended upon a sofa in despair. But let us go back a
little.
A week before, a letter had been received from Miss Hampson,
who the delight and surprise of her friend Margerine, had
taken whim to pass a month with her. She was at Rockaway,
and was sick and tired of waltzing and the sea. Had Farmer
Bracely a spare corner for a poor girl?
But Miss Pifflit's sober second thought was utter
consternation
.
How to lodge fitly the elegant Julia Hampson? No
French bed in the house, no boudoir, no ottomans, no pastilles,
no baths, no Psyche to dress by! What vulgar wretches they
would seem to her! What insupportable horror she would feel at
the dreadful inelegance of the farm! Meg was pale with terror
and dismay as she went into the details of anticipation.
Something must be done, however. A sleepless night of
reflection
and contrivance sufficed to give some shape to the
capabilities
of the case, and, by daylight the next morning, the whole
house was in commotion. Meg had, fortunately, a large bump
of constructiveness, very much enlarged by her habitual
dilemmas
of toilette. A boudoir must be constructed. Farmer Bracely
slept in the dried-apple room, on the lower floor, and he was no
sooner out of his bed, than his bag and baggage were tumbled up
stairs, his gun and Sunday whip were taken down from their
nails, and the floor scoured, and the ceiling white-washed. Eph.
was, by this time, returned from the village with all the chintz
that could be bought, and a paper of tacks, and some new straw
carpeting; and, by ten o'clock that night, the four walls of the
apartment were covered with the gayly-flowered material, the car
pet was nailed down, and old Farmer Bracely thought it a
mighty nice, cool-looking place. Eph. was a bit of a carpenter,
and he soon knocked together some boxes, which, when covered
with chintz, and stuffed with wool, looked very like ottomans;
and, with a handsome cloth on the round table, geraniums in the
windows, and a chintz curtain to subdue the light, it was not
far from a very charming boudoir, and Meg began to breathe
more freely.
But Eph. had heard this news with the blood hot in his
temples
.
Was that proud woman coming again to look at him with
contempt, and here, too, where the rusticity, which he presumed
to be the object of her scorn, would be a thousand times more
flagrant and visible? And yet, with the entreaty on his lip, that
his cousin would refuse to receive her, his heart had checked the
utterancefor an irresistible desire sprung suddenly within him
to see her, even at the bitter cost of tenfold his former
mortification
.
Yet, as the preparations for receiving Miss Hampson went on,
other thoughts took possession of his mind. Eph. was not a man,
indeed, to come off second best, in the long pull of wrestling with
a weakness. His pride began to show its colors. He remembered
his independence as a farmer, dependent on no man; and a little
comparison between his pursuits, and life, such as he knew it to
be, in a city, soon put him, in his own consciousness, at least, on
a par with Miss Hampson's connexions This point once
attained
,
Eph. cleared his brow, and went whistling about the farm as
usualreceiving without reply, however, a suggestion of his
cousin
Meg's, that he had better burn his old straw hat, for, in a fit
of absence, he
might possibly
put it on while Miss Hampson was
there.
Well, it was ten o'clock on the morning after Miss Hampson's
arrival at Bracely Farm, and, as we said before, Miss Pifflit was
in despair. Presuming that her friend would be fatigued with
her journey, she had determined not to wake her, but to order
breakfast in the boudoir at eleven. Farmer Bracely and Eph.
must have their breakfast at seven, however, and what was the
dismay of Meg, who was pouring out their coffee as usual, to see
the elegant Julia rush into the first kitchen, courtesy very sweetly
to the old man, pull up a chair to the table, apologise for being
late, and end this extraordinary scene by producing two
newly-hatched
chickens from her bosom! She had been up since
sunrise
,
and out at the barn, down by the river, and up in the
haymow
,
and was perfectly enchanted with everything, especially the
dear little pigs and chickens!
A very sweet young lady! thought old Farmer Bracely.
Very wellbut hang your condescension! thought Eph.,
distrustfully.
Mercy on me!to like pigs and chickens! mentally
ejaculated
the disturbed and bewildered Miss Pifflit.
But with her two chicks pressed to her breast with one hand,
Miss Hampson managed her coffee and bread and butter with the
other, and chattered away like a child let out of school. The
air was so delicious, and the hay smelt so sweet, and the trees in
the meadow were so beautiful, and there were no stiff sidewalks,
and no brick houses, and no iron railings, and so many dear
speckled hens, and funny little chickens, and kind-looking old
cows, and colts, and calves, and ducks, and turkeysit was
delicious
it
was enchantingit was worth a thousand Saratogas and
Rockaways. How anybody could prefer the city to the country,
was, to Miss Hampson, matter of incredulous wonder.
Will you come into the boudoir? asked Miss Pifflit with a
languishing air, as her friend Julia rose from breakfast.
Boudoir! exclaimed the city damsel, to the infinite delight
of old Bracely, no, dear! I'd rather go out to the barn! Are
you going anywhere with the oxen to-day, sir? she added, going
up to the grey-headed farmer, caressingly, I should
so
like to
ride in that great cart!
Eph. was a little suspicious of all this unexpected
agreeableness
,
but he was naturally too courteous not to give way to a
lady's whims. He put on his old straw hat, and tied his
handkerchief
over his shoulder, (not to imitate the broad riband of a
royal order, but to wipe the sweat off handily while mowing,) and,
offering Miss Hampson a rake which stood outside the door, he
begged her to be ready when he came by with the team. He and
his father were bound to the far meadow, where they were cutting
hay, and would like her assistance in raking.
It was a specimen morning, as the magazines say, for the
air was temperate, and the whole country was laden with the
smell of the new hay, which somehow or other, as everybody
knows, never hinders or overpowers the perfume of the flowers.
Oh, that winding green lane between the bushes was like an
avenue
to paradise. The old cart jolted along through the ruts, and
Miss Hampson, standing up, and holding on to old Farmer
Bracely, watched the great oxen crowding their sides together,
and looked off over the fields, and exclaimed, as she saw glimpses
of the river between the trees, and seemed veritably and
unaffectedly
enchanted. The old farmer, at least, had no doubt of
her sincerity, and he watched her, and listened to her, with a
broad, honest smile of admiration on his weather-browned
countenance
.
The oxen were turned up to the fence, while the dew dried off
the hay, and Eph. and his father turned to mowing, leaving Miss
Hampson to ramble about over the meadow, and gather flowers
by the river side. In the course of an hour they began to rake
up, and she came to offer her promised assistance, and stoutly
followed Eph. up and down several of the long swaths, till her
face glowed under her sun-bonnet as it never had glowed with
waltzing. Heated and tired at last, she made herself a seat, with
the new hay, under a large elm, and, with her back to the tree,
watched the labors of her companions.
Eph. was a well-built and manly figure, and all he did in the
way of his vocation, he did with a fine display of muscular power,
and (a sculptor would have thought), no little grace. Julia
watched him, as he stepped along after his rake on the elastic
sward, and she thought, for the first time, what a very handsome
man was young Bracely, and how much more finely a man
looked
when raking hay, than a dandy when waltzing. And, for an
hour, she sat watching his motion, admiring the strength with
which he pitched up the hay, and the grace and ease of all his
movements and postures; and after a while she began to feel
drowsy with fatigue, and pulling up the hay into a fragrant
pillow
,
she lay down, and fell fast asleep.
It was now the middle of the forenoon, and the old farmer,
who, of late years, had fallen into the habit of taking a short
nap before dinner, came to the big elm to pick up his waistcoat
and go home. As he approached the tree, he stopped, and
beckoned
to his son.
Eph. came up and stood at a little distance, looking at the
lovely picture before him. With one delicate hand under her
cheek, and a smile of angelic content and enjoyment on her finely
cut lips, Julia Hampson slept soundly in the shade. One small
foot escaped from her dress, and one shoulder of faultless polish
and whiteness showed between her kerchief and her sleeve. Her
slight waist bent to the swell of the hay, throwing her delicate
and well-moulded bust into high relief: and all over her neck,
and in large clusters on the tumbled hay, lay those glossy brown
ringlets, admirably beautiful and luxuriant.
And as Eph. looked on that dangerous picture of loveliness,
the passion, already lying
perdu
in his bosom, sprung to the
throne of heart and reason.
(We have not room to do more than hint at the consequences
of this visit of Miss Hampson to the country. It would require
the third volume of a novel to describe all the emotions of that
month at Bracely farm, and bring the reader, point by point,
gingerly and softly, to the close. We must touch here and there
a point only, giving the reader's imagination some gleaning to do,
after we have been over the ground.)
Eph. Bracely's awakened pride served him the good turn of
making him appear simply in his natural character, during the
whole of Miss Hampson's visit. By the old man's advice,
however
,
he devoted himself to the amusement of the ladies after the
haying was over; and what with fishing, and riding, and
scenery-hunting
in the neighborhood, the young people were together
from morning till night. Miss Pifflit came down, unwillingly, to
plain Meg, in her attendance on her friend in her rustic
occupations
,
and Miss Hampson saw as little as possible of the inside of
the
boudoir
. The barn, and the troops of chickens, and all the
out-door belongings to the farm, interested her daily, and with no
diminution of her zeal. She seemed, indeed, to have found her
natural sphere in the simple and affectionate life which her friend
14
Margerine held in such superfine contempt; and Eph., who was
the natural mate to such a spirit, and himself, in his own home,
most unconsciously worthy of love and admiration, gave himself
up irresistibly to his new passion.
And this new passion became apparent, at last, to the
incredulous
eyes of his cousin. And that it was timidly, but fondly
returned
by her elegant and high-bred friend, was also very
apparent
to Miss Pifflit. And, after a few jealous struggles, and a
night or two of weeping, she gave up to it tranquillyfor, a city
life, and a city husband, truth to say, had long been her secret
longing and secret hope, and she never had fairly looked in the
face a burial in the country with the pigs and chickens.
She is not married yet, Meg Pifflitbut the rich merchant,
Mr. Hampson, wrecked completely with the disastrous times, has
found a kindly and pleasant asylum for his old age with his
daughter, Mrs. Bracely. And a better or lovelier farmer's wife
than Julia, or a happier farmer than Eph., can scarce be found
in the valley of the Susquehannah.
THOSE UNGRATEFUL BLIDGIMSES.
For, look you, he hath as many friends as enemies; which friends, siras it were,durst
notlook you, sir,show themselvesas we term ithis friends, while he's in directitude.
Coriolanus
.
Hermione
.Our praises are our wages.
Winter's Tale
.
F, the portrait-painter, was a considerable ally of mine at
one time. His success in his art brought him into contact with
many people, and he made friends as a fastidious lady buys shoes
trying on a great many that were destined to be thrown aside.
It was the prompting, no doubt, of a generous qualitythat of
believing all people perfect till he discovered their faultsbut as
he cut loose without ceremony from those whose faults were not
to his mind, and, as ill-fitting people are not as patient of
rejection
as ill-fitting shoes, the quality did not pass for its full value,
and his abusers were thick as leaves in Vallambrosa. The
friends who wore his bleeding roses, however (and of these he
had his share), fought his battles quite at their own charge. What
with plenty of pride, and as plentiful a lack of approbativeness,
F took abuse as a duck's back takes rainbuoyant in the
shower as in the sunshine.
Well, F! I said, as I occupied his big chair one
morning
while he was at work, there was great skirmishing about you
last night at the tea-party!
No!really? Who was the enemy?
Two ladies, who said they travelled with you through Italy,
and knew all about youthe Blidgimses.
Oh, the dear old BlidgimsesCrinny and Ninnythe
ungrateful
monsters! Did I ever tell you of my nursing those two
old girls through the cholera?
No. But before you go off with a long story, tell me how
you can stand such abominable backbiting? It isn't once in a
way, merely!you are their whole stock in trade, and they vilify
you in every house they set foot in. The mildest part of it is
criminal slander, my good fellow! Why not do the world a
service, and show that slander is actionable, though it is
committed
in good society?
Pshaw! What does it amount to?
`The eagle suffers little birds to sing,
And is not careful what they mean thereby,'
and, in this particular instance, the jury would probably give the
damages the other wayfor if they hammer at me till doomsday,
I have had my fun out of themmy
quid pro quo!
Well, preface your story by telling me where you met
them. I never knew by what perverse thread you were drawn
together.
A thread that might have drawn me into much more
desperate
extremitya letter from the most lovable of women, charging
me to become the trusty squire of these errant damsels wherever
I should encounter them. I was then studying in Italy. They
came to Florence, where I chanced to be, and were handed over
to me without dog, cat, or waiting-maid, by a man who seemed
ominously glad to be rid of them. As it was the ruralizing
season
,
and all the world was flocking to the baths of Lucca, close
by, they went there till I could get ready to undertake them
which I did, with the devotion of a
courier
in a new place, one
fig-desiring evening of June.
Was there a delivery of the great seal? I asked, rather
amused at F's circumstantial mention of his
introitus
to
office.
Something very like it, indeed. I had not fairly got the
blood out of my face, after making my salaam, when Miss Crinny
Blidgims fished up from some deep place she had about her, a
memorandum-book, with a well-thumbed brown paper cover, and,
gliding across the room, placed it in my hands as people on the
stage present pocket-bookswith a sort of dust-flapping parabola.
Now, if I have any particular antipathy, it is to the smell of old
flannel, and, as this equivocal-looking object descended before my
nosefaith!but I took it. It was the account-book of the
eatables and drinkables furnished to the ladies in their travels,
the prices of eggs, bread, figs,
et cetera
, and I was to begin my duties
by having up the head waiter of the lodging-house, and holding
inquisition on his charges. The Blidgimses spoke no Italian, and
no servant in the house spoke English, and they were bursting for
a translator to tell him that the eggs were over-charged, and that
he must deduct threepence a day for wine, for they never
touched it!
`What do the ladies wish?' inquired the dumb-founded
waiter, in civil Tuscan.
`What does he say? what does he say?' cried Miss Corinna,
in resounding nasal.
`Tell the impudent fellow what eggs are in Dutchess
county!' peppered out Miss Katrina, very sharply.
Of course I translated with a discretion. There was rather
an incongruity between the looks of the damsels and what they
were to be represented as sayingKatrina Blidgims living
altogether
in a blue opera-hat with a white feather.
I interrupted F to say that the blue hat was immortal, for
it was worn at the tea-party of the night before.
I had enough of the blue hat and its bandbox before we
parted. It was the one lifetime extravagance of the old maid,
perpetrated in Paris, and as it covered the back seam of a wig (a
subsequent discovery of mine), she was never without it, except
when bonneted to go out. She came to breakfast in it, mended
her stockings in it, went to parties in it. I fancy it took some
trouble to adjust it to the wig, and she devoted to it the usual
dressing-hours of morning and dinner; for in private she wore a
handkerchief over it, pinned under her chin, which had only to be
whipped off when company was announced, and this, perhaps, is
one of the secrets of its immaculate, yet threadbare preservation.
She called it her
abbo!
Her what?
You have heard of the famous Herbault, the man-milliner, of
Paris? The bonnet was his production, and called after him with
with great propriety. In Italy, where people dress according to
their condition in life, this perpetual
abbo
was something
la
princesse
, and hence my embarrassment in explaining to Jacomo,
the waiter, that Signorina Katrina's high summons concerned
only an overcharge of a penny in the eggs!
And what said Jacomo?
Jacomo was incapable of an incivility, and begged pardon
before stating that the usual practice of the house was to
charge half a dollar a day for board and lodging, including
a private parlor and bedroom, three meals and a bottle
of wine. The ladies, however, had applied through an English
gentlemen (who chanced to call on them, and who spoke Italian),
to have reductions made on their dispensing with two dishes of
meat out of three, drinking no wine, and wanting no nuts and
raisins. Their main extravagance was in eggs, which they ate
several times a day between meals, and wished to have cooked
and served up at the price per dozen in the market. On
this they had held conclave below stairs, and the result had not
been communicated, because there was no common language;
but Jacomo wished, through me, respectfully to represent, that
the reductions from the half-dollar a day should be made as
requested
,
but that the eggs could not be bought, cooked, and
served up, (with salt and bread, and a clean napkin), for
just
their price in the market. And on this point the ladies were
obstinate
.
And to settle this difficulty between the high
contracting
parties, cost an argument of a couple of hours, my first
performance
as translator in the service of the Blidgimses.
Thenceforward
,
I was as necessary to Crinny and Ninny(these were
their familiar diminutives for Corinna and Katrina)as
necessary
to Crinny as the gift of speech, and to Ninny as the wig
and
abbo
put together. Obedient to the mandate of the fair
hand which had consigned me to them, I gave myself up to their
service, even keeping in my pocket their frowsy grocery-book
though not without some private outlay in burnt vinegar. What
penance a man will undergo for a pretty woman who cares
nothing
about him!
But what could have started such a helpless pair of old
quizzes upon their travels?
I wondered myself until I knew them better. Crinny
Blidgims
had a tongue of the liveliness of an eel's tail. It would
have wagged after she was skinned and roasted. She had,
beside
,
a kind of pinchbeck smartness, and these two gifts, and
perhaps
the name of Corinna, had inspired her with the idea that
she was an
improvisatrice
. So, how could she die without going
to Italy?
And Ninny went for company?
Oh, Miss Ninny Blidgims had a passion too! She had come
out to see Paris. She had heard that, in Paris, people could
renew
their youth, and she thought she had done it, with her
abbo
.
She thought, too, that she must have manners to correspond. So,
while travelling in her old bonnet, she blurted out her bad
grammar
as she had done for fifty years, but in her blue hat she
simpered
and frisked to the best of her recollection. Silly as that
old girl was, however, she had the most pellucid set of ideas on
the prices of things to eat. There was no humbugging her on
that subject, even in a foreign language. She filled her pockets
with apples, usually in our walks; and the translating between
her and a street huckster, she in her
abbo
and the apple-woman
in Italian rags, was vexatious to endure, but very funny to
remember
.
I have thought of painting it, but, to understand the
picture, the spectator must make the acquaintance of Miss
Fanny
Blidgimsrather a pill for a connoisseur! But, by this time,
you are ready to
approfond
, as the French aptly say, the depths
of my subsequent distresses.
THE STORY.
I had been about a month at Lucca, when it was suddenly
proposed by Crinny that we should take a vetturino together, and
go to Venice. Ninny and she had come down to dinner with a
sudden disgust for the bathsowing, perhaps, to the distinction
they had received as the only strangers in the place who were
not
invited to the ball of a certain prince, our next-door neighbor. The
Blidgimses and their economies, in fact, had become the joke of
the season, and, as the interpreter in the egg-trades, I was mixed
up in the omelette, and as glad to escape from my notoriety as
they. So I set about looking up the conveyance with some
alacrity
.
By the map, it was evidently a great saving of distance to
cross the mountains to Modena, and of course a great saving of
expense, as vetturinos are paid by the mile; but the guide-books
stated that the road was rough, and the inns abominable, and
recommended to all who cared for comfort, to make a
circumbendibus
by the way of Florence and Bologna. Ninny declared
she could live on bread and apples, however, and Crinny
delighted
in mountain airin short, economy carried it, and after three
days' chaffering with the owner of a rattletrap vettura, we set off
up the banks of the Limawithout the blessing of Jacomo, the
head waiter!
We soon left the bright little river, and struck into the
mountains, and, as the carriage crept on very slowly, I relieved
the horses of my weight and walked on. The ladies did the
same thing whenever they came in sight of an orchard, and, for
the first day, Ninny munched the unripe apples and seemed
getting
14*
along very comfortably. The first night's lodging was
execrable
,
but as the driver assured us it was the best on the route,
we saved our tempers for the worst, and, the next day, began to
penetrate a country that looked deserted of man, and curst with
uninhabitable sterility. Its effect upon my spirits, as I walked
on alone, was as depressing as the news of some trying
misfortune
,
and I was giving it credit for one redeeming qualitythat
of an opiate to a tongue like Crinny Blidgimses'swhen both the
ladies began to show symptoms of illness. It was not long after
noon, and we were in the midst of a waste upland, the road
bending
over the horizon before and behind us, and neither shed nor
shelter, bush, wall or tree, within reach of the eye. The only
habitation we had seen since morning, was a wretched hovel, where
the horses were fed at noon, and the albergo, where we should
pass the night, was distant several hoursa long up-hill stretch,
on which the pace of the horses could not possibly be mended.
The ladies were bent double in the carriage, and said they could
not possibly go on. Going back was out of the question. The
readiest service I could proffer was to leave them and hurry on to
the inn, to prepare for their reception.
Fortunately our team was unicorn-riggedone horse in
advance
of a pair. I took off the leader, and galloped away.
Well, the cholera was still lingering in Italy, and stomachs
must be made cholera-proof to stand a perpetual diet of green
apples, even with no epidemic in the air. So I had a very clear
idea of the remedies that would be required on their arrival.
At a hand-gallop I reached the albergo in a couple of hours.
It was a large stone barrack, intended, no doubt, as was the road
we had travelled, for military uses. A thick stone wall
surrounded
it, and it stood in the midst, in a pool of mud. From the
last eminence before arriving, not another object could be
descried
within a horizon of twenty miles diameter, and a whitish
soil of baked clay, browned here and there by a bit of scanty
herbage, was foreground and middle and background to the
pleasant
picture. The site of the barrack had probably been
determined
by the only spring within many miles, and, by the dryness
without and the mud within the walls, it was contrived for a
monopoly
by the besieged.
I cantered in at the unhinged gate, and roared out `casa!'
`cameriere!' `botega!' till I was frightened at my own voice.
No answer. I threw my bridle over a projection of the
stone steps, and mounted, from an empty stable which occupied
the ground floor (Italian fashion), to the second story, which
seemed equally uninhabited. Here were tables, however, and
wooden settees, and dirty plattersthe first signs of life. On
the hearth was an iron pot and a pair of tongs, and, with these
two musical instruments I played a tune which I was sure would
find ears, if ears there were on the premises. And presently a
heavy foot was heard on the stair above, and, with a sonorous
yawn, descended mine hostdirty and stolida goodly pattern of
the `fat weed on Lethe's wharf,' as you would meet in a century.
He had been taking his siesta, and his wife had had a
colpo di
sole
, and was confined helplessly to her bed.
The
man John was
out tending sheep, and he, the host, was, vicariously, cook, waiter,
and chambermaid. What might be the pleasure of
il signore?
My
pleasure
was, first, to see the fire kindled, and the pot
put over, and then to fall into a brown study.
Two fine ladies with the choleratwo days' journey from a
physiciana fat old Italian landlord for nurse and sole counsellor
nobody who could understand a word they uttered, except
myself, and not a drug nor a ministering petticoat within
available
limits! Then the doors of the chambers were without
latches or hinges, and the little bed in each great room was the
one article of furniture, and the house was so still in the midst of
that great waste, that all sounds and movements whatever, must
be of common cognisance! Should I be discharging my duty, to
ladies under my care, to leave them to this dirty old man? Should
I offer my own attendance as constant nurse, and would the
service
be accepted? How, in the name of Robinson Crusoe, were
these delicate damsels to be `done for'?
As a matter of economy in dominos, as well as to have
something
Italian to bring home, I had bought at Naples the costume
of a sister of charity, and in it I had done all my masquerading
for three carnivals. It was among my baggage, and it occurred
to me whether I had not better take the landlord into my
confidence
,
and bribe him to wait upon the ladies, disguised in coif
and petticoat. Nofor he had a mustache, and spoke nothing
but Italian. Should I do it myself?
I paced up and down the stone floor in an agony of dilemma.
In the course of half an hour I had made up my mind. I called
to Boniface, who was watching the boiling pot, and made a clean
breast to him of my impending distresses, aiding his
comprehension
by such eye-water as landlords require. He readily
undertook the necessary lies, brought out his store of brandy,
added a second bed to one of the apartments, and promised
faithfully
to bear my sex in mind, and treat me with the reverence
due my cross and rosary. I then tore out a leaf of the grocery
book, and wrote with my pencil a note to this effect, to be
delivered to the ladies on their arrival:
`
Dear Miss Blidgims
: Feeling quite indisposed myself, and
being firmly persuaded that we are three cases of cholera, I have
taken advantage of a return calesino to hurry on to Modena for
medical advice. The vehicle I take brought hither a sister of
charity, who assures me she will wait on you, even in the most
malignant stage of your disease. She is collecting funds for a
hospital, and will receive compensation for her services in the
form of a donation to this object. I shall send you a physician
by express from Modena, where it is still possible we may meet.
With prayers, &c. &c.
`Yours very devotedly,
`F.
`P. S. Sister Benedetta understands French when spoken,
though she speaks only Italian.'
The delivery of this was subject, of course, to the condition
of the ladies when they should arrive, though I had a
presentiment
they were in for a serious business.
And, true to my boding, they did arrive, exceedingly ill.
An hour earlier than I had looked for him, the vetturino came up
with foaming horses at a tugging trot, frightened half out of his
senses. The ladies were dying, he swore by all the saints,
before
he dismounted. He tore open the carriage door, shouted
for
il signore
and the landlord, and had carried both the
groaning
girls up stairs in his arms, before fat Boniface, who had been
killing a sheep in the stable, could wash his hands and come out
to him. To his violent indignation, the landlord's first care was
to unstrap the baggage and take off my portmanteau,
condescending
to give him neither why nor wherefore, and, as it mounted the
stairs on the broad shoulders of my faithful ally, it was followed
by a string of oaths such as can rattle off from nothing but the
voluble tongue of an Italian.
I immediately despatched the note by the host, requesting
him to come back and `do my dress,' and, in half an hour, sister
Benedetta's troublesome toilet was achieved, and my old Abigail
walked around me, rubbing his hands, and swore I was a `
meraviglia
di belleza
.' The lower part of my face was covered by the
linen coif, and the forehead was almost completely concealed in
the plain put-away of a `false front;' and, unless the Blidgimses
had reconnoitred my nose and eyes very carefully, I was sure
of my disguise. The improvements in my figure were, unluckily,
fixtures in the dress, for it was very hot; but, by the landlord's
account, they were very becoming. Do you believe the old dog
tried to kiss me?
The groans of Ninny, meantime, resounded through the
house, for, as I expected, she had the worst of it. Her
exclamations
of pain were broken up, I could also hear, by sentences in a
sort of spiteful monotone, answered in regular `humphs!' by
CrinnyCrinny never talking except to astonish, and being as
habitually crisp to her half-witted sister as she was fluent to those
who were capable of surprise. Fearing that some disapprobation
of myself might find its way to Ninny's lips, and for several other
reasons which occurred to me, I thought it best to give the ladies
another half hour to themselves; and, by way of testing my
incognito
,
bustled about in the presence of the vetturino, warming oil
and mixing brandies-and-water, and getting used to the
suffocation
of my petticoatsfor you have no idea how intolerably hot
they are, with trowsers under.
Quite assured, at last, I knocked at the door.
`That's his nun!' said Ninny, after listening an instant.
`Come in!that is to say,
entrez!
' feebly murmured Crinny.
They were both in bed, rolled up like
pocket-handkerchiefs
;
but Ninny had found strength to bandbox her wig and
abbo
, and array herself in a nightcap with an exceedingly broad
frill. But I must not trench upon the `secrets of the
prison-house
.'
You are a bachelor, and the Blidgimses are still in a
`world of hope.'
I walked in and leaned over each of them, and whispered a
benedicite
, felt their pulses, and made signs that I understood
their complaints and they need not trouble themselves to explain;
and forthwith I commenced operations by giving them their grog
(which they swallowed without making faces, by-the-by), and, as
they relaxed their postures a little, I got one foot at a time hung
over to me from the side of the bed into the pail of hot water,
and set them to rubbing themselves with the warm oil, while I
vigorously bathed their extremities. Crinny, as I very well
knew, had but five-and-twenty words of French, just sufficient to
hint at her wants, and Ninny spoke only such English as Heaven
pleased, so I played the ministering angel in safe silence
listening
to my praises, however, for I handled Ninny's irregular
doigts du pied
with a tenderness that pleased her.
Wellyou know what the cholera is. I knew that, at the
Hotel Dieu of Paris, women who had not been intemperate were
oftenest cured by whiskey punches, and, as brandy toddies were
the nearest approach of which the resources of the place
admitted
,
I plied my patients with brandy toddy. In the weak state
of their stomachs, it produced, of course, a delirious intoxication,
and, as I began very early in the morning, there were no lucid
intervals in which my incognito might be endangered. My
ministrations
were, consequently, very much facilitated, and, after
the second day (when I really thought the poor girls would die),
we fell into a very regular course of hospital life, and, for one, I
found it very entertaining. Quite impressed with the idea that
sister Bellidettor (as Ninny called me) understood not a word of
English, they discoursed to please themselves; and I was obliged
to get a book, to excuse, even to their tipsy comprehension, my
outbreaks of laughter. Crinny spouted poetry and sobbed about
Washington Irving, who, she thought,
should
have been her lover;
and Ninny sat up in bed, and, with a small glass she had in the
back of her hair-brush, tried on her
abbo
at every possible angle,
always ending by making signs to sister Bellidettor to come and
comb her hair! There was a long, slender moustache,
remaining
on the back of the bald crown, and, after putting this into my
hand, with the hair-brush, she sat with a smile of delight till she
found my brushing did not come round to the front!
`Why don't you brush this lock?' she cried, `thisand this
and this!' making passes from her shining skull down to her
waist, as if, in every one, she had a handful of hair! And so,
for an hour together, I threaded these imaginary locks, beginning
where they were rooted `long time ago,' and passing the brush
off to the length of my armthe cranium, when I had done,
looking like a balloon of shot silk, its smooth surface was so
purpled
with the friction of the bristles. Poor Ninny! She has
great temptation to tipple, I thinkthat is, `if Macassar won't
bring back the lost
chevelure!
'
About the fifth day, the ladies began to show signs of
convalescence
,
and it became necessary to reduce their potations.
Of course they grew less entertaining, and I was obliged to be
much more on my guard. Crinny fell from her inspiration, and
Ninny from her complacency, and they came down to their
previous
condition of damaged spinsters, prim and peevish. `Needs
must' that I should `play out the play,' however, and I abated
none of my
petits soins
for their comfort, laying out very large
anticipations of their grateful acknowledgments for my dramatic
chivalry, devotion, and delicacy!
Wellthey
are
ungrateful! said I, interrupting F for
the first time in his story.
Now, are not they? They should at least, since they deny
me my honors, pay me for my services as maid-of-all-work, nurse,
hair-dresser, and apothecary! Well, if I hear of their abusing
me again, I'll send in my bills. Wouldn't you? But to wind
up this long story.
I thought that perhaps there might be some little
circumstances
,
connected with my attentions, which would look best at a
distance, and that it would be more delicate to go on and take
leave at Modena as sister Benedetta, and rejoin them the next
morning in hose and doublet as beforereserving to some future
period the clearing up of my apparently recreant desertion. On
the seventh morning, therefore, I instructed old Giuseppe, the
landlord, to send in his bill to the ladies while I was dressing, and
give notice to the vetturino that he was to take the holy sister to
Modena in the place of
il signore
, who had gone on before.
Crinny and Ninny were their own reciprocal dressing-maids,
but Crinny's fingers had weakened by sickness much more than
her sister's waist had diminished, and, in the midst of shaving, in
my own room, I was called to `finish doing' Ninny, who backed
up to me with her mouth full of pins, and the breath, for the time
being, quite expelled from her body. As I was straining, very
red in the face, at the critical hook, Giuseppe knocked at the
door, with the bill, and the lack of an interpreter to dispute the
charges, brought up the memory of the supposed `absquatulator'
with no very grateful odor. Before I could finish Miss Ninny
and get out of the room, I heard myself charged with more
abominations, mental and personal, than the monster that would
have made the fortune of Trinculo. Crinny counted down half
the money, and attempted, by very expressive signs, to impress
upon Giuseppe that it was enough; but the oily palm of the old
publican was patiently held out for more, and she at last paid the
full demand, fairly crying with vexation.
Quite sick of the new and divers functions to which I had
been serving an apprenticeship in my black petticoat, I took my
place in the
vettura
, and dropped veil, to be sulky in one lump
as far as Modena. I would willingly have stopped my ears, but,
after wearing out their indignation at the unabated charges of old
Giuseppe, the ladies took up the subject of the expected
donation
to the charity-fund of sister Benedetta, and their expedients,
to get rid of it, occupied (very amusingly to me) the greater part
of a day's travel. They made up their minds at last, that half a
dollar would be as much as I could expect for my week's
attendance
,
and Crinny requested that she should not be interrupted
while she thought out the French for saying as much, when we
should come to the parting.
I was sitting quietly in the corner of the
vettura
, the next
day, felicitating myself on the success of my masquerade, when
we suddenly came to a halt at the gate of Modena, and the
deganiere
put his moustache in at the window, with `
passaporti,
signori!
'
Murder! thought Ihere's a difficulty I never provided for!
The ladies handed out their paper, and I thrust my hand
through the slit in the side of my dress and pulled mine from my
pocket. As of course you know, it is the business of this
gatekeeper
to compare every traveller with the description given of
him in his passport. He read those of the Blidgimses and looked
at themall right. I sat still while he opened mine, thinking it
possible he might not care to read the description of a sister of
charity. But to my dismay he didand opened his eyes, and
looked again into the carriage.
`
Aspetta, caro!
' said I, for I saw it was of no use. I
gathered
up my bombazine and stepped out into the road. There were
a dozen soldiers and two or three loungers sitting on a long
bench in the shade of the gateway. The officer read through
the description once more, and then turned to me with the look
of a functionary who had detected a culprit. I began to pull up
my petticoat. The soldiers took their pipes out of their mouths
and uttered the Italian `keck' of surprise. When I had got as
far as the knee, however, I came to the rolled-up trowsers, and
the officer joined in the sudden uproar of laughter. I pulled my
black petticoat over my head, and stood in my waistcoat and
shirt-sleeves, and bowed to the merry official. The Blidgimses,
to my surprise, uttered no exclamation, but I had forgotten my
coif. When that was unpinned, and my whiskers came to light,
their screams became alarming. The vetturino ran for water,
the soldiers started to their feet, and, in the midst of the
excitement
,
I ordered down my baggage and resumed my coat and cap,
and repacked, under lock and key, the sister Benedetta. And not
quite ready to encounter the Blidgimses, I walked on to the
hotel and left the vetturino to bring on the ladies at his leisure.
Of course I had no control over accidents, and this exposure
was unlucky; but, if I had had time to let myself down softly on
the subject, don't you see it would have been quite a different
sort of an affair? I parted company from the old girls at
Modena
,
however, and they were obliged to hire a man-servant who
spoke English and Italian, and probably the expense of that was
added to my iniquities. Anyhow, abusing me this way is very
ungrateful of these Blidgimses. Now, isn't it?
BELLES OF NEW YORK.
MRS. VERE.
A child
, educated solely for prosperity, was Violet Fanning.
She was literally a belle at twelve years of age, for so
accomplished
was the beautiful child as a dancer, and so well-bred and
self-collected in her manners and replies, that, while passing a
gay month with her mother at Saratoga, the beaux approached
her with deference due a lady, danced with her, and addressed to
her conversation as well suited to the age of eighteen. Her
mother
,
being a woman of remarkable elegance and beauty, her
father having always lived like a gentleman of fortune, and the
family, in all their connections, being understood to be ambitious
and worldly, there was little chance for the fair Violet to escape
what is commonly considered a good match. She grew up to
the marriageable age in singular perfection of style, personal
development
and mental
aplomb
. The admiration she excited for
these qualities was the greater, because her spirits were naturally
high, and her inevitable style of manner was the brilliant and
fearlessthe most difficult of all manners to sustain
proportionately
,
and with invariable triumph and grace.
At eighteen, Miss Fanning, though not living in the city, was
one of the best known and most admired belles of the time. To
a connoisseur of symmetry, her movement and peculiar grace,
even as she walked in the street, were a study. Of Arabian
slightness and litheness, her figure still seemed filled out to its
most absolute proportion, and, with the clearness of her hazel eye,
the dazzling whiteness of teeth without a fault, color beautifully
distributed in her face, and features almost minutely regular, she
seemed one of those phenomena of physical perfection, of which
sculptors deny the existence. A fault-finder might have found
the coral thread of the lips too slight, and the nose too thin, in
its high-bred proportionthese being indications of a character
in which sentiment and tenderness are not prevailing qualities
but, perhaps, here, after all, lay the secret of a propriety and
self-control never ostensibly cared for, and yet never, by any
possibility
,
put in peril.
Cordial without hesitation, joyous always, confident as a
princess
,
frank and simple, Miss Fanning charmed allbut
apparently
charmed all alike. Of any leaning to a flirtation, no
human heart ever could suppose her capable. The finding of a
mate for herself never seemed to have entered her mindneither
that care, nor any other, apparently admissable through the door
of a mind guarded by the merest joyousness of a complete
existence
.
Of the approaches which instinct makes every woman
understandthe approaches of those who, by the silent language
of magnetism, inquire whether they could be lovedshe gave no
sign by a manner more thoughtful, and she was too high-minded,
of course, to betray any such secret which she might have
fathomed; but many such approaches she doubtless had. The
world, not at all prepared by any previous indication, was simply
surprised, of course, one fine day, to hear of Miss Fanning's
engagement
to Mr. Vere. It was a match of the highest possible
promisethe gentleman a son of one of the best and wealthiest
families, and the affianced an only daughter, and probably a
considerable
heiress. The wedding soon followed, and was unusually
brilliant. The prophecies were without a shadow.
Ten years have passed, and death and change have braided
their dark threads in the life-woof of Mrs. Vere, as in those of
women less fair. The fortunes, of both her husband's family and
her own, some five years ago, lessened, without wrecking
altogether
,
and Mr. Vere, as hopes from without gave way, turned,
with American facility, to resources within; and, from an elegant
pursuer of pleasure, became a hard-working, professional man.
Both reared in luxury onlyboth with a youth-seen future of
exclusively
prosperous anticipationthey are now living a life of
simple competence, and doubtless of careful economy; but, how
Mrs. Vere looks
now
, and how she bears these reversed
anticipations
,
and accommodates herself to a sphere many might think
trying and hard to bear, are points that, we presume, will interest
our readers more than any history of a prosperity unbroken.
Men's resistance to adversity is positivea strugglea contest
and therefore easy. Women's is negativea simple, inactive
enduranceand twenty times as difficult. With this truth in the
mind, the view of a condition of fortune, whose reverses are
shared equally by a husband and wife, makes the latter's history
much the more interesting.
You will not meet, in your daily walk in New York, a more
tastefully dressed, lady-like and elegant woman than Mrs. Vere
Her gait, and general carriage of person are those of one whose
spirit is wholly unsubdued, whose arehed foot has a bridge as
elastic as in her 'teens; whose lively self-confidence is without a
shadow of abatement. In even the beauty of her face there is
no absolute diminution, for the girlish hue of complexion, and
the scarce perceptible fullest degree of outline, are more than
replaced
by heightened expression, and by a shade of
inward
expectation
less exacting. Of the world
without
, Mrs. Vere
expects
as much as ever. Her
unaltered raluation of her own
position
,
is her beautiful glorya glory of which she is probably
quite unconscious, though it causes her to be looked upon with
boundless respect and admiration by any observer who knows the
world, and who appreciates the rarity of a pride worn so loftily
easy. By it Mrs Vere holds her husband's fortunes, in every
important particular, where they were. She compels the world,
by it, to believe her untouched by any misfortune worth
considering
to
see her in the same posture and place of society as
before
,
and yield, to her, every inch as much of admiring
consideration
.
Though she dresses with extreme care and with becoming
economy, it is the dress of a woman who is not at all aware of
having
lost ground by a loss of fortune, and who dresses still for the
same position; and, obediently, society takes her at her word,
rates her at her own estimate, and, at this present moment, gives
her as much regard and deference as she could have had with
millions of which to make a display. She walks on her errands,
or rides in an omnibus,does any proper thing she likes
without
fear of committing her dignity. Her open and frank eye is
is without suspicion of any possible slight. She is, in short, a
woman born with a spirit too high for fortune to affect, and, freed
thus from the wear which, most of all, makes inroad upon beauty,
she is likely, for twenty years more, to be beautiful and at
tractive.
Such is Mrs. Vere, and slight observers will not recognise the
portrait. Here and there, one, who knows her, will.
15
MISS AYMAR, OF NEW YORK.
By
the vote of Underdone-dom, (the stripling constituency of
belle-ship in New York,) Miss Aymar would, perhaps, scarce be
elected a belle; yet a stranger, accustomed to the society of
women of high rank, abroad, would recognize in her, at a first
glance, a quality of beauty and manners which would have been
the pride and admiration of a court. Dignified without being
repulsive
cold
without being reservedfull and perfect in figure and
health, yet of marble palenessfrank, yet smiling seldoma head
set very proudly upon the shoulders, yet pliant and natural in all
its movementsshe is the type of what is meant, abroad, when
they say of a woman that she looks like a duchess. Add to
this an oval cast of features, a well-completed outline to the
cheek, a round yet tapering chin, and a throat curved gracefully
from the head, and there seems nothing wanting, to Miss Aymar,
of those peculiarities which, in England, are thought most
desirable
to grace a title.
In proportion to the nobleness and fine balance of qualities in a
woman, (and this we have admired and wondered at, more than
any other peculiarity of the sex), is the unsuspecting readiness of
her
assent to destiny
. With all the superiority of Miss Aymar,
and the manifest want of a proper response to the call of her mind
and heart, she plays her part with unaffected earnestness and
contentment
,
receives what attention falls to her lot with as much
pleasure as if any higher intercourse and homage would be beyond
her capacity to appreciate, and, (if we may be pardoned the
similitude,) simply does her best, like a blood courser at the
plough, without intimating, by discontent or resistance, that her
fine nature is out of place and unappreciated. The merest
dancing partner, who bespeaks an invitation to her mother's
house by asking her hand for a quadrille, believes any favor there
may be in the matter, to be entirely of his own grantingsetting
down the unvoiced superiority, by which he is mysteriously kept
at a distance, as a something or other about her manner which
is not very agreeable.
Of course there is a world of one's own, without which
unappreciated
poets would come down to what is thought of them,
and superior women, by mere lack of recognition, grow like the
common-place people among whom they are numbered. Miss
Aymar's door shuts in a tranquil universe of thought, of choice
books, and of culture which is a luxury without effort; and here
the mind, which is bent to the world, daily recovers its stature,
and the sympathies, whose noble harmony is diminished to accord
with lesser natures, resume their capability and tone. It is by
natural and unconscious echo to the chance-sounded key-note of
a kindred mind, that the true melody of this inner life is alone
betrayed, for it is never ostentatiously sounded to those whom it
might disparage or rebuke. Miss Aymar has her appreciators;
but, unfortunately, from the very advance of her progress, they
are necessarily only those whom she has overtakenwho are not
of her own agewho have learned, by disappointment,
comparison
,
and life's varied experiences of bitter and sweet, the true
value of what she scarce recognises in herself. In foreign society,
where the men, up to a marriageable age, are kept away from
narrowing cares and devoted wholly to such general cultivation as
fits them to adorn fortune when they receive it, and fitly to mate
the delicacy and dignity of a superior woman when they wed her,
she would only have the embarrassment of choice, among
competitors
for her hand, all suitable in age and accomplishments.
Here, such youths are rare; and, as Miss Aymar is not a woman
to marry except with the fullest consent of her own taste and
feeling, she is (we admiringly fear!) in some danger of never
being the wife she could bethe perfect wife made up of
contradictions
and contrastssuch a one as Shakspeare's Helena
promises
to be to Bertram:
A thousand loves;
A mother and a mistress and a friend;
A phnix, captain and an enemy:
A guide, a goddess and a sovereign;
A counsellor, a traitress and a dear;
His humble ambition, proud humility;
His jarring concord, and his discord dulcet;
His faith; his sweet disaster; with a world
Of pretty, fond, adoptious Christendoms
That blinking Cupid gossips.
FANNY TRELLINGER.
Fanny Trellinger
is a belle by mistake. She does not
understand
it herself. And, if continually trying on hearts,
like shoes, and dropping them with as little ceremony as mis-fits
of morocco, prove a young lady to be a coquette, Fanny
Trellinger
is a coquette. Yet she does not deserve to be called one.
Miss Trellinger is a blonde of whom even Buchanan Read, that
skilful idealizer of the pencil, could scarce make a beauty. Her
eyes, hair, waist and shoulders might belong to the most
neglected
of wall-flowers. She dresses well, from obedience to
unconscious
good taste, but forgets her dress and her looks, from the
moment she leaves her mirror till she comes back to it again. If
she has any mere personal charm it is one which is seldom
recognized
except by painters(though it indicates a delightful quality
in a woman, but it can belong to none but the habitually
self-forgetful
)her
mouth has those
blunt corners
which the tension
of a forced smile alters to a sharp angle. Probably no man ever
admired Miss Fanny from seeing her, merely. She reaches
hearts without paying the toll of beauty for passing in at the
eyes. To feel her fascination, one must converse with her; and
the invariable attraction, which affects those who approach her
thus near, is as mysterious to most lookers-on, as, to a child is
the sudden jumping of needles when brought into the neighborhood
of a magnet. It does not seem to require particular qualities to be
subject to her influence. All kinds of men, from a Wall-street
tetrarch to an unbuttered asparagus in his first tail-coat, find her
delightful. She might seem, indeed, indiscriminate in her liking;
for, though her magnetism depends on what is entirely within her
own control, she exercises it on every new comer who approaches
herwithholding it from none except those she has rejected or
known enough of. Few people in this world being capable (as
the doctors say) of clearly telling what ails them, the secret
of this omni-fascination does not get out, even through the
confessions
of its victims; and Miss Trellinger shops at Stewart's
of all the belles who go there, the one whose silks and muslins
minister to conquests the most unaccountable.
It would be vain to look for the secret of this invisible charm,
in the education, or reading, or conversational talent of Miss
Fanny. Within the ordinary outline of school-routine, she was
left to educate herself; her reading is pursued with no system,
and is rather less, than more, than that of other young ladies;
and, in conversation she says singularly little. It is doubtful
whether her most desperate admirer ever quoted any remark of
hers as peculiar or clever, and she never, herself, entertained the
remotest idea of expressing a thought so as to make an
impression
.
We seem, thus far, to have almost proved that her
fascination
is neither of person nor mindyet it is not so,
altogether
.
Whether from some bent of the mind early taken, or from an
accident of combined mental qualities, it is difficult to saybut
Miss Trellinger's most powerful instinct is curiosity as to
undisclosed
qualities of character. This is united, of course, with
sanguine belief in the superiority of concealed qualities to those
upon the surface; and the taste, like that for love and pleasure
seems not to diminish by disappointment. Every man who
approaches
her as a new acquaintance, is a new enigma of intense
interest; and she sets aside his first politenesses, or quietly waits
for their exhaustion, and brings him as soon as possible to the
state of communicativeness when he will talk freely of himself
and tell his hates and loves, hopes and ambitions. A botanist
does not more attentively and patiently take to pieces a complex
flower. Her natural tact and ingenuity at inspiring confidence
and provoking the betrayal of secret springs of thought and
propensity
,
are, perhaps, enough, alone, to stamp her as a superior
girl, and, differently trained, they might have been the basis of
very uncommon character for a woman.
All unconscious that she is doing more than to gratify a
simple
thirst for the discovery of heroic qualities, dormant and
unappreciated
,
Miss Fanny, meantime, plays a game that no art or
fascination could outdo. Forgetful of herself, and perfectly
honest
in her desire to know deeply the character within, her
manifest
sincerity puts incredulity at once to sleep; and the self-love
of the heart she strives to read, throws down its defences, and
believes it has found, at last, the fond intensity with which
sighed to be appreciated! The manner of Miss Trellinger
without being carressing, is that of earnest, exclusive and grave
attention. Her eyes are fastened on the lips of the speaker; the
tones in which she gives her assent, or puts her simple and
ingenuous
yet most pertinent questions, are subdued to an appealing
contralto
by the interest she really feels; and the expression of
her countenance while she listens, says, more earnestly than
Coriolanus
:
Prithee, say on!
The setting of thine eye and cheek proclaim
A matter from thee!
The love that is incidentally and inevitably made to Miss
Fanny, all this time, she receives with the sanguine appreciation,
with which she believes in each character while studying it. It
is the love of a hero, a poet, a philosopher, a chivalrie and
high-hearted
gentlemanor so she estimates and answers it. Her
notion
of love is as elevated as her expectation of quality in the
man she seeks, and by the dignity and earnestness of her brief
responses of tenderness, she really inspires that kind of
impassioned
respect which is the ground-work of affections the most lasting.
It will be seen that while the temporary intimacies of Miss
Trellinger look, to careless observers, like any other of the
flirtations
going on in society, the unseen weapons with which she
achieves her conquests are more formidable than is suspected.
As was remarked before, her victims could not, or would not
precisely
tell what had attracted and won them; and their
perseverance
in attention, after being dropped and slighted by her, is
even more a subject of bewildered wonder, to her female
acquaintances
,
than the conquest itself. She passes, very naturally, for
heartless, capricious and hypocriticalfor one who does her
utmost
to captivate, for the sake of the triumph only. Her acute
perceptions are always waiting for her glowing imagination to
exhaust
itself, however; and a sudden arrival at the termination of
a shallow character, or an unconscious disclosure of a quality
inconsistent
with her ideal, inspires her with a disappointment or
disgust proportionate to her expectations, and, it is only by
intercourse
abruptly ended that she can avoid even a rude
expression
of her feeling. There is, in the world, unquestionably, such
character as Miss Fanny Trellinger seeks with this thirst
insatiable
.
Should she find it, she would love with a continuance,
there is little doubt; but she may find, that, with such men, the
expectations from the love of woman are large; and she may
regret
that some of the intensity of her nature had not been
expended
on that self-culture which alone can satisfy, in the
un-impassioned
intervals of possessed affection.
15*
MRS. LETTRELL.
There
is a great deal silently recognized and known in this
world, which, still, seems first discovered when first spoken of.
And there is a great deal understood which seems misunderstood;
for society, very often, confidently expresses one opinion of a
person
,
and yet, whenever brought into contact with that same
person, acts upon an unexpressed and totally different estimate.
The truth is that most of us are far wiser than our words would
prove us to bethe art of
first clothing an idea
, being so different
and evasive that few try it at all, and most people so invariably
borrowing
the word-clothes for their opinions, that the true
things they
think
are not recognizable in the erroneous things
they
say
.
The above truisms would probably occur to any one after
reading
the sketch I am about to draw; but it would seem, at first
glance, to be something of a riddle, and those who are as little
fond of deferred revelations as I, will approve, perhaps, that I
have first given the solution.
Leaning, one enchanting summer's morning, two or three years
ago, from the upper balcony of a hotel on the road to a watering
place, I chanced to see, spread out upon the railing of the
balcony
below, a lady's hand. A white cuff, with an inch or two of
the sleeve of a mourning dress, was all I could see, besides, of the
tranquil ownertranquil I say, for she sat, during the fifteen
minutes that she was left alone by her companions, with that
outspread
hand absolutely motionlessevidently drinking the
summer
into its pores of pearl with the enjoyment and forgetful
luxuriousness of a water-lily newly ungloved. The party, of
which the lady was one, had arrived but a few minutes before,
and I had not yet seen her face or figure; but I insensibly
formed an estimate of her character from a study of her hand
only, and had even sketched to myself, though, of course, with a
mere chance of correctness, her expression of countenance,
features
and form.
The hand is not always a reliable index to the character. It
is, more than any other portion of the body, likely to give a
deformed
betrayal of any peculiar manual labor in those from whom
it has descended. A moderate experience in pahnistry will
enable one to distinguish a shoemaker's daughter from a tailor's, for
instancethe enlargement of one particular muscle or finger by
constant effort being handed down like a family feature. Where
it is unmodified by any special influence, however, the hand is
expressive
of the presence, or want, of two or three leading qualities
in female character, and gives often a dumb but lively promise of
sweetness else undisclosed.
In the beautiful and motionless one spread out, so unconscious
of observation, on the railing below my eye, I read exquisite
sensibility
to pleasure, joyous love of the beautiful, generous freedom
from suspicion, delicacy still un-alarmed, frankness, and, if I may
so express it, sensuous poetry of nature. It was not a small hand.
The dimples were round and scarce perceptible. The upper
joints of the long and taper fingers were so full as to give an
exquisite
expression of dreamy and idle tenderness, while at the
same time there was a look of the finest dexterity and nicest
elegance
in the slender and rosy nails. The whole posture and
form of the hand showed a habit of unreluctant and obedient
expansion to impulse, and it looked as unwithdrawing and
trustful
as the opening petals of a rose.
I had thus far studied the viewlessly written page of character,
accidentally opened in its dewy fairness to my perusal, when I
was accosted by an acquaintance, who chanced to be one of the
lady's party. He told me who it was, sitting in the balcony
below
,
and, to a question or two of my own, gave me her character
as that of a lady who disliked society, was very strict in the
education of her children, highly religious, devoted to the poor,
and
passionately fond of riding on horseback. I tacitly made use
of my own better reading to separate what was probably true,
from what I knew to be erroncous, in this hearsay estimate of
character, but stored away a resolution to know more of the
owner of that hand, whom I had met and was likely to meet again,
but who had hitherto passed, gloved and unobserved, in the dazzle
of more pretentious society.
So easily do we let a superficial impression guide us, in our
selection of persons to observe and admire, that, (but for the
chance revealing by that expressive hand,) I might very possibly,
have continued, even till now, to meet, without recognition of its
veiled brightness, this one of the cluster of better spirits, moving,
like electric sparks, through the dull metal of every human
society Mrs. Lettrell is beautiful, certainly, but it is beauty of
that kind which dissolves film after film from off your eye as you
grow interested in gazing on it; and, much admiration as she
attracts from trifling observers, a man of sense would be very
likely to take this common attraction to express her whole value,
and not give her the after study which would disclose to him the
finer quality of the nature, admired thus partially yet
instinctively
.
To anticipate once more. Nature seems to have completed
the character of Mrs. Lettrell, and forgetfully, afterwards, to
have relifted its cup of perfect mixture and added to it an
unneeded
drop of conscientiousness. To this double portion of the
corrective ingredient, the joyous and life-teeming impulses of a
heart, whose self-abandonment would be as safe as a fount's to
its overflow, are perpetually in check. No thrill of pleasure goes
through her heart unchallenged; no intention, save one of duty,
escapes being called to order; no glow of impassioned worship of
the beautiful kindles in her bosom unrebuked. Like an
ingredient
added too late for solution, however, this last superfluous
drop has not tinctured, though it mingles with, the other qualities;
and often, in repose, separates quite, and leaves her else perfect
and impulsive nature all transparent. To this release she yields
with the feeling of escape from schoolwhen on horseback, or
when the enchantments of summer or moonlight, poetry or music,
take her by surprisethough, for every such indulgence she calls
herself to account, and balances it by a self-imposed penance of
distasteful duty.
Forced into gay society by relatives and unavoidable influences,
Mrs. Lettrell constantly and sincerely expresses her unwillingness
to be there, dresses pertinaciously in a way to disguise whatever
beauty she has that might seem to invite admiration, and
perpetually
checks her own joyousness and the careless conversation
of others, to suggest graver topics or make interest for a
benevolent
object. The
talk
of society takes her at her own valuation,
and no one will express an opinion of her except as an
over-exemplary
woman, who would not have been handsome if she could
have helped itbut around her, notwithstanding, cluster the
life-loving
,
the youthful and the impulsive, and, though none would
allow that she was not too good for this world, the most
avowed
mirth-hunter feels uncondemned by her presence.
To those grasping monopolists, (of whom there is here and there
one!) who would possess that entire world, a woman's heart, as
unshared as Eden when Adam first looked around him alone, this
composition of characterlike a summer's day with a lock and
key to itis the treasure that rewards any cost of search, even
without beauty; but, coupled with beauty, of priceless rarity and
value.
I break off abruptly and unwillingly, leaving a singular and
beautiful character drawn only in outline; but to say more would
be an invasion of propriety, and perhaps, too, they who are
capable
of best appreciating it, will be able to supply what is left
unpencilled
.
In great danger of giving offence, even as it is, I have
abstained from sketching form or features, describing only the
fair hand which so truly first revealed the character to my own
knowledge, and which few, whose recognition would be
troublesome
,
will ever chance to see ungloved.
HOPE CHASMAR.
In
every block of marble there is a concealed statue. And
this assertion, so susceptible of qualification, probably corresponds
in truth and definiteness, to the optimistic axiom, that there is
a beautiful ideal in the character of every human being
wanting
only development. I have known some men(and I presume,
therefore
, that there may be here and there a woman)whom
chiselling or developing, by human art or circumstances, could
possibly make interesting or admirable.
Incredulity, however, would as wrongfully lead to the other
extreme. In more of the people about us than we should think
possible, there are capabilities of the higher displays of character,
wanting only favorable culture and opportunity. Among women,
more particularly, whose bud and flower of youth are left to grow
more spontaneously than those of menless crowded by care and
less rudely handled by vice and antagonismthe inherent qualities
of mind, ready to bloom and bear fruit luxuriantly, with but a
little pruning and transplanting, are often beautifully visible. To
a philosophic observer, the discovery and appreciation of these
uncommon capabilities, in those who pass for but ordinary persons,
gives to society the additional interest which a botanist feels in
walking over a common fieldseeing curious plants, and flowers
of divine purpose and structure, on ground which another man
walks over without thought or interest.
The writers of romance have found it so much easier to make
heroines out of dark eyes and raven locks, than out of blue
eyes and fair hair, that a light complexion has, by dint of the
mere repetition of this trick of authorship, grown to be considered
a natural sign of nothing remarkable. Almost any one, sent
into a ball-room to select, from a hundred young ladies, the one
most capable of a heroic action, would first reject all who had
had blue eyes and fair hairtaking it as a matter of course that
the pick must be from the dark-eyed only. And this would be
very likely to be a mistake; for the sanguineous temperaments of
light-complexioned people are both more hopeful and more
enthusiastic, and these are two essential ingredients of the heroic,
which, as mere matters of temperament, may be possessed without
affecting the comparison in other qualities.
Hope Chasmar is not beautiful enough, nor is her family
wealthy enough, to account for all the attention she receives.
Her light hair is magnificently abundant, it is true, and her head
is moulded in those admirable proportions which attract a
sculptor's eye; but neither of these are beauties definitively
recognized by the class of beaux who find her attractive. She
has the two peculiarities which belong to all people capable of
great enthusiasm, an expansive chest and thin nostrils, and she
has one other personal mark inseparable from lofty character
motion without engles or pettiness
so that, whether she lifts a
hand or turns her head, it expresses amplitude of feeling, and
freedom from suspicious reserves. Her features, as a whole,
inspire confidence and liking, while, in detail, they are neither
very regular nor very decided.
A bird singing his song on a bough, however, and the same
bird, with his wings spread for flight, and glittering in the
sun-flecks
as he sweeps through a wood, is not more different than
the countenance of Hope Chasmar habitually, and the same face
at transient and fitful moments of startled imagination. Without
the conscious but undefined orbit of nobler action for which her
soul is instinctively aiming its impulses, she would not, perhaps,
have that generous self-forgetfulness and unrebuking nobleness of
demeanor, which make her attractive to ordinary men; so that
she owes, indirectly, to her heroic character, the common and
unappreciative
homage which makes her a belle; but her true
beauty has probably never been seen by one in twenty of her
admirers, or, if seen, has passed for an accidental expression of
face, which might as easily have been awakened by the same
chance light upon any other. In her ordinary mood she seems
simply good-looking, lady-like, hearty, joyous and unsuspecting.
In her rarer and finer moments, her whole countenance awakens,
her nostrils and eyelids slightly expand, her neck lifts from its
forward curve, and bears her fine head with the fearless pose of
Minerva's, and the muscles of her face, which seem to have been
as much out of place, for effect, as busts, taken down from their
pedestals, assume a totally different proportion, and make a
totally different impression, on the observer's eye. The most
effective change, however, is that of the lipsthe genial
expansion
,
which widens the mouth to a disadvantageous straightness of
line with its look of good humor, yielding to a relaxation of repose,
by which the corners fall, and the Cupid's bow of the upper
lip becomes perfect, the lower lip, by the same movement, arching
into fulness and firmness. In a year or two's observation of this
young lady, I have noticed this change of expression, perhaps four
or five times; but, at the late Opera ball, I chanced to see her
look suddenly over her shoulder at an exciting change in the
music, and I should suppose that the look I then saw awakened,
would have revealed to any observer that there stood a heroine
capable of life's greatest emergencies.
JENNY EVELAND.
A man
who loses his sight, says Dugald Stewart, improves
the sensibility of his touch: but who would consent, for such a
recompense, to part with the pleasures which he receives from
the eye? The expense at which most kinds of distinction are
acquired, seems expressed in this. The right arm of the sculptor
has twice the muscular development of the leftexercised as it
alone is, with the constant lift of the leaden hammer which drives
his chisel. But, inseparable as is this enlargement of the
thought-conveying portion of the body (and of a corresponding
portion of the brain) from the specific labor and construction
which can alone bring fame to the worker in marble, it is, no less,
an
unequal development
of the system, and, just so far, a lessening
of its perfection. The Apollo Belvidere is a perfect type of a
man's figure and limbs, in healthful development; but he never
could have excelled, as a human sculptor, without a special
exercise
of brain and muscle, which would have enlarged them at the
expense of equal distribution of forces, and so destroyed him as a
model, either of perfect health or perfect beauty. While the
possession of genius, therefore, may be consistent with entire
harmony of proportion, the development of it, or the labor of
concentrating
it upon any special pursuit to create a fame, enlarges
the exclusively-exerted portions of the system, and destroys its
healthful balance.
In the difference between a mean indolence and the lofty
resistance
of Nature to this partial development, which is demanded
of geniusin the perpetual struggle between an instinct to exert
all
the faculties equally, and an ambition for the distinction which
is only attainable by exclusive exercise of
one
lies the motive
power of the character of Jenny Eveland. It was only by
prefacing
a sketch of her with the foregoing somewhat abstract
explanation, that her apparent uncertainty and variableness of
aim and effort could be justly drawn.
Miss Eveland has superiority distributed throughout her
nature. Her face has been too long subject to strong emotions
to be invariably attractive. At times it would be called plain.
It is capable, however, of most illuminated beauty, and it is
always expressive, always frank and noble, with the irregular
features which are necessary to the highest expression, her form,
in all else, is the perfection of feminine symmetry. Never giving
her movements a thought, she walks with a lithe grace and freedom
that betrays her at once, to the observing, as a woman of perfect
make. Her head is admirably set on. An Indian girl, bred in
the forest like a fawn, would not be more creet, nor of more
unconscious
elasticity of carriage and mien. An unusually arched
instep to an exquisite foot gives her the mark of high breeding,
which is most looked to in the East, and her slender, and yet
roundly beautiful hand, with its tapering fingers, has a look of
discriminating elegance that the most careless of her friends
recognize and admire. A bright hazel eye, earnest and fearless;
profuse brown hair, whose natural waves are controlled with
difficulty
by her comb, bright teeth, and one of those voices of
clouded contralto which betray the tearfulness of a throat used
to keeping down sadness, are other peculiarities, which go to form
her portrait, and which share in the delightful impression she
makes on all who have the happiness to know her.
But, though the mind of Jenny Eveland is gifted as
symmetrically
as her person(perhaps
because
it is)she has no
believers in her genius, except those who can recognise it without
the evidence of its worksas some book it has written, some
statue it has chiselled, or some picture it has drawn. Feeling
constantly the capacity to write as famous authors write, and to
image beauty, with clay or pencil, as sculptors and painters do, she
talks the language of genius to those who can understand her,
and has all the inspired impulses of genius,its longings for
creative expression, its profound trances of inaction and
melancholy
,
its visions, and its recognitions. Unusually trying
circumstances
in her life have shown that she has energy, industry, and
an almost absolute power of self-controlbut, of course, with a
nature in such complete proportion, she must needs listen to
its loudest voice, and, if her quick blood and impatient limbs
call her off to dance, she must throw aside pen or pencilif her
heart says it is time to be gay, she must abandon sadness, though
poem or picture demand that she should dwell on it for
completion
.
If this be fickleness and idleness, the angels in heaven,
(whose thoughts of beauty come, as they come to genius, but are
not arrested to be put into books or pictures, nor patiently carved
in marble) are fickle and idle.
Yet, from the curse of industryfrom the sweat of the
browno humanity is exempt, and ambition, which is the shape
under which it compels proud minds to action, makes the large
endowments, of Jenny Eveland, gifts of uneasy possession. It is
not enough for her that she has glorious imaginingsthat she
can exchange the passwords of inspiration with poets and painters,
that she can go abroad from common thoughts as the dove from
the ark, and return with tidings of what could be found with such
wings only. The fever to prove this superiority to the world
burns constantly within her. She would fain apply her seal to
the impressible events and opinions of the time. Love, that
would only call upon her affections, and that would leave
unemployed
her finest powers, could not content her. Fame, on the
other hand, if it gave her no scope for the boundless tenderness of
her heart, would suffice as poorly. She is too gifted for common
loveshe is too fond and sympathetic to breathe only the thin
atmosphere of the gifted. And, in this embarrassment of
a
nature too proportionate for a world
which the curse has made
one
of unequal development
, the youth of Jenny Eveland is passing
unsatisfied away.My dear Lord
: In the belief that a frank communication
would be best under the circumstances, I wish to make an inquiry,
prefacing it with the assurance that my only hope of happiness
has been for some time staked upon the successful issue of my
suit for your daughter's hand. It is commonly understood, I
believe, that the bulk of your lordship's fortune is separate from
the entail, and may be disposed of at your pleasure. May I
inquire its amount, or rather, may I ask what fortune goes with
the hand of Lady Angelica. The Beauchief estates are
unfortunately
much embarrassed, and my own debts (I may frankly
confess) are very considerable. You will at once see, my lord,
that, in justice to your daughter, as well as to myself, I could not
do otherwise than make this frank inquiry before pushing my suit
to extremity. Begging your indulgence and an immediate answer,
I remain, my dear lord, yours very faithfully,
Frederick Beauchief
.
The
Earl of Aymar
.(REPLY.)
Dear Lord Frederick
: I trust you will not accuse me of
a want of candor in declining a direct answer to your question.
Though I freely own to a friendly wish for your success in your
efforts to engage the affections of Lady Angelica, with a view to
marriage, it can only be in the irrevocable process of a marriage
settlement that her situation, as to the probable disposal of my
fortune, can be disclosed. I may admit to you, however, that
upon the events of this day on which you have written, (it so
chances,) may depend the question whether I should encourage
you to pursue further your addresses to Lady Angelica.
Yours very faithfully,
Aymar
.
Lord
Frederick Beauchief
.A letter
from Lord Aymar to Lady Angelica will put the story
forward a little:
My dear Angelica
: I am happy to know that there are
circumstances which will turn aside much of the poignancy of the
communication I am about to make to you. If I am not mistaken,
at least, in believing a mutual attachment to exist between
yourself
and Count Pallardos, you will at once comprehend the ground
of my mental relief, and, perhaps, in a measure, anticipate what
I am about to say.
I have never spoken to you of the fearful inheritance in the
blood of the Aymars. This would appear a singular omission
between two members of one family, but I had strong reasons for
my silence, one of which was your possible sympathy with your
mother's obstinate incredulity.
Now
since yesterday's appalling
proofyou can no longer doubt the
inheritance of the phantom
head
the fearful record of some nameless deed of guilt, which is
doomed to haunt our festal table as often as the murderous day
shall come around to a descendant of our blood. Fortunately
mercifully I shall perhaps saywe are not visited by this dread
avenger till the maturity of manhood gives us the courage to
combat
with its horror. The Septembers, since my twentieth year,
have brought it with fatal certainty to
me
. God alone knows
how long I shall be able to withstand the taint it gives to my
thoughts when waking, and to the dreams upon my haunted
pillow.
You will readily see, in what I have said, another reason for
my silence toward you on this subject. In the strong sympathy
and sensitive imagination of a woman, might easily be bred, by
too vivid picturing, a fancy which would be as palpable almost
as the reality; and I wished you to arrive at woman's years
with a belief that it was but a monomaniac affection of my
own braina disease to pity but not to share! You are now
twenty. The females of my family
have invariably seen the
phantom at seventeen!
Do you anticipate the painful inference
I draw from the fact that this spectre is
invisible to you!
No, Angelica! you are
not my daughter!
The Aymar
blood does not run in your veins, and I know not how much
it will soften the knowledge of your mother's frailty to know,
that you are spared the dread inheritance that would have
been yours with a legitimacy of honor. I had grounds for this
belief at your birth, but I thought it due to the hallowed
character
of woman and wife to summon courage to wait for
confirmation
.
Had I acted out the impulse, then almost
uncontrollable
within me, I should have profited by the lawless land
in which I resided to add more weight to the errand of this
phantom avenger. But time and reason have done their work
upon me. Your mother is safe from open retribution. May
God pardon her!
You will have said, here, that since Count Pallardos has
been revealed by the same pursuing Providence to be
my son
, I
may well refrain from appearing as my wife's accuser. I have no
wish to profit by the difference the world makes between infidelity
in man, and infidelity in woman; nor to look, for an apology,
into the law of nature upon which so general and undisputed a
distinction must needs be founded. I confess the justice of
Heaven's vengeance upon the crimevisited upon me, I fearfully
believe, in the unconscious retaliation which gave you birth.
Yet I can not, for this, treat you as the daughter of my blood.
And this brings me to the object of my letter. With the
care of years, I have separated, from the entail of Aymar, the
bulk of my fortune. God has denied me a legitimate male heir,
and I have long ago determined to leave, to its natural conflict
with circumstances, the character of a child I knew to be mine,
and to adopt its destiny, if it proved worthy, should my fears as
to your own parentage be confirmed by the undeniable testimony
of our spectral curse.
Count Pallardos is that child
. Fate
drew him here, without my interference, as the crisis of your
destiny turned against you. The innocent was not to be
punished
for the guilty, and the inheritance he takes from you goes
back to youwith his love in wedlock! So, at least,
appearances
have led me to believe, and so would seem to be made
apparent
the kind provisions of Heaven against our resentful
injustices
.
I must confess that I shall weep tears of joy if it be so,
for, dear Angelica, you have wound yourself around my heart,
nearer to its core than the coil of this serpent revenge. I shall
find it to be so, I am sadly sure, if I prove incorrect in my
suppositions
as to your attachment.
I have now to submit to you, I trust only as a matter of
form, two offers for your handone from Mr. Townley
Mynners
,
and the other (conditional, however, with your fortune)
from Lord Frederick Beauchief. An annuity of five hundred a
year would be all you would receive for a fortune, and your
choice, of course, is free. As the Countess Pallardos, you would
share a very large fortune (my gifts to
my son
, by a transfer to be
executed this day), and to that destiny, if need be, I tearfully
urge you.
Affectionately yours, my dear Angelica,
Aymar
.Dear Count
: You will wonder at receiving a friendly note
from me, after my refusal, two months since, to meet you over
`pistols and coffee;' but reparation may not be too late, and this
is to say, that you have your choice between two modes of
settlement
,
viz:to accept for your stable the hunter you
stole from
me
(
vide
police report) and allow me to take a glass of wine with
you at my own table and bury the hatchet,
or
, to shoot at me if
you like, according to your original design. Mynners and
Beauchief
hope you will select the latter, as they owe you a grudge for
the possession of your incomparable bride and her fortune; but I
trust you will prefer the horse, which (if I am rightly informed)
bore you to the declaration of love at Chasteney. Reply to
Crockford's.
Yours ever (if you like),
Pomfret Dallinger
.
Count
Pallardos
.My dear St. Leger
: Enclosed you have the only surviving
lock of my grizzled wigsign and symbol that my disguises are
over and my object attained. The wig burns at this instant in
the grate,
item
my hand-ruffles,
item
sundry embroidered cravats
3
la veille cour, item
(this last not without some trouble at my
heart) a solitary love-token from Constantia Hervey. One faded
rosegiven me at Pstum, the day before I was driven disgraced
from her presence by the interference of this insolent foolone
faded rose has crisped and faded into smoke with the rest. And
so fled from the world the last hope of a warm and passionate
heart, which never gave up its destiny till nownever felt that
it was made in vain, guarded, refined, cherished in vain, till that
long-loved flower lay in ashes. I am accustomed to strip emotion
of its draperydetermined to feel nothing but what is realyet
this moment, turn it and strip it, and deny its illusions as I will,
is anguish. `Self-inflicted,' you smile and say!
You will marvel what stars will not come into conjunction,
when I tell you that Miss Hervey is at this moment under the
same roof with me and my affianced bride, and you will marvel
what good turn I have done the devil, that he should, in one day,
offer me my enemy's daughter, my enemy's fortune (with the
drawback of an incumbrance), and the woman who I thought had
spurned me. After all, it is a devil's giftfor, in choosing that
to which I am most impelled, I crush hope, and inflict pain, and
darken my own heart for ever. I could not have done this once.
Manhood and poverty have embittered me.
Miss Hitchings has chosen to fall in love with her tutor.
She is seventeen, a sweet blonde, with large, suffused eyes,
tender
,
innocent, and (without talent) singularly earnest and
confiding
.
I could be very happy with such a woman, and it would
have been a very tolerable revenge (failing the other) to have
stolen her from her father. But he would have disinherited and
forgotten us, and I have had enough of poverty, and can not
afford to be forgottenby my enemy.
You never saw Miss Hervey. It is not much to tell you she
is the most beautiful woman I have met. If she were not
beautiful
,
her manners would win all hearts. If her manners were
less fascinating, her singular talents would make her remarkable.
She is not appreciated, because her beauty blinds people to her
talents, and her manners make them forget her beauty. She is
something in the style of the Giorgione we adored at Venicea
transparently dark beauty, with unfathomable eyes and lashes that
sweep her cheek; her person tall and full, and her neck set on
like Zenobia's. Yet she is not a proud womanI think she is
not. She is too natural and true to do anything which looks like
pride, save walk like an empress. She says everything rightly
penetrates instantly to the core of meaningsings, dances, talks,
with the ease, confidence, grace, faultlessness, with which a
swallow
flies. Perfection in all things is her nature. I am jotting
down her qualities now as they are allowed by the world. I will
not write of them like a lover. Oh, my friend, with what
plummet
can you fathom the depth of my resentments, when, for
them, I forego possession of this woman! She offered me, two
hours since, the unqualified control of her destiny! She asked
me, with tremulous voice, to forgive her for the wrong done me
in Italy. She dropped that faultless and superb head on my
bosom, and told me that she loved meand I never answered!
The serpent in my heart tied up my tongue, and, with cold thanks
and fiend-like resistance to the bliss of even once pressing her to
my bosom, I left her. I do not know myself when I remember
that I have done this. I am possesseddriven outby some
hard and bitter spirit who neither acts nor speaks like me. Yet
could I not undo what I have done.
To-morrow morning will disappear Monsieur Sansou from
Hitchings park, and, on the brief condition of a brief ceremony,
the law, the omnipotent law, will deliver into my hands the lands,
tenements, goods, chattels, and liberty of my enemyfor even so
deeply has he sunk into the open pocket of Mrs. Plantagenet!
She holds mortgages on all he has, for money advanced, and all
that is hers will be mine, without reserve. The roof I have been
living in degradation under, will be to-morrow my own. The
man who called me an adventurer, who stood between me and
my love, who thrust me from my heaven without cause or
provocation
the
meddling fool who boasts that he saved a
countrywoman
from a French swindler (he has recurred to it often in my
presence), will be, to-morrow, my dependant, beggar for shelter,
suppliant for his liberty and subsistence! Do you ask if that
out-weighs
the love of the woman I have lost? Alas! yes.
You are older, and have less taste for sentiment even than I.
I will not bore you with my crowd of new feelings in this
situation
.
My future wife is amiable and good. She is also vain,
unattractive, and old. I shall be kind to her, and endeavor that
she shall not be disenchanted, and, if I can make her happy, it
may mollify my penance for the devil with which I am possessed.
Miss Hitchings will lose nothing by having loved me, for she shall
be the heiress of my wealth, and her fatherbut I will not soil
my heart by thinking of an alleviation to his downfall.
Farewell,
mon ami
. Congratulate and pity me.
Adolphe Belaccueil
.THE LETTER.
I have followed up to this hour, my fair cousin, in the path
you have marked out for me. It has brought me back, in this
chamber, to the point from which I started under your guidance,
and if it had brought me back unchangedif it restored me my
energy, my hope, and my prospect of fame, I should pray
Heaven
that it would also give me back my love, and be content
more than content, if it gave me back also my poverty. The
sight of my easel, and of the surroundings of my boyish dreams
of glory, have made my heart bitter. They have given form and
voice to a vague unhappiness, which has haunted me through all
these absent yearsyears of degrading pursuits and wasted
powersand it now impels me from you, kind and lovely as you
are, with an aversion I can not control. I cannot forgive you.
You have thwarted my destiny. You have extinguished with
sordid cares a lamp within me, that might, by this time, have
shone through the world. And what am I, since your wishes are
accomplished? Euriched in pocket, and bankrupt in happiness
and self-respect.
With a heart sick, and a brain aching for distinction, I have
come to an unhonored stand-still at thirty! I am a successful
tradesman, and in this character I shall probably die. Could I
begin to be a painter now, say you? Alas! my knowledge of the
art is too great for patience with the slow hand! I could not
draw a line without despair. The pliant fingers and the plastic
mind must keep pace to make progress in art. My taste is fixed,
and my imagination uncreative, because chained down by
certainties
;
and the shortsighted ardor and daring experiment which are
indispensible to sustain and advance the follower in Raphael's
footsteps, are too far behind for my resuming. The tide ebbed
from me at the accursed burning of my pencils by your pitiless
hand, and from that hour I have felt hope receding. Could I be
happy with you, stranded here in ignoble idleness, and owing to
you the loss of my whole venture of opportunity? No, Fanny?
surely no!
I would not be unnecessarily harsh. I am sensible of your
affection and constancy. I have deferred this explanation
unwisely
,
till the time and place make it seem more cruel. You
are at this very moment, I well know, awake in your chamber,
devoting to me the vigils of a heart overflowing with tenderness.
And I wouldif it were possibleif it were not utterly beyond
my powers of self-sacrifice and concealmentI would affect a
devotion I can not feel, and carry out this error through a life of
artifice and monotony. But here again, the work is your own,
and my feelings revert bitterly to your interference. If there
were no other obstacle to my marrying youif you were not
associated repulsively with the dark cloud on my life, you are not
the woman I could now enthrone in my bosom. We have
diverged since the separation which I pleaded against, and which
you commanded. I need for my idolatry, now, a creature to
whom the sordid cares you have sacrificed me to, are utterly
unknowna woman born and educated in circumstances where
want is never feared, and where calculation never enters. I must
lavish my wealth, if I fulfil my desire, on one who accepts it like
the air she breathes, and who knows the value of nothing but
lovea bird with a human soul and form, believing herself free
of all the world is rich in, and careful only for pleasure and the
happiness of those who belong to her. Such women, beautiful
and highly educated, are found only in ranks of society between
which and my own I have been increasing in distancenay,
building an impassible barrier, in obedience to your control.
Where I stop, interdicted by the stain of trade, the successful
artist is free to enter. You have stamped me
plebeian
you
would not share my slow progress toward a higher sphere, and
you have disqualified me for attaining it alone. In your
mercenary
and immovable will, and in that only, lies the secret of our
twofold unhappiness.
I leave you, to return to Europe. My brother and my
friends will tell you I am mad and inexcusable, and look upon
you as a victim. They will say that, to have been a painter, were
nothing to the carcer that I might mark out for my ambition, if
ambition I must have, in polities. Politics in a country where
distinction is a pillory! But I could not live here. It is my
misfortune that my tastes are so modified by that long and
compulsory
exile, that life, here, would be a perpetual penance.
This unmixed air of merchandise suffocates me. Our own home
is tinctured black with it. You yourself, in this rural Paradise
you have conjured up, move in it like a cloud. The
counting-house
rings in your voice, calculation draws together your brows,
you look on everything as a
means
, and know its cost; and the
calm and means-forgetting
fruition
, which forms the charm and
dignity of superior life, is utterly unknown to you. What
would be my happiness with such a wife? What would be yours
with such a husband? Yet I consider the incompatibility
between us as no advantage on my parton the contrary, a
punishment, and of your inflicting. What shall I be, anywhere, but
4
a Tantalusa fastidious
ennuy
, with a thirst for the inaccessible
burning in my bosom continually!
I pray you let us avoid another meeting before my departure.
Though I cannot forgive you as a lover, I can think of you with
pleasure as a cousin, and I give you, as your due, (damages, the
law would phrase it,) the portion of myself which you thought
most important when I offered you my all. You would not take
me without the fortune, but perhaps you will be content with the
fortune without me. I shall immediately take steps to convey to
you this property of Revedere, with an income sufficient to
maintain
it, and I trust soon to hear that you have found a husband
better worthy of you than your cousin
Philip Ballister
.Rome
,
May
30, 1832.
Dined
with F, the artist, at a
trattoria
. F is a man of
genius, very adventurous and imaginative in his art, but never
caring to show the least touch of these qualities in his
conversation
.
His pictures have given him great vogue and consideration
at Rome, so that his daily experience furnishes staple enough for
his evening's chit-chat, and he seems, of course, to be always
talking of himself. He is very generally set down as an egotist.
His impulse to talk, however, springs from no wish for
self-glorification
,
but rather from an indolent aptness to lay hands on
the readiest and most familiar topic, and that is a kind of egotism
to which I have very little objectionparticularly with the mind
fatigued, as it commonly is in Rome, by a long day's study of
works of art.
I had passed the morning at the Barberini palace with a party
of picture-hunters, and I made some remark as to the variety of
impressions made upon the minds of different people by the same
picture.
Apropos
of this remark, F told me a little anecdote,
which I must try to put down by way of a new shoal in the chart
of human nature.
It is very much the same with everything else, said F;
no two people see with the same eyes, physically or morally;
and faith, we might save ourselves a great deal of care and bother
if we did but keep it in mind.
As how? I asked, for I saw that this vague remark was
premonitory of an illustration.
I think I introduced young Skyring to you at a party
somewhere
?
A youth with a gay waistcoat and nothing to say? Yes.
Wellyour observation just now reminded me of the
different
estimate put by that gentleman and myself upon
something
,
and if I could give you any idea of my month's work in his
behalf, you would agree with me that I might have spared myself
some troublekeeping in mind, as I said before, the difference in
optics.
I was copying a bit of foreshortening from a picture in the
Vatican, one day, when this youth passed without observing me.
I did not immediately recollect him. He was dressed like a
figure in a tailor's window, and, with Mrs. Stark in his hand, was
hunting up the pictures marked with four notes of admiration;
and I, with a smile at the waxy dandyism of the man, turned to
my work and forgot him. Presently his face recurred to me, or
rather his sister's face, which some family likeness had insensibly
recalled, and, getting another look, I recognised in him an old,
though not very intimate playmate of my boyish days. It
immediately
occurred to me that I could serve him a very good turn
by giving him the
entre
to society here, and quite as
immediately
,
it occurred to me to doubt whether it were worth my
while.
And what changed your mind, I asked, for of course you
came to the conclusion that it was not?
Oh, for his sake alone I should have left him as he was, a
hermit in his varnished bootsfor he had not an acquaintance in
the citybut Kate Skyring had given me roses when roses were
to me, each a world; and for her sake, though I was a rejected
lover, I thought better of my demurrer. Then I had a little
pique to gratifyfor the Skyrings had rather given me the
de
haut en bas
in declining the honor of my alliance (lucky for me,
since it brought me here and made me what I am), and I was not
indisposed to show that the power to serve, to say the least, was
now on my side.
Two sufficient, as well as dramatic reasons for being civil to a
man.
Only arrived at, however, by a night's deliberation, for it
cost me some trouble of thought and memory to get back into my
chrysalis and imagine myself at all subject to people so much
below my present voguewhatever that is worth! Of course I
don't think of Kate in this comparison, for a woman one has once
loved is below nothing. We'll drink her health, God bless
her!
(A bottle of Lagrima.)
I left my card on Mr. Skyring the next morning, with a note
enclosing three or four invitations which I had been at some
trouble to procure, and a hope from myself of the honor of his
company to a quiet dinner. He took it as a statue would take a
shower-bath, wrote me a note in the third person in reply to mine
in the first, and came in ball-dress and sulphur gloves at
precisely
the canonical fifteen minutes past the hour. Good old
Thorwalsden dined with me, and an English viscount for whom I
was painting a picture, and between my talking Italian to the
venerable sculptor, and Skyring's belording and belordshipping
the good-natured nobleman, the dinner went trippingly offthe
Little Pedlington of our mutual nativity furnishing less than its
share to the conversation.
We drove, all together, to the Palazzo Rossi, for it was the
night of the Marchesa's
soire
. As sponsor, I looked with some
satisfaction at Skyring in the ante-room, his toggery being quite
unexceptionable, and his
maintien
very uppish and assured. I
presented him to our fair hostess, who surveyed him as he
approached
with a satisfactory look of approval, and no one else
chancing to be near, I left him to improve what was rather a rare
opportunitya
tte--tte
with the prettiest woman in Rome.
Five minutes after, I returned to reconnoitre, and there he stood,
stroking down his velvet waistcoat, and looking from the carpet
to the ceiling, while the marchioness was quite red with
embarrassment
and vexation. He had not opened his lips! She had
tried him in French and Italian (the dunce had told me that he
spoke French too), and finally she had ventured upon English,
which she knew very little of, and still he neither spoke nor ran
away!
`Perhaps Monsieur would like to dance,' said the
marchioness
,
gliding away from him with a look of inexpressible relief,
and trusting to me to find him a partner.
I had no difficulty in finding him a partner, for (that far) his
waistcoat `put him on velvet'but I could not trust him alone
again; so, having presented him to a very pretty woman and got
them
vis--vis
in the quadrille, I stood by to supply the
short-comings
.
And little of a sinecure it was! The man had nothing
to say; nor, confound him, had he any embarrassment on the
subject
.
He looked at his varnished pumps, and coaxed his coat to
his waist, and set back his neck like a goose bolting a grasshopper,
and took as much interest in the conversation as a footman behind
your chairdeaf and dumb apparently, but perfectly at his ease.
He evidently had no idea that there was any distinction between
men except in dress, and was persuaded that he was entirely
successful
as far as he had gone: and, as to my efforts in his behalf,
he clearly took them as gratuitous on my partprobably
thinking
,
from the difference in our exteriors, that I had paid myself
in the glory of introducing him.
WellI had begun so liberally that I could scarce refuse to
find my friend another partner, and, after that, another and
anotherI, to avoid the odium of inflicting a bore on my fair
acquaintances, feeling compelled to continue my service as chorus
in the pantomimeand, you will scarce believe me when I tell
you that I submitted to this bore nightly for a month! I could
not get rid of him. He would not be let go. Without offending
him mortally, and so undoing all my sentimental outlay for Kate
Skyring and her short-sighted papa, I had nothing for it but to
go on till he should go offridden to death with him in every
conceivable variety of bore.
And is he gone?
Gone. And now, what thanks do you suppose I got for all
this?
A present of a pencil-case?
No, indeed! but a lesson in human nature that will stick by
me much longer. He called at my studio yesterday morning to
say good-bye. Through all my sense of his boredom and relief at
the prospect of being rid of him, I felt embarrassed when he came
in, thinking how difficult it would be for him to express properly
his sense of the obligation he was under to me. After half an
hour's monologue (by myself) on pictures, &c., he started up
and said he must go. `And by-the-by,' said he, coloring a little,
`there is one thing I want to say to you, Mr. F! Hang it, it
has stuck in my throat ever since I met you! You've been very
polite and I'm obliged to you, of course
but I don't like your
devilish patronizing manner!
Good-bye, Mr. F!
The foregoing is a leaf from a private diary which I kept at
Rome. In making a daily entry of such passing stuff as interests
us, we sometimes, amid much that should be ticketed for oblivion,
record that which has a bearing, important or amusing, on the
future; and a late renewal of my acquaintance with Mr. F,
followed by a knowledge of some fortunate changes in his worldly
condition, has given that interest to this otherwise unimportant
scrap of diary which will be made apparent presently to the
reader. A vague recollection that I had something in an old
book which referred to him, induced me to look it up, and I was
surprised to find that I had noted down, in this trifling aneedote,
what turned out to be the mainspring of his destiny.
F returned to his native country after five years study of
the great masters of Italy. His first pictures painted at Rome
procured for him, as is stated in the diary I have quoted, a high
reputation. He carried with him a style of his own which was
merely stimulated and heightened by his first year's walk through
the galleries of Florence, and the originality and boldness in his
manner of coloring seemed to promise a sustained novelty of the
art. Gradually, however, the awe of the great masters seemed
to overshadow his confidence in himself, and, as he travelled and
deepened his knowledge of painting, he threw aside feature after
feature of his own peculiar style, till at last he fell into the track
of the great army of imitators, who follow the immortals of the
Vatican as doomed ships follow the Flying Dutchman.
Arrived at home, and depending solely on his art for a
subsistence
,
F commenced the profession to which he had served so
long an apprenticeship. But his pictures sadly disappointed his
friends. After the first specimens of his acquired style in the
annual exhibitions, the calls at his rooms became fewer and
farther
between, and his best works were returned from the galleries
unsold. Too proud to humor the popular taste by returning to
what he considered an inferior stage of his art, he stood still with
his reputation ebbing from him, and as his means, of course,
depended on the tide of public favor, he was soon involved in
troubles before which his once-brilliant hopes rapidly faded.
At this juncture he received the following letter:
You will be surprised on glancing at the signature to this
letter. You will be still more surprised when you are reminded
that it is a reply to an unanswered one of your ownwritten
years ago. That letter lies by me, expressed with all the
diffidence
of boyish feeling. And it seems as if its diffidence would
encourage me in what I wish to say. Yet I write far more
tremblingly than you could have done.
Let me try to prepare the way by some explanation of the
past.
You were my first lover. I was not forbidden, at fourteen,
to express the pleasure I felt at your admiration, and you cannot
have forgotten the ardor and simplicity with which I returned it.
4*
I remember giving you roses better than I remember anything so
long ago. Nowwriting to you with the same feeling warm at
my heartit seems to me as if it needed but a rose, could I give
it you in the same garden, to make us lovers again. Yet I know
you must be changed. I scarce know whether I should go on
with this letter.
But I owe you reparation. I owe you an answer to this
which lies before me; and, if I err in answering it as my heart
burns to do, you will at least be made happier by knowing that
when treated with neglect and repulsion, you were still beloved.
I think it was not long before the receipt of this letter that
my father first spoke to me of our attachment. Till then I had
only thought of loving you. That you were graceful and manly,
that your voice was sweet, and that your smile made me happy,
was all I could have told of you without reflection. I had never
reasoned upon your qualities of mind, though I had taken an
unconscious pride in your superiority to your companions, and
least of all had I asked myself whether those abilities for making
your way in the world, which my father denied you, were among
your boyish energies. With a silent conviction that you had no
equal among your companions, in anything, I listened to my
father's disparagement of you, bewildered and overawedthe
very novelty and unexpectedness of the light in which he spoke
of you, sealing my lips completely. Perhaps resistance to his
will would have been of no avail, but, had I been better prepared
to reason upon what he urged, I might have expressed to you
the unwillingness of my acquiescence. I was prevented from
seeing you till your letter came, and then all intercourse with
you was formally forbidden. My father said he would himself
reply to your proposal. But it was addressed to me, and I have
only recovered possession of it by his death.
Though it may seem like reproaching you for yielding me
without an effort, I must say, to complete the history of my own
feelings, that I nursed a vague hope of hearing from you until
your departure for Italy, and that this hope was extinguished not
without bitter tears. The partial resentment that mingled with
this unhappiness aided me doubtless in making up my mind to
forget you, and for a while, for years I may say, I was possessed
by other excitements and feelings. It is strange, however, that,
though scarce remembering you when waking, I still saw you
perpetually in my dreams.
And, so far, this is a cold and easy recital. How shall I
describe to you the next change, the re-awakening of this
smothered
and slumbering affection! How shall I evade your
contempt
when I tell you that it awoke with your renown! But my
first feeling was not one of love. When your name began to come
to us in the letters of travellers and in the rumor of literary
circles, I felt as if something that belonged to me was praised
and honored; a pride, an exulting and gratified pride, that
feeling
seemed to be, as if the heart of my childhood had been
staked on your aspirations, and was borne up with you, a part
and a partaker of your fame. With all my soul I drank in the
news of your successes in the art; I wrote to those who came
home from Italy; I questioned those likely to have heard of you,
as critics and connoisscurs; I devoted all my reading to the
literature
of the arts, and the history of painters, for my life was
poured into yours irresistibly, by a power I could not, and cannot
now control. My own imagination turned painter, indeed, for I
lived on revery, calling up, with endless variations, pictures of
yourself amid the works of your pencil, visited and honored as I
knew you were, yet unchanged in the graceful and boyish beauty
I remembered. I was proud of having loved you, of having been
the object of the earliest and purest preference of a creature of
genius; and through this pride, supplanting and overflowing it,
crept and strengthened a warmer feeling, the love I have the
hardihood to avow. Oh! what will you think of this boldness!
Yet to conceal my love were now a severer task than to wait the
hazard of your contempt.
One explanationa palliative, perhaps you will allow it to
be, if you are generousremains to be given. The immediate
impulse of this letter was information from my brother, long
withheld, of your kindness to him in Rome. From some
perverseness
which I hardly understand, he has never before hinted
in my presence that he had seen you in Italy, and it was only by
needing it as an illustration of some feeling which seemed to have
piqued him, and which he was expressing to a friend, that he
gave the particulars of your month of devotion to him.
Knowing
the difference between your characters, and the entire want of
sympathy between your pursuits and my brother's, to what
motive could I attribute your unusual and self-sacrificing
kindness
?
Did I errwas I presumptuous, in believing that it was
from a forgiving and tender memory of myself?
You are prepared now, if you can be, for what I would say.
We are left alone, my brother and I, orphan heirs to the large
fortune of my father. I have no one to control my wishes, no
one's permission to ask for any disposition of my hand and
fortune
.
Will you have them? In this question is answered the
sweet, and long-treasured, though long neglected letter, lying
beside me.
Katherine Skyring
.Baron
: Before taking the usual notice of the occurrence of
this morning, I wish to rectify one or two points in which our
position is false. I find myself, since last night, the accepted
lover of Lady Imogen Ravelgold, and the master of estates and
title as a Count of the Russian empire. Under the
etourdissement
of such sudden changes in feelings and fortune, perhaps my
forgetfulness
of the lady, in whose cause you are so interested,
admits
of indulgence. At any rate, I am so newly in love with
life, that I am willing to suppose, for an hour, that had you known
these circumstances, you would have taken a different view of the
offence in question. I shall remain at home till two, and it is in
your power till then to make me the reparation necessary to
my honor. Yours, etc.,
Tremlet
.Dear Sir
: My wife wishes me to write to you, and inform
you of her marriage, which took place a week or two since, and of
which she presumes you are not aware. She remarked to me,
that you thought her looking unhappy last evening, when you
chanced to see her at the play. As she seemed to regret not
being able to answer your note herself, I may perhaps convey the
proper apology by taking upon myself to mention to you, that, in
consequence of eating an imprudent quantity of unripe fruit, she
felt ill before going to the theatre, and was obliged to leave early.
To day she seems seriously indisposed. I trust she will be well
enough to see you in a day or twoand remain,
Yours, truly,
Samuel Smithers
.My Dear Tremlet
,In the two days that I have exiled
you from my presence, I have exiled my happiness alsoas you
well know without my confessingbut I needed to sleep and wake
more than once upon your welcome but unexpected avowal. I
fear, indeed, that I need much more time, and that reflection
would scarce justify what I am now about to write to you. But
my life, hitherto, has been such a succession of heart-chilled
waitings
upon Reason, that, for once, while I have the power, I am
tempted to bound away with Impulse, after happiness.
Of course you understand in this an acceptance of your offer.
But I have conditions to impose. It is possible that you may
withdraw your offer when you know them. Yet they are so
much of a character with our acquaintance, and with our
intercourse
,
for the month into which we have crowded an age, that
I have strong hopes of your not finding them distasteful. Let me
preface my exactions by some sort of apology, howevershowing
you, that is to say, the ground work of the foible (if such you
think it) which is to be humored by your acquiescence.
I have partially expressed to you, in conversation, how
completely
my whole life has been a sacrifice of natural preferences
to worldly expediency. For my present station, such as it is, I
have given gradually the entire provision made by nature for my
happinessmy girlish joyfulness, my woman's power of loving,
my hopes, my dreams, my sympathies, my person. I was forced
to sacrifice an early affection, to marry for title and fortune. I
have since been unceasingly called upon to choose between my
heart's wishes and freedom from humiliation. You will say
it was at my own risk if I preferred the latterbut in every
important
crisis of option, the threatened evils looked appalling,
and the happiness comparatively partial. Meantime, (I am quite
ready to believe,) my pride has been thus fed to a disease.
Of course there is something wrung from the world by these
sacrifices. To most victims, the wordly advantages are a
sufficient
consolation. But fortune and title alone would not have
continued to tempt me. I could be happy without homage,
and with a hundredth part of the luxury I can command. But
there is another privilege, accompanying high station coldly
maintained
,
and bought by me with these same bitter sacrifices
a
disdainful
independence
of the world that has so robbed us! What
will you say if I tell you that this is what I am trying to preserve
to myself
as a twin happiness with your love!
What will you
think of me, if I confess to you, that the strongest feeling in my
bosom, till you wakened love there, was resentment against
society for the cruelties it has sown my life with! Individuals of
course are blameless of design against me, but the cruelty lies in
the pervading heartlessness of the class. In their mockery of
everything but that which dazzles themin their polished
rejoicing
over the downfall of any social superioritylies the
inevitableness
of the submissions I resent. Is it strange, then, that
I wish to
preserve an ascendancy over it, and remain above its sneer or its
pity
? With the glow of tenderness now in my heart, I cannot
find the bitter words to express to you how much I value this
undeniable power of disdainbut this it is which seems to me the
only equivalent I have wrung from the worldthis it is which I
look on as the true price of the heart sold, pulse by pulse, at the
hateful
bidding of the opinions of the class I live in! And (for you have
already seen my drift) it is this privilege which an open marriage
with you would endanger. You are ten years younger than I.
Your character and tastes are peculiar. The qualities you love
in me, ripen only in the meridian of life. We shall be happy in
marriage, I have reason to believe.
But the world would not
believe
it!
Oh no! The first knowledge of the step would be
received
with a smile, and, with that smile, lightly as it would pass
around, would fall from me, like a dream, the ascendancy in which
lies my power.
Of course you anticipate what I have to propose. I will but
name it to you now, and explain its possibility when we meet. It
is to
marry you privately
, here in Germany. After a week more
in this sweet retirement, (for my time here is nearly expired,) I
will leave you, and resume my apparently heartless life in
England
.
You shall return to England soon yourself, also
apparently
single, and we will be known to the world but as we werethe
cold Countess Isny-Frere, and Tremlet, the unimpressible
artist. The secret can be kept. More difficult things are done
by the simplest people around us. Part of the year we will pass
in this retirement or another, and, with means so ample as mine,
and a character so little open to suspicion of such a secret,
innumerable
varieties, in the masquerading part of our life, will
always
be possible.
Do you not see, my gifted and beautiful lover, how I thus add, to
the wealth of your affection, the jewel for which I sold all my
happiness till I met you? Do not feel offended that in your love
I have not forgotten it. We value what has cost us our heart's
blood, though it be but a worthless trifle to another. Oh, you
must let me preserve my icy veil between me and the world
preserve it, for my heart to beat behind it, in a heaven of every
day affection. I plead for it with my whole soulbut
it is yours
to decide!
I began my letter thinking that I should inflexibly
exact it. I could not hesitate, however, now, in a choice between
it and you. I will marry you openly if you so require.
Come to me at sunset. Having once broken my wish to you,
I can venture to talk of it. And nowimpatient to press my
lips upon your beautiful foreheadI record myself your
Edith
.I promised to return to you when I should resemble my
picture
.
It is possible that exile from your presence has marred
more beauty than mental culture has developedbut the soul
you drew in portrait has, at least found its way to my features
for the world acknowledges what you alone read prophetically at
Leipsic. I have kept myself advised of your movements, with a
woman's anxiety. You are still toiling at the art which made us
acquainted, and, (thank God!)
unmarried
. To-night, at the
concert of the Countess Isny-Frere, I shall sing to you, for I
have taken pains to know that you will be there. Do not speak
to me till you can see me alonebut hear me in my art before
I abandon myself to the joy long deferred, of throwing myself
at your feet with the fortune and fame it is now mine to offer
you.
Only yours,
Jessonda
.`
Dear Miss Blidgims
: Feeling quite indisposed myself, and
being firmly persuaded that we are three cases of cholera, I have
taken advantage of a return calesino to hurry on to Modena for
medical advice. The vehicle I take brought hither a sister of
charity, who assures me she will wait on you, even in the most
malignant stage of your disease. She is collecting funds for a
hospital, and will receive compensation for her services in the
form of a donation to this object. I shall send you a physician
by express from Modena, where it is still possible we may meet.
With prayers, &c. &c.
`Yours very devotedly,
`F.
`P. S. Sister Benedetta understands French when spoken,
though she speaks only Italian.'